Go to the white table behind you.
Pick up the plate that is to the left of the cabbage.
Take the plate to the microwave.
Heat the plate in the microwave.
Go to the black table that is behind you and the the left of the white table.
Place the plate on the black table, next to the knife. 
Turn around and go to the left side of the white table.
Take the gray plate with pattern from the table.
Turn right and go to the oven.
Put the plate in the microwave, turn on the microwave, take the plate from the microwave.
Turn around, go to the black stand in the right corner next to the white table.
Put the plate on the black stand in front of the knife.
Turn around and walk to the left side of the white table.
Pick up the patterned plate.
Turn right and walk to the microwave.
Heat the plate.
Turn around and walk to the far right corner of the room.
Place the plate on the black end table in front of the knife.
Walk forward to the counter then turn right and walk to the counter.
Pick up the yellow handled knife that's in front of you.
Turn right and walk to the right side of the sink and turn left to face it. 
Cut the apple in the sink into three big chunks.
Put the knife in the sink near the apple.
Pick up a chunk of the apple.
Turn around and walk to the fridge please then take a step to your left so you are standing in front of it centered on it.
Chill the chunk of apple in the fridge then get it back out and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the stove that's on your left please and stand in front of it facing it then look up.
Put the chunk of apple in the microwave please then close the microwave door.
Turn right, move to the counter that is left of the sink.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn right, move to in front of the sink.
Slice the apple in the sink.
Put the knife in the sink.
Pick up a apple section from the sink.
Turn left, move to in front of the refrigerator.
Put the apple section in the refrigerator, chill it, pick it back up.
Turn right, move to in front of the microwave.
Put the apple section in the microwave.
Go to the counter left of the sink
Pick up the knife
Go to the sink
Cut the apple in the sink
Put the knife in the sink
Pick up an apple slice
Go to the fridge
Chill the apple
Go to the microwave
Put the apple in the microwave
Turn left, go forward, at the fridge turn right, go forward to the oven, turn right, go forward to the wall, turn left to face the oven.
Take the bowl from the cabinet beneath the counter to the right of the oven.
Turn left, go forward, turn left at the end of the counter on the right, go forward to the fridge.
Chill the bowl on the lower shelf of the fridge.
Take a step back from the fridge, look above the fridge.
Put the bowl in the cabinet above the right side of the fridge.
go to the right side of the stove
take the glass bowl from the cabinet on the bottom right of the stove
take the bowl to the fridge
chill the bowl in the fridge then remove
approach the cabinet above the fridge to the right
put the bowl in the cabinet
Walk over to the stove.
Grab the bowl in the cupboard next to the stove.
Head over to the fridge.
Chill the bowl in the fridge.
Grab the bowl back and walk over to the cabinet.
Put the bowl in the cabinet.
Move around the counter keeping it on the right until you're in front of it
Pick up the knife on the counter
Turn around and move to the sink on the right
Slice the bread to the left of the sink
Turn around and move to the counter on the far left of the wall
Slice the second loaf of bread that is below the tomato
Turn left and move to the trash can in the small area ahead
Put the knife in the trash can
Turn around and turn right and move towards the counter with the sink
Pick up a slice of bread from the middle of the loaf to the left of the sink
Turn to the left and move to the wall before turning left into the small area with the trash can
Put the slice in the trash can
Turn around and return to the second loaf of bread that is below the tomato
Pick up a slice of bread from the middle of the loaf that sits below the tomato 
Turn around and go back to the small room with the trash can
Put the second slice of bread in the trash beneath the first one
Walk forward to the corner counter area.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn left and go to the loaf of bread on the other side of the sink.
Slice the loaf of bread on the counter next to the sink.
Turn around and walk to the counter on the other side of the kitchen.
Slice the loaf of bread on the counter next to the oven.
Turn around and walk to the trash can.
Put the knife in the trash can.
Turn left and walk to the loaf of bread next to the sink.
Pick up a slice of bread from the counter.
Turn right and walk to the trash can.
Put the slice of bread in the trash can.
Turn around and walk to the loaf of bread next to the oven.
Pick up a slice of bread from the counter.
Turn around and walk to the trash can.
Put the slice of bread in the trash can.
Go to the counter straight ahead, on your left. 
Pick up the knife to the left of the lettuce on the counter. 
Turn to your left and go to the counter just past the sink.
Cut the loaf of bread on the back of the counter, to the left of the faucet. 
Turn around and go to the counter on the left, just past the refrigerator. 
Cut the loaf of bread between the knife and the spatula on the counter, into slices.
Turn around and go to the red garbage can, on the floor, in the back, right corner of the kitchen. 
Put the knife in the garbage can. 
Turn to your left and walk towards the stove, then turn to the counter on your right, just past the sink. 
Pick up one of the slices of bread previously cut, on the counter. 
Turn to your right and walk to the end of the kitchen, then turn left and head to the red garbage can in the corner. 
Put the slice of bread in the red garbage can. 
Turn around and go to the counter across from you, to the left of the refrigerator. 
Pick up one of the slices of bread previously cut, on the counter. 
Turn around and go to the red garbage can, in the corner, across from you. 
Place the slice of bread in the garbage can.
Turn left and walk to the counter.
Pick up the mug that's in front of you.
Take a small step to your right.
Warm the mug in the microwave then take it back out and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the counter but leave about two feet of room so you can use the cupboards under the counter.
Open the cupboard to the right of the sink under the counter and put the mug down there before you close the door.
Turn right to face the microwave.
Pick up the white mug next to the microwave.
Turn to face the front of the microwave.
Heat up the mug in the microwave, removing it afterwards.
Turn around to face the lower right cabinets next to the sink.
Put the white mug in the cabinet directly below the loaf of bread on the counter.
go to the counter where the microwave is
pick up the white mug to the left of the microwave
approach the microwave with the cup
warm the cup in the microwave then remove
take the cup to the cabinet to the right of the sink
put the mug in the cabinet 
Walk forward and turn left to face the round table
Pick up the nearest butter knife from the table
Turn left and walk forward and left to the kitchen sink
Use the knife to cut the potato on the counter behind the sink
Move slightly right and turn to face the sink
Put the knife down in the sink
Move slightly left and turn to face the potato behind the sink
Pick up a potato slice from the counter behind the sink
Move slightly right and turn back left to face the sink
Wash the potato slice under water in the sink then remove it
Turn around and walk forward and left back over to the round table
Put the potato slice on the table
Go forward and get in front of the loaf of bread that is next to the salt
Pick up the knife on the far left edge of the table
turn right and go the sink in the kitchen
slice the potato that is next to the bottle at the back of the sink.
go the the left side of the sink
place the knife in the sink to the left of the spoon
go to the right side of the sink
pick up a slice of the potato at the back of the sink next to the bottle
go to the right side of the sink
wash the slice of potato in the sink
Turn right and go to the round table on the left corner of the room
Place the slice of potato to the right of the bread loaf that is next to the salt.
Move forward and face the table on your left.
Take the knife off the table in front of you.
Turn left then left again and face the sink to your right.
Slice the potato near the sink in front of you.
Turn right then face the sink on your left.
Place the knife in the sink in front of you.
Turn left and face the potato near the sink on your right.
Take a potato slice off the counter in front of you.
Turn right then face the sink on your left.
Place the potato in the sink in front of you, wash it and take it out.
Turn right, then right again and face the table to your left.
Place the potato slice on the table in front of you.
Turn around and walk to the cook top range on the left.
Pick up the bottle to the left of the cook top range on the counter.
Turn right, walk forward and turn around to face the cabinet under the counter top.
Open the lower cabinet, put the bottle inside in front of the plate and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the counter ahead with the toaster.
Pick up the bottle to the left of the toaster on the counter.
Turn around and walk to the cabinet under the counter.
Open the lower cabinet, put the bottle inside to the left of the other bottle and close the door.
walk to face stove
pick up wine bottle from counter to left of stove
turn left and gaze down at cabinet below counter
put wine bottle in cabinet
turn left to face counter to right of stove
pick up wine bottle from counter
turn left and gaze down at cabinet below counter
put wine bottle in cabinet
Turn around and move forward, then turn left to go to the stove.
Pick up the bottle of wine on the counter, to the left of the stove.
Go to the counter to your left and look down at the cabinet beneath the counter.
Open the cabinet, put the bottle of wine inside, and close it.
Turn around and go to the counter in front of you.
Pick up the bottle of wine from the counter.
Turn around and move forward, then look down at the cabinet under the counter.
Open the cabinet, put the bottle of wine inside, and close it.
Turn left at the island counter and walk to the counter to the right of the stove on the left.
Pick up the green sponge to the right of the bottle on the counter.
Turn left and walk to the white stove on the right.
Put the sponge inside the pan on the back left corner of the stove.
Pick up the pan with the sponge from the stove.
Turn around, hang a right at the fridge and walk to the island counter on the right.
Put the pan with the sponge on the right side of the counter to the right of the spoon.
Face left, then go to the counter to the right of the stove.
Pick up the sponge on the right of the wine bottle.
Move left, to face the left half of the stove.
Put the sponge in the skillet that is on the back left burner.
Pick up the skillet.
Turn to your right and go to face the center of the kitchen island on your right.
Put the skillet holding the sponge onto the top of the island, to the right of the fork.
turn left, go to counter to the right of stove with green bottle
pick up green sponge to the right of green bottle on counter
go to stove to the left
place green sponge in round pan on stove
pick up round pan with green sponge from stove
turn around, go to opposite side of table with wood stool
place pan with sponge on table to the right of bread 
Turn around and walk to the edge of the counter on the left side.
Pick up the egg on the counter.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Wash the egg in the sink.
Turn around and veer left to the white table in the left corner of the room.
Put the egg on the table to the left of the knife with the yellow handle.
Turn around and find the toaster to the left.
Pick up the egg from the back of the counter.
Carry the egg and turn around to the sink.
Place the egg inside the sink and turn on the water. Turn off the water and take out the egg.
Carry the egg and turn right, then right again to find the white table.
Place the egg toward the front center of the white table.
go to the counter and face the toaster
pick up the egg from the counter
take the egg to the sink
wash the egg in the sink and take back out
take the egg to the white dining table
place the egg on the table to the left of the knife
Turn around and go to the white table across the kitchen. 
Pick up the gray knife on the table towards the back .
Turn around and go to the red trash can on the left of the counter. 
Slice the potato inside the trash can.
Place the knife inside the trash can.
Pick up one slice of potato out of the trash can. 
Turn right and go to the front of the sink.
Wash the potato slice in the sink under running water and take it out.
Turn right and go to the microwave.
Place the potato slice in the microwave.
Turn around, go to the counter
Pick up the knife nearest to the wall
Turn around, go to the basket
Slice the potato in the basket
Put the knife in the basket
Pick up a potato slice
Turn around, go forward, turn left and go to the sink
Put the potato slice in the sink, wash the potato slice with water, pick up the potato slice
Turn right, go to the microwave
Put the potato slice in the microwave
Turn right, go forward a step, turn right, go forward to the white table.
Take the small knife closest to the wall from the table.
Turn around, go forward to the red bin.
Cut the potato in the bin into slices.
Put the knife in the bin.
Take a slice of potato from the bin.
Turn around, go forward, turn left to the sink, go to the sink.
Wash the slice of potato in the sink then take the potato out.
Turn right, go forward to the microwave.
Put the potato in the microwave.
Turn around, then go straight, then turn left, then turn right to go to the table in front of you.
Pick up the nearest plate on the table.
Turn around, and go to the microwave, above the stove.
Heat the plate in the microwave.
Turn right, and look up to the cabinets.
Put the plate in the cabinet to the left.
Turn around and go to the white table.
Pick up the plate in the left corner closest to you.
Turn around and go to the microwave on your left.
Put the plate in the microwave, heat it, and take it out.
Turn right and face the sink.
Put the plate in the cabinet above the sink.
Turn around and head to the white table.
Pick up the plate on the front of the table. 
Bring the plate to the microwave on the left.
Heat the plate in the microwave. 
Bring the heated plate to the cabinet to the right. 
Put the heated plate in the cabinet above the counter. 
Turn right make a few steps then turn left face the cabinet
Open cabinet beside the oven, pick up the dirty plate
Turn right then make few steps face the sink
Put the plate in the sink and rinse it
Turn left then cross the room and head to the shelf on your right
Put the plate on the shelf rack
Turn right and go to the cabinet to the right of the stove
Take the dirty plate out of the cabinet and close the door
Move right to face the sink
Put the plate in the right side of the sink and turn on the water. Turn off the water and take the plate out of the sink
Turn left and go to the shelves
Place the plate on the right side of the second from the bottom shelf
Turn right and take a step to your right.
Open the cupboard to the right of the stove and grab the dirty plate that's down there then close the door.
Take a step to your right to stand in front of the sink.
Wash the plate in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Turn around and walk to the fridge then turn right and walk to the shelves on the wall.
Put the plate all the way to the right of the middle shelf.
Go to the counter with the microwave on the right. 
Pick up the yellow knife on the counter.
Turn around and go to the round wooden table.
Slice the bread on the table.
Turn around to go to the front of the refrigerator on the right. 
Place the knife in front of the lettuce in the refrigerator.
Turn right to go back to the round wooden table with bread on it.
Pick up one slice of bread
Turn right to go to the microwave on the counter.
Microwave the slice of bread and take it out. 
Turn around to go to the front of the refrigerator. 
Place the bread slice in the refrigerator on the shelf below the knife and the lettuce 
Walk straight slightly then turn right and walk up to the kitchen counter
Pick up the yellow handled knife from the counter
Turn around and walk straight to the kitchen table and face it
Slice the loaf of bread on the table
Turn around slightly walk forward then turn right and face the refrigerator
Open the refrigerator and place the knife in front of the lettuce and close the door
Turn to the right and walk forward to face the kitchen table
Pick up a slice of bread from the table
Turn to the left and walk straight to the microwave and face it
Place the bread slice in the microwave, warm it up and then remove it
Turn to the right walk slightly forward then turn right and walk to the refrigerator
Place the bread slice inside the refrigerator
Go straight and turn right towards the counter with the microwave
Pick up the knife to the left of the sponge
Turn around and go in between the table and fridge then turn right towards the table
Slice half of the loaf of bread
Turn right and move to the fridge
Open the fridge doors and put the knife on the shelf under where the lettuce is
Turn around and go back to the table
Pick up a slice of bread
Turn right and go towards the cabinet with the microwave
Open the microwave and place the bread inside, close the microwave, turn it on, wait, open microwave and pull out the bread, close the microwave
Turn around and move to the fridge
Open the fridge, place the bread on the middle shelf, close the fridge door
Walk across the room to face the sink.
Pick up the knife on the edge of the sink.
Take a step to the right to face the right side of the sink.
Cut the head of lettuce into slices on the right side of the sink.
Turn around and walk across the room and turn left to face the fridge.
Place the knife in the fridge.
Turn left and walk forward to face the sink.
Pick up a slice of lettuce in the sink.
Turn around and walk across the room and turn left to face the fridge.
Cool the slice of lettuce in the fridge and then remove it.
Turn around and walk across the room to face the trash can.
Place the slice of lettuce in the trash can.
Turn left and move to the sink.
Pick up the knife in front of the sink.
Move to the center of the sinks.
Slice the lettuce in the sink.
Turn around and move to the front of the fridge.
Put the knife in the fridge.
Turn left and move to the front of the sinks.
Pick up a slice of lettuce.
Turn around and move to the fridge.
Chill the lettuce in the fridge and remove it.
Turn around and move to the green bin.
Place the lettuce in the bin.
Move a bit to the left and go to the left sink
Pick up the knife in front of the sink
Move to the right in front of the right sink
Slice the lettuce in the sink
Turn around, go forward, turn left in front of the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Turn around  and go to the right sink 
Pick up a lettuce slice from the sink
Turn around, go forward, turn left in front of the fridge
Put the lettuce slice in the fridge, wait, pick up the lettuce slice from the fridge
Turn around, go forward
Put the lettuce slice into the basket on the floor
Turn around and go to the table behind you.
Pick up the knife closest to the edge of the table.
Go the the small black table to your right.
Slice the lettuce on the table.
Go to the white table to your right.
Put the knife on the white table in front of the bread.
Go back to the black table to your left.
Pick up a piece of lettuce.
Turn around and walk to the stove to your left.
Put the lettuce in the pan on the back left of the stove.
Pick up the pan with the lettuce in it.
Turn around and go back to the white table to your right.
Put the pan with the lettuce in it on the table to the right of the knife.
Turn around and go to the black circular table.
Take the all silver knife to the right of the bread.
Turn right and go to the black stand in the corner next to the white table.
Cut the lettuce into slices.
Go to the white table to the right.
Put the knife in front of the loaf of bread.
Go to the black stand to the left.
Take a piece of lettuce from the stand.
Turn right go to the oven.
Put the lettuce in the pan on the left back burner on the stove top.
Take the pan from the stove top.
Turn around, go to the white table on the right.
Put the pan to the right of the knife on the table.
Turn right and walk towards the round black table
Pick up the silver knife on the table
Turn right, walk towards the small black rack with a salt shaker
Cut the watermelon into slices
Turn right, walk to the white table with a bread box
Put the knife on the white table next to the bread box
Turn left, then right, walk to the black rack with the watermelon
Pick up the watermelon slice from the small rack
Turn right, then turn left, walk towards the oven
Put the watermelon slice inside the pan on the top left of the stove
Pick up the pan on the stove and turn right
Walk straight then turn right towards the white table
Put the pan on the table next to the knife and bread box
turn right and walk over to the left side of the kitchen sink on your left
grab a spoon off of the back side counter of the kitchen sink
turn around and walk to the end of the room, then turn left and walk over to the fridge up ahead
place the spoon inside of a bowl inside of the fridge
grab the bowl out of the fridge with the spoon inside of the bowl
turn around and walk forwards to the kitchen table ahead
place the bowl down on the kitchen table to the left of the lettuce
walk slightly right to face the counter top between the microwave and sink
pick up a spoon from the ledge on the sink
turn around, walk to face the fridge
open the fridge door, put spoon into the brown bowl in the fridge
pick up the bowl from the fridge, close the fridge door
turn around, walk to face the table opposite of the fridge
put the bowl on the table to the left of the lettuce
Turn right, go until between counter and sink.  Turn left to face counter and sink.
Pick up spoon front the back of the sink, behind the apple.
Turn right, proceed across room, turn left, go to refrigerator.
Open refrigerator, put spoon in bowl on middle shelf.
Pick up bowl and spoon from refrigerator.  Shut refrigerator.
Turn around, proceed to table across room.
Place bowl and spoon on table, below fork, to the left of the lettuce.
Turn around, go forward, turn left at the end of the counter, go forward
Pick up the salt shaker on the counter
Turn around, go forward a bit, turn right and go to the table
Put the salt shaker on the table
Turn right, go to the cupboard on the top
Open the cupboard and pick up the salt shaker in the cupboard, close the cupboard
Turn around, go forward a bit, turn right and go to the table
Put the salt shaker on the table
Turn around and go across the room and then turn right to the counter. 
Pick up the salt shaker from the counter.
Turn left and go to the white table.
Put the salt shaker on the table in front of the bread.
Turn to the right and look up at the cabinet.
Open the cabinet, pick up the salt shaker in the cabinet and then close the cabinet.
Turn left and go to the white table.
Put the salt shaker on the table to the right of the other one.
Turn around then face the sink to your right.
Take the salt from the counter in front of you.
Turn left and face the table in front of you.
Place the salt on the table in front of you.
Turn right and face the cabinet above the brown table in front of you.
Open the cabinet in front of you, take the salt out and close it.
Turn left and face the table and front of you.
Place the salt on the table in front of you.
move to the island in front of the sink
pick up a scoop from the island
move to the end of the counter to the left of the stove
put the scoop in the top drawer
move to the island in front of the sink behind you
pick up a scoop from the island
move to the end of the counter to the left of the stove
put the scoop in the top drawer
Go around the kitchen table between the table and the sink. 
Pick up the brass ladle resting on the phone. 
Go around the table to the counter on the left of the stove.
Place the ladle in the top drawer under the counter.
Turn around to go to the right side of the table.
Pick up the brass ladle in front of the plastic container.
Turn around and face the counter drawer.
Place the ladle behind the first ladle in the drawer. 
Turn left and walk forward, then turn right and walk around to face the opposite end of the table.
Pick up the ladle on the end of the center table.
Walk to the right around the center table and turn left to face the cabinet to the right of the fridge.
Place the ladle in the cabinet to the right of the fridge.
Turn around and step forward to face the ladle on the table.
Pick up the ladle on the table.
Turn around and face the cabinet to the right of the fridge.
Place the ladle beside the first ladle in the cabinet to the right of the sink.
Turn left, walk forward, turn right, walk forward, stand at the end of the counter near the phone.
Pick up the spoon
Turn right, walk forward, turn left, walk forward, stand in front of the drawers at the end of the counter.
Open the top left drawer and put the spoon inside, then close the drawer.
Turn around and face the counter in front of the other spoon.
Pick up the spoon.
Turn around and face the drawers again.
Open the top left drawer again and place the spoon inside.
Turn left and take a few steps, then walk right to the far side kitchen island by the sink.
Pick up the measuring spoon.
Walk to the right of the island and go to the furthest part of the counter.
Put the measuring cup in the top drawer.
Turn around and take a step.
Pick up the measuring cup on the counter.
Turn around and look at the same part of the counter as before.
Put this measuring cup in the same drawer as the other one.
Turn the left, walk straight, turn right, walk to the sink, then turn around to the island counter.
Pick up the gold spoon spoon with blue handle.
Walk right, then turn left and walks to the counter to the left of the stove top.
Put the spoon in the drawer below the counter.
Turn around and face the island counter.
Pick up the gold spoon spoon with blue handle.
Turn around and face the counter to the left of the stove top.
Put the spoon in the drawer below the counter.
Move to the counter right of the stove.
Pick up the tomato from the counter.
Bring the tomato to the fridge.
Chill the tomato in the fridge.
Bring the chilled tomato to the counter left of the stove. 
Put the chilled tomato on the counter left of the stove. 
turn right move towards the table, turn left and locate the gas cooker
pick up the tomato from the table by the gas cooker
turn around and head towards the refrigerator
place the tomato inside the refrigerator for five minutes and then take it out
turn around and head towards the gas cooker
place the tomato on the table by the gas cooker
Turn right, walk across the room to the counter on the right side of the stove
Grab the tomato on the counter
Turn around, walk to the refrigerator
Put the tomato in, close the refrigerator, wait a while, open the refrigerator, take the tomato out, close the refrigerator
Turn around, walk to the stove
Put the tomato down on the counter in front of the toaster
Go left then turn left at the counter and go to the counter on your right.
Pick up the knife from the counter. 
Go to the sink to your left.
Place the knife in the sink closest to you and turn on the water. 
Pick up the knife out of the sink.
Place the knife in the first drawer to your left. 
Turn left, straight towards the black stool, turn left at the counter, go straight to the oven, go to the counter to the right of the oven.
Take the knife from the counter.
Turn left, go straight, turn right at the sink.
Put the knife in the sink. Wash the knife with water. Take the knife from the sink.
Turn to the left.
Put the knife in the drawer on the right closest to the corner under the counter.
Turn around and head to the counter to the right of the oven
Grab the knife that is on the counter
Turn left and head to the sink
Place the knife in the sink and wash it. Grab the knife out of the sink.
Turn to your left and face the drawers.
Open the top drawer on the left of the sink and place the knife inside. Close the drawer.
Turn right, walk to the door, turn right, walk to wooden table.
Pick up the black plate closer to you.
Turn right and right again, walk to the refrigerator.
Put plat in refrigerator, close door, wait a few seconds, take plat out of refrigerator.
Turn left, walk to table, turn right, walk to sink.
Open right hand door of cabinet under refrigerator, place plate in cabinet.
Turn around and walk to the large wooden table
Pick up the octagonal plate from the table
Turn around and walk to the fridge
Put the plate in the fridge then remove it
Turn left and walk to the cabinet on the left side of the kitchen counter
Open the lower right cabinet and put the plate in it
Turn around to the right and walk to the table in the corner of the room.
Pick up the plate that is closest to the edge of the table in beside the mug.
Turn around to the right and walk to the refrigerator with plate in hand.
Open the refrigerator door, place the plate on the shelf, close the refrigerator door. Open the refrigerator door, remove the plate, and close the door.
Turn to the left, walk toward the sink, open the cabinet beneath the sink on the right hand side.
Place the plate into the cabinet and close the door.
move forwards to the near end of the room, but then hang a left and walk to the other side of the room, then a right and walk over to the dining room table there
grab a butter knife off of the dining room table 
turn around and walk to the right side of the kitchen counter space there
place the butter knife inside of a cup inside the cabinet on the bottom right of the kitchen counter space there
pick up the cup out of the kitchen cabinet
turn left and walk to the end of the kitchen counter space on the right, then turn right and walk over to the sink which is on the right side wall to the right
place the cup inside of the right side kitchen sink
Turn around completely and go to the right. 
Pick up the butter knife from the table. 
hen go forward then turn to the left an face the counter
Open the cabinet and put the butter knife inside the bowl in the cabinet. 
Take out the bowl with the knife in it. 
Turn around completely and walk forward turn to the right. Turn to the right again and face the sink. 
Place the bowl and knife in the sink. 
Turn left and go to the table on the right
Pick up the knife by the tomato
Turn around and go to the cabinet on the left by the door
Open the cabinet and put the knife in the cup
Take them out of the cabinet and close the door
Turn around and go around the counter to the sink
Place the knife and the cup in the sink on the right
move forward to the table
pick up the egg from the table
turn around to the oven
cook the egg in the oven and take it out
turn around and head for the table
place the egg on the table
move to the table to the left of the sink
pick up a egg from the table
move to the counter to the left of the sink
heat the egg in the microwave
move to the table to the left of you
put the egg on the table
Turn to the right, and the left to move around the table. Face the table on the left side.
Pick up the potato from the right side of the table. 
Carry the potato and turn to the left and then turn around so the microwave is on the right side.
Open the microwave and place the potato inside. Shut the door and turn it on. Open the microwave and take out the potato, then shut the door.
Carry the potato and turn to the left. Turn right at the far side of the table.
Place the potato on the table, in front of the salt.
turn to the right across the room
pick up the knife from the counter 
turn to the right
slice the potato that is in the counter
turn to the left across the room
face the refrigerator put the knife inside
turn to the right and across the room
pick up a slice of potato
turn all the way around face the microwave 
put the slice of potato inside the microwave get it back out
turn left and across the room face the refrigerator
open the refrigerator door and put the slice of potato inside the refrigerator
Go forward and face the counter to the right of the fridge.
Pick the knife up from the counter.
Move to the right and face the counter.
Slice the potato on the counter.
Cross the room and turn to stand in front of the fridge.
Put the knife in the fridge.
Go to the right and turn left to face the sliced potato on the counter.
Pick up a slice of potato.
Go to the right and face the microwave.
Put the potato in the microwave and cook it and then pick the potato up.
Go left and then turn right to face the fridge.
Put the potato in the fridge and shut the door.
turn right and face the counter top on the left
pick up the knife on the counter
face the potato to the right 
slice the potato on the counter
turn around and walk to the refrigerator on the right
open the door and place the knife on the shelf in front of the apple
go back to the counter top with the sliced potato
pick up a slice of potato on the counter
go to the far wall on your right, and face the microwave on the left
open the microwave door and place the potato inside for a few seconds, then pick up the potato
go back to the refrigerator
open the refrigerator and place the potato to the right of the apple
Turn left and go to the counter
Take the knife which is near the two red tomatoes
Go right, bring the knife to the sink
Rinse the knife in the sink
Turn 180 degrees, take the knife to the microwave
Place the knife next to the fork
Go to the counter left of the sink.
Pick up the knife from the counter. 
Bring the knife to the sink.
Wash the knife in the sink. 
Bring the knife to the table with the microwave. 
Stand the knife on the table. 
Look down and turn around to face the stove. Turn to your right to face the mat next to the sink. 
Raise up and take the knife from the mat.
Turn to your right and walk turning left when at the sink.
Place the knife in the sink and turn on the water. Turn off the water and pick up the knife.
Turn to the right and walk towards the wall. Turn to the right facing the microwave and walk to it.
Place the knife with the handle up in the air next to the fork.
Turn right and walk towards the wall, then turn right and walk up to the counter to the left of the sink.
Pick up the glass off of the counter.
Turn right and walk forward, then turn left to face the sink and look up at the microwave.
Put the microwave in the glass and heat it up for a couple seconds, then take it out.
Turn right and walk towards the wall, then turn right and walk up to the fridge.
Put the heated glass into the fridge on the bottom shelf.
Turn right and walk to the sink on the right. 
Pick up the glass that's behind the spoon. 
Move to the right side of the sink and look up at the microwave. 
Open the microwave door, place the glass inside of the microwave, close the door, heat up the glass, open the door, remove the glass, close the door. 
Turn around and walk to the fridge. 
Open the fridge door and place the glass on the left side of the second shelf. 
Turn right and veer right to the sink.
Pick up the glass to the left of the sink.
Take a step right.
Heat the glass in the microwave.
Turn around and veer left to the fridge.
Place the glass on the second to bottom shelf of the fridge.
Go to the white table on the left. 
Pick up the yellow knife on the right side of the table.
Turn around and go to the front of the sink.
Slice the potato inside the sink. 
Place the knife in the sink.
Pick up one slice of the potato. 
Turn left and go to the microwave on in the right corner. 
Heat the potato slice next to the coffee mug in the microwave and take the potato slice out.
Turn around and go to the small black table in the corner. 
Place the potato slice on the table on the right side towards the front. 
turn to the left towards the white table
pick up the knife from the white table
turn around to the right go forward turn to the left towards the sink
slice a potato that is inside the sink
pick up a slice of potato that is in the sink 
turn to the left 
go forward turn to the left go right turn left towards the microwave
put the slice the potato inside the microwave heat it up get it back out 
turn around left go left turn right towards the black table
put the slice of potato on top of the black table
Go to the white table
Pick up the knife
Go to the sink
Cut the potato in the sink
Put the knife in the sink
Pick up a potato slice
Go to the microwave
Heat the potato slice
Go to the small black table
Put the potato down on the black table
Walk to the sink on the left and head right to the counter with the microwave.
Pick up the red apple to the left of the microwave.
Turn right and face the microwave on the left.
Put the apple inside the microwave, heat it, remove it and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the sink on the right.
Put the heated apple inside the left side of the sink.
Go left and then right to face the counter to the left of the microwave.
Pick the apple up from the counter.
Move to the right and face the microwave.
Put the apple in the microwave and shut the door and then open the door and take the apple out again.
Turn and face the sink to the left.
Put the apple in the sink on the left side.
Walk ahead and veer left to the counter to the left of the microwave.
Pick up the red apple on the counter.
Take a step right.
Heat the apple in the microwave.
Turn left and walk to the sink.
Place the apple in the left basin of the sink.
Turn left and hang a right at the door to reach the small black table.
Pick up the knife with the yellow handle near the plate on the table.
Put the knife with the yellow handle on the plate on the table.
Pick up the plate with the knife from the table.
Turn around, take a left at the door and walk to the white table on the left.
Put the plate with the knife behind the loaf of bread on the right side of the table.
Take a step forward then turn left and walk to the wall then turn right and walk to the small black table.
Pick up the yellow handled knife that's in front of you.
Stick the knife in the plate in front of you point first so it stands up.
pick up the plate with the knife stabbed into it.
Turn right and take a step to your right then take a step forward then turn left to face the table.
Put the plate above the loaf on the right.
Go to the left then straight to face the black shelf in the corner.
Pick the yellow knife up from off of the shelf.
Place the knife on the square plate.
Pick the square plate up from off of the black shelf.
Move to the right to face the white table.
Place the knife on the plate behind the box on the right.
Turn to the left and walk to the counter.
Pick up the knife off of the counter.
Walk over to the sink.
Slice the potato in the sink.
Walk over to the microwave with the knife.
Place the knife in the microwave.
Walk back over to the potato in the sink.
Pick up a slice of potato.
Walk over to the microwave.
Cook the potato slice in the microwave.
Walk over to the fridge with the potato slice.
Place the potato slice in the fridge.
Turn right and head to the dishwasher.
Pick up the knife on the counter above the dishwasher.
Turn right and go to the sink.
Cut the potato in the sink.
Turn right and go to the microwave.
Put the knife in the microwave.
Turn around and go back to the sink.
Pick up a slice of potato from the sink.
Turn right and go back to the microwave.
Cook the slice of potato in the microwave and pick it back up.
Turn right and to the fridge.
Put the slice of potato in the middle of the top shelf in the fridge.
turn left to the counter
pick up the knife from the counter
turn left, turn right to the sink
cut potato with the knife
turn right, walk straight to the microwave 
open door, place knife on shelf, close door
turn around, turn right to the sink
pick up potato from the sink
turn right to the microwave
open door, place potato on shelf, close door, cook, open door, remove potato, close door
turn right, turn left to the fridge
open door, put potato on shelf, close door
Walk past the toaster on your left.
Pick up the knife next to the toaster on the counter.
Turn around and walk towards a white rectangular table.
Slice the bread on the table into several pieces.
Turn left and walk towards the fridge.
Place the knife on the top shelf in the fridge and close it.
Turn right and walk back to the table to your left.
Pick up a slice of bread from the table.
Turn left and walk towards the microwave to your right.
Place the slice of bread in the microwave, heat it up, and take it back out.
Head towards the fridge to your right.
Place the bread behind the knife in the fridge.
Walk towards the oven, then turn left and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the large metal knife with a golden handle off of the counter.
Turn around and take a step forward, then turn right and begin walking across the room, hang a left and walk up to the large white table.
Slice up the loaf of bread on the large white table.
Turn left and walk over to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the large metal knife inside on the top shelf.
Turn right and walk towards the door, then turn left to face the large white table.
Pick up a piece of sliced bread off of the large white table.
Turn left and walk over to the counter, then turn right to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door and put the piece of sliced bread inside, then close the door and turn on the microwave, after a couple seconds open the microwave and take out the piece of sliced bread, then close the door.
Turn right and walk towards the door, then turn left to face the fridge.
Open the door of the fridge and put the heated piece of sliced bread inside on the top shelf, then close the door.
Go forward and then turn to the left at the counter where the lettuce and tomato is. 
Pick up the big knife that is on the counter. 
Turn around and go to the white table on the other side of the room that has bread and lettuce on it. 
Use the knife to cut the bread into slices. 
Turn to the left and go to the fridge. 
Open the fridge, put the knife inside, and close the fridge. 
Turn to the right and go back to the white table with the bread on it. 
Pick up a slice of the bread. 
Turn to the left and go to the microwave that is on the other side of the fridge. 
Open the microwave and put the bread inside, close the microwave and turn it on to cook the bread, open the microwave, remove the bread, and close the microwave door. 
Turn to the right and go back to the fridge. 
Open the fridge, place the bread inside, and close the fridge. 
Go to the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter. 
Turn around and go to the table by the door. 
Cut the bread on the table with the knife. 
Turn left and go to the refrigerator.
Put the knife in the refrigerator. 
Turn right and go to the table by the door. 
Pick up a slice of bread from the table. 
Turn left and go to the microwave.
Cook the slice of bread in the microwave.
Turn right and go to the refrigerator. 
Put the slice of bread in the refrigerator. 
Face the counter at the left
pick up the knife at the back of lettuce.
Head to the table at the left.
slice the bread at the table.
Turn left to face the refrigerator. 
open the door and put the knife inside. 
Head back to the table at the right.
Pick up a piece of a slice of the bread. 
Head at the counter at the left and face the microwave.
Open the microwave to heat it for few seconds. Open the door and pick it up. 
Turn right to face the refrigerator.
Open it and put the slice bread inside. Close the door.
Walk straight to the kitchen
Turn to the left
Walk to the counter
Grab the knife that is on the counter
Carry the knife to the kitchen island
Use the knife to slice the bread
Carry the knife to the fridge
Stick the knife in the fridge
Walk back to the kitchen island
Grab a slice of bread
Grab the sliced bread and carry it to the microwave
Put the slice bread in, take it out and carry it to the fridge
Move towards the counter area between the sink and the range.
Open the cabinet door to the right of the sink, pick up the glass, then close the cabinet door.
Turn around and move towards the fridge then turn right and move to the dishwasher to the right of the silver trash bin.
Open the microwave above the dishwasher, place the glass on the right side of the blue plate, microwave the glass to warm it, then open the microwave door, pick up the glass, then close the microwave door.
Move to the sink to the right of the red coffee maker.
Place the glass in the sink, on top of the drain.
Turn right and walk across the room to face the counter to the right of the sink.
Pick up the cup in the cabinet under the ladle.
Turn to the left and walk forward to face the microwave above the stove.
Heat the cup in the microwave and remove it.
Turn to the right and walk over to face the sink.
Place the cup in the right side of the sink.
Head to the cabinet under the sink. 
Open up the left cabinet under the spoon on the counter and pick up the cup in there. 
Turn around, bring the cup to the microwave on the right. 
Heat the cup in the microwave.
Bring the heated cup to the sink on the left.
Put the heated cup in the sink. 
Turn around and go to the small white table on the other side.
Pick up the yellow knife behind the salt shaker from the table.
Turn left and go to the table with the microwave on top on the other side. 
Cut the potato inside the microwave.
Place the knife inside the microwave.
Take one slice of the potato. 
Turn around and go to the front of the refrigerator. 
Chill the potato slice next to the lettuce and take it out. 
Turn around to go back to the microwave.
Place the potato slice next to the knife and the potato.
Turn around and walk to the white table with the wooden chair. 
Pick up the knife that's behind the salt shaker. 
Walk to the microwave on the left. 
Open the microwave door. 
Slice the potato that's in the microwave, put the knife down in the microwave. 
Take a piece of potato out of the microwave, close the microwave door. 
Turn around and walk to the fridge on the right. 
Put the piece of potato in the fridge to the right of the lettuce, close the door, take the piece of potato out of the fridge, close the door. 
Walk back over to the microwave. 
Put the piece of potato inside the microwave and shut the door. 
Turn around and go to the small table just to the right
Pick up the knife from behind the salt shaker
Move to the microwave to the left of the table
Open the microwave and cut the potato in the microwave
Put the knife in the microwave
Take a slice of potato and then close the microwave
Turn to the left and go to the fridge
Open the fridge and put the the slice in the fridge, close the fridge, wait, open the fridge and remove the potato slice, close the fridge
Turn around and move to the microwave to the left
Open the microwave, put the slice inside behind the knife and close the microwave
Turn right and go to the sink
Grab the knife out of the sink
Turn right and go to the counter to the left of the oven
Cut the apple on the counter into slices
Move slightly to the left
Put the knife on the counter
Move slightly to the right
Grab a slice of apple off the counter
Turn left and go to the sink
Wash the apple slice in the sink and then take it out
Turn right and go to the trash can
Put the apple slice in the trash can
Turn right and go to the sink.
Pick up the knife in the sink.
Turn right and go to the counter to the left of the stove.
Cut the apple on the counter.
Go back to the sink.
Put the knife on the bowl to the right of the sink.
Go back to the stove.
Take a slice of apple on the counter.
Turn around and head back to the sink.
Put the apple in the sink, rinse it and pick it back up.
Turn right, go across the room and turn right toward to the trash can.
Put the slice of apple in the trash can.
cross the kitchen turning left at the sink
Pick up the knife out of the sink
turn left and walk down the counter turning left again at the apple on the counter
slice the apple on the counter and turn left 
go back down the counter stopping at the sink on the right
place the knife on the bowl beside the sink 
turn right and go back down the counter turning right looking at the apple
pick up a piece of apple
turn around and cross the room down to the sink on the left 
place the apple in the sink beside the spatula, turn the water on and fill up the sink and turn off the water draining the sink. Pick the apple slice back up and turn right.
cross the kitchen turning to the left to the waste basket
throw the apple piece in the trash
Move forward toward the kitchen island, then turn right and go toward the stove, then go to the counter to the left of the stove.
Pick up the cup from the counter.
Turn around and move forward, then turn left to go to the sink.
Fill the cup with water in the sink.
Turn around and go forward to the wall, then turn left and go straight to the microwave.
Put the cup in the microwave.
Turn right and walk to the counter to the left of the stove, 
Pick up the mug to the right of the knife. 
Walk to think sink on the right. 
Put the mug in the sink, fill the mug with water, pick up the mug. 
Turn around and walk over to the microwave. 
Put the mug inside of the microwave. 
Hang a right at the counter, turn left at the stove and turn right to face the small counter to the left of the stove.
Pick up the black glass to the left of the stove on the counter.
Turn around, hang a left at the counter and walk to the sink on the left near the window.
Put the glass inside the sink on the right side, fill it with water and pick it back up.
Turn around, head left at the wall and walk to the microwave on the counter.
Put the glass with water inside the microwave and close the door.
Turn right and step forward to face the sink.
Pick up the knife on the sink.
Turn around and cross the room and turn left to face the table.
Cut the apple on the table into three pieces.
Turn around to face the fridge.
Place the knife in the fridge.
Turn around to face the apple on the table.
Pick up the piece of apple on the table.
Turn left and cross the room to face the microwave.
Heat the piece of apple in the microwave and remove it.
Turn left to face the fridge.
Place the apple piece in the fridge.
Turn left and go to the sink
Pick up the knife in front of the sink
Turn around, go forward, turn left to the table
Cut the apple on the table
Turn left, go forward, turn right at the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Turn left, go forward, turn left to the table
Pick up an apple piece from the table 
Turn left and go to the microwave
Put the apple piece in the microwave, start the microwave, wait, pick up the apple piece from the microwave
Turn around, go forward, turn right at the fridge
Put the apple piece into the fridge
Turn to your right and go to the sink across from you. 
Pick up the knife, on the counter, in front of the sink, on the left. 
Turn around and go across the kitchen to the right side of the white table. 
Cut the apple by the coffee maker, on the table, into slices. 
Turn to your left and go to the refrigerator, just ahead, to your left. 
Place the knife on the middle, front of the third shelf, in  the refrigerator. 
Turn to your left and go back to the table with the sliced apple on it. 
Pick up one of the apple slices from the back of the table. 
Turn to your left and go to the microwave, above the sink, across the room. 
Place the apple slice in the microwave, heat it up, then remove the apple slice from the microwave. 
Turn around and walk across the kitchen, then turn to the refrigerator on your right. 
Place the apple slice on the second shelf of the refrigerator, to the left of the lettuce. 
Turn around so that you are facing the right side of the stove top
Pick up the kettle from the stove top
Walk right and then turn left to face the sink
Put the kettle in the sink and run the faucet for a few seconds, then pick up the kettle
Take a step to your right and turn to face the coffee maker
Set the kettle down on the kitchen counter
Turn around and walk to the stove.
Grab the kettle from the stove.
Turn to your right and walk to the sink.
place the kettle in the sink and turn the faucet on and off before removing the kettle.
Move to the coffee maker on your right.
Place the kettle on the counter near the coffee maker.
Turn around and go to the oven
Grab the tea kettle from the top right stove
Turn right and stop at the sink
Wash the kettle and then take it out
Turn right and stop at the coffee maker
Put the kettle to the left of the coffee maker
Turn around and walk to the stove to your right.
Grab the tomato to the far left side of the counter to the left of the stove.
Turn around and take the tomato to the fridge to your left.
Place the tomato in the fridge, chill it and then remove it.
Turn left and walk straight to the sink to your right.
Place the cool tomato in the sink.
Turn around, move forward a few steps and then turn right to cross the room to stand at the counter just left of the stove.
Pick up the tomato from the counter.
Turn around and carry the tomato the fridge.
Place the tomato in the fridge on the third shelf on the right, close the door, and then remove it after a few seconds.
Turn left and carry the tomato to the sink.
Place the tomato in the sink.
Turn around and move forward, then turn right to go towards the stove.
Pick up the tomato on the counter, to the left of the stove.
Turn around and go forward, then turn left to go to the fridge.
Open the fridge, put the tomato inside to chill it, then take the tomato out.
Turn left and go towards the microwave, then turn right to face the sink.
Put the tomato in the sink.
Take two steps forward then turn right and walk to the left side of the stove.
Pick up the pan on the front left burner.
Turn right and walk to the fridge then turn left when you get to it to face it.
Chill the pan  in the fridge then get it back out and close the door.
Turn around and take a step then turn right and walk until you're about three feet from the sink so you can use the cupboard under it.
Put the pan in the cupboard below the right side of the sink then close the door.
Head towards the sink and walk to the white stove on the right.
Pick up the black pan from the front left corner of the stove.
Turn right and walk to the black fridge on the left.
Put the black pan inside the fridge on the middle shelf, chill it for seven seconds, remove it and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the sink across the room on the right.
Open the lower right cabinet under the sink, put the chilled pan inside and close the door.
Turn right to face stove.
Pick up pot from left lower burner of stove.
Turn right, proceed to refrigerator on left.  Turn left to face refrigerator.
Open refrigerator, place pot on second shelf down, close door.  Wait four seconds.  Open refrigerator, get out pot, close door.
Turn left, go ahead to sink.
Open right cabinet under sink.  Place pot in cabinet, close door.
Take a step to the right, and turn right to find the sink.
Pick up the cup from inside the sink.
Carry the cup and turn around and then left to find the microwave.
Open the microwave and place the cup inside. Shut the door. Open the door, take out the cup and then shut the door.
Carry the cup and turn to the left, then left again and locate the coffee machine on the right.
Place the cup on the coffee machine.
Take a big step to your right and then walk forward until you're even with the sink on your right and when you are turn right and walk to it.
Pick up the mug that's in front of you in the center of the sink.
Turn around and walk to the table then turn left and walk until you're two feet from the garbage then take a step to you right and then walk to the microwave.
Warm the mug in the microwave then take it back out and close the door.
Walk back to the sink and then take a step to your right to stand in front of the coffee maker.
Put the mug under the coffee maker's spout.
Turn right then head to the sink on your right
Pick up the mug in the sink
Turn around to the right walk forward then head to the microwave
Open the microwave heat the mug then take it out and close the microwave
Turn left then heat to the coffee maker on your right
Put the mug on the coffee maker
Turn right and go to the table. 
Pick up the gray bowl on the back of the table. 
Go left and bring the bowl to the fridge. 
Put the bowl in the fridge. 
Take the egg out of the fridge.
Put the egg in the bowl in the fridge. 
Turn to the right and stand in front of the white table.
Pick the pan up from the table.
Go left and stand in front of the fridge.
Put the pan in the fridge.
Take the egg off the shelf in the fridge.
Put the egg in the pan.
Turn to the right and go to the table.
Pick up the pan from the table.
Go to the fridge on your left.
Put the pan in the fridge.
Pick up an egg from the fridge.
Put the egg in the pan.
Turn right and walk to the sink in the kitchen.
Pick up the mug in the center of the sink.
Turn around and walk to the fridge so you are standing facing it.
Chill the mug in the fridge then take it back out and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the coffee maker to the left of the sink and stand in front of it facing it.
Place the mug under the coffee makers spout.
Turn right, then left, then go to the sink near the coffee maker.
Pick up the mug that is in the sink next to the bowl.
Turn around and go right to the fridge.
Chill the mug in the fridge.
Turn around and go left to the coffee maker.
Place the mug at the coffee maker.
Turn right and walk to the sink against the back wall.
Pick up the white mug that is in front of the bowl.
Turn to the right and walk to the fridge.
Place the mug on the middle shelf of the fridge and leave it in there for four seconds before taking it back out.
Turn right and walk to the coffee maker between the toaster and the sink.
Place the mug on the coffee maker below the nozzle.
Turn around and walk to the counter to the right of the dishwasher.
Pick up the egg from the counter.
Turn around and walk to the fridge.
Place the egg in the fridge.
Turn right, walk toward the refrigerator, then turn right and walk to the egg on the counter top.
Pick up the egg from the counter top.
Turn right and walk to the refrigerator.
Put the egg in the refrigerator, in front of and to the right of the plate on the right, then close the refrigerator.
Go right, and then right again and turn to face the counter with the egg on it.
Pick the egg up from the counter.
Turn around and go left to face the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the egg on the shelf and shut the door.
Turn around and walk back all the way till you get to the counter and then turn right.
Pick up the egg.
Turn around and head towards the fridge.
Open the fridge door, put the egg inside, and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the closest corner where the counter bends. Look on the right hand counter.
Pick the egg up off the counter.
Turn around and walk to the fridge.
Put the egg in the fridge.
Turn right and make your way to the dishwasher so you face it and then turn to your right.
Pick the egg up off of the counter.
Walk to the refrigerator and face it.
Open the fridge and place the egg on the top shelf before closing the door.
Turn right, then left then right and go towards the fridge, then turn left and go to the sink
Pick up the mug from the counter
Turn right and go to the microwave
Heat the mug in the microwave with the fruit then take the mug out of the microwave
Lift the mug up high towards the cupboard above the microwave
Put the mug in the cupboard next to the bowl
Take a step to your right so you can walk past the counter and walk forward to the counter then turn right and walk to the sink turning left to face it when you get to it. 
Pick up the mug that's in front of you.
Turn right to face the microwave.
Warm the mug in the microwave then take it back out and close the door.
Look up at the cabinet above the microwave.and turn to face it when you get there.
Open the big cupboards to the left of the little cupboards over the sink and put the mug in there then close the door.
Cross the room to the left and stand in front of the sink.
Pick the white mug up from the sink.
Turn to the right and face the microwave.
Put the mug in the microwave and shut the door and then open the door and grab the mug and shut the door again.
Look up and face the large cabinet above the microwave.
Put the mug in the cabinet above the microwave with a silver bowl.
Turn left and walk a few steps then turn left and walk until you are past the angled part of the counter to your left then turn left and walk until you hit the counter then turn left.
Pick up the ice cream scoop off of the counter.
Turn and walk over to the stove so you are facing it on the right side.
Place the scoop in the frying pan on the top right burner.
Pick up the frying pan with the ice cream scoop in it.
adjust yourself so you are facing the cabinets to the left of the oven.
Open the cabinet farthest to the right and place the frying pan with the scoop in the cabinet before closing it.
turn around and walk to the left side of the kitchen counter.
grab the spoon on the counter.
turn around and walk to the stove
place the spoon in the sauce pan
pick up the sauce pan
turn to face the left side of the lower kitchen cabinets
put the sauce pan in the far right lower cabinet
Turn around, go to the opposite side of the counter that sticks out on the left.
Pick up the spoon from the counter.
Turn around, go to the stove top.
Put the spoon on the blue pan on the right back of the stove top.
Take the pan from the stove top.
Turn left to the counter.
Put the pan in the bottom right cabinet closest to the oven.
Turn right towards the white table
Pick up the knife next to the spoon
Turn to the right and walk across the room and turn right moving forward towards the sink
Slice potato in sink
Put down knife by sticking in first slice of potato
Pick up a slice of a potato
Turn right move forward across the room and turn left facing the fridge
Open up fridge and place potato slice inside for 3 seconds to cool off.
Take out potato slice and turn left. Move forward and turn right towards red microwave.
Open microwave and place potato slice inside with apple remaining inside.
Turn right and walk to the white table in front of you.
Pick up the knife that is lying on the table.
Turn around and walk to the sink on the other side of the room.
Cut the potato that is inside the right side of the sink.
Leave the knife stuck vertically in the potato.
Pick up a slice of the potato.
Turn right and head to the refrigerator at the end of the room.
Place the potato on the blue plate in the refrigerator and leave it in there for four seconds before taking it out.
Turn left and walk to the microwave that is between the refrigerator and the sink.
Place the potato slice up against the apple in the microwave.
Turn right and go to the table.
Pick up the knife on the table.
Turn right and go to the sink.
Put the knife in to the potato that is in the sink.
Slice the potato that is in the sink.
Pick up a potato slice that is in the sink.
Go to the right and go to the fridge. Open the fridge door.
Put the potato slice to the left of the tomato. Close the fridge door.  Open the fridge door and grab the potato slice that is next to the tomato.  Close the door
Turn left and go to the microwave.  Open the microwave door.
Put the potato slice in front of the apple.  Close the microwave door.
Turn right and go to the sink.
Pick up the apple to the left of the sink.
Turn around and go to the microwave.
Heat the apple in the microwave and take it out.
Move slightly to your left.
Put the apple on the table in front of the microwave.
Move to the sink the right of the stove
Pick up a apple from the sink
Move to the microwave to the right of the fridge
Heat the apple in the microwave then retrieve it and close the door
Move closer to the fridge to the left
Place the apple on the counter in front of the microwave
turn right, walk to the sink
grab the apple by the sink
turn right, walk to the microwave
open the microwave, put the apple in, heat the apple, take the apple out
walk to the left a little
put the apple on the table in front of the microwave
Turn left and begin walking across the room, then turn left and walk over to the short red trash can.
Pick up the glass bottle out of the short red trash can.
Turn around and walk over to the fridge.
Open the door to the lower compartment of the fridge, place the glass bottle in the lower compartment of the fridge then close the door, after a few seconds open the lower compartment back up and remove the glass bottle.
Turn left and walk over to the kitchen counter.
Place the chilled glass bottle onto the kitchen counter to the right of the sink.
Turn left and go to the red trash can.
Take the bottle from the trash can.
Turn around and go to the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator, put the bottle in the top refrigerator shelf, close the refrigerator. Open the refrigerator, take the bottle from the refrigerator.
Turn left, go to the dishwasher.
Put the bottle on the counter above the dishwasher.
Turn left and hang left to go to the red trash can.
Pick up the bottle out of the trash can.
Turn right and walk to the fridge.
Place the bottle in the fridge, close the door, wait a moment, and take out the bottle again.
Turn left and walk to the counter.
Put the bottle on the counter to the right of the sink.
Turn left and walk to the white table then take two steps to your right so you're facing the bread on the table.
Pick up the head of lettuce that's in front of you behind the bread.
Turn right and step right to face the sink.
Wash the head of lettuce in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Turn left and step to your left then walk forward.
Put the lettuce to the right of the white cup please.
Turn left, walking forward across the room towards the white table.
Pick up the head of lettuce from the table.
Make a right and walk towards the sink.
Rinse the head of lettuce in the sink, removing it afterwards.
Turn left, heading back to the white table.
Set the head of lettuce down on the white table next to the bottle of lotion.
Walk towards the door, then turn left and walk over to the white table on the far side of the room.
Pick up the head of lettuce off of the white table.
Turn around and walk over to the kitchen sink.
Put the head of lettuce in the sink and turn on the water, after a couple seconds turn the water off and remove the now clean head of lettuce.
Turn around and walk forward, then turn right and walk up to the white table.
Put the clean head of lettuce on the white table.
Turn to the left and go straight to face the round kitchen table.
Pick up the knife from off of the table.
Continue to face the white round kitchen table.
Slice the bread on the table.
Turn around, go straight then turn left to face the waste basket at the end of the counter.
Place the knife in the waste basket.
Move to the left and go straight to face the white round kitchen table.
Pick up a slice of the bread.
Turn around, go straight then slightly left to face the microwave above the stove top.
Open the microwave, place the bread inside, close the microwave, wait a second, open the microwave, pick up the bread, and close the microwave.
Turn around and go straight then hang a left to face the small waste basket in the corner.
Place the bread slice in the waste basket.
Back up, turn to the left and walk to the table in the corner of the room. 
Pick up the knife from the edge of the table. 
Walk forward and closer to the table. 
Slice the bread that is at the back, left side of the table. 
Turn to the right and walk to the trash can. 
Place the knife into the trash bin. 
Turn to the left and walk back to the table. 
Grab two slices of bread that you had cut prior. 
Turn to the right and walk over to the stove. 
Open the microwave door above the stove, place the bread inside, close the door, warm the bread, remove the bread 
Close the microwave door, turn right and walk over to the trash bin. 
Toss the bread into the trash bin. 
Turn left, walk to the table
Pick up the knife with your hand
Turn towards the bread on the table
Slice the bread that's on the table
Turn around, walk to the trash bin
Throw the knife away in the trash bin
Walk back to the table on your left.
Pick up a slice of the bread from the table
Turn to the right, walk to the microwave
Open the door, place the bread in the microwave and warm. Open the door, remove the bread.
Turn around, walk back to the trash bin on the left
Throw the bread away in the trash bin
Turn left and face the table in front of you.
Take the knife off of the table in front of you.
Turn left then face the microwave above the stove in front of you.
Slice the apple inside the microwave and close it.
Face the microwave in front of you.
Place the knife inside of the microwave and close it.
Face the microwave in front of you.
Take the apple slice out of the microwave in front of you.
Turn around and face the sink on your right.
Wash the apple in the sink in front of you and take it out.
Turn left and face the fridge on your right.
Place the apple slice in the fridge in front of you and close it.
Turn left to face the center table.
Pick up the knife on the center table.
Turn left and cross the room to face the microwave.
Cut the apple in the microwave into three pieces.
Look up to face the microwave.
Place the knife in the microwave.
Look up to face the microwave.
Pick up an apple piece in the microwave.
Turn left and step forward to face the sink.
Wash the apple piece in the sink and remove it.
Take a step to the left to face the fridge.
Place the piece of apple in the fridge.
Go to the left side of the island behind you.
Pick up the knife to the right of the lettuce.
Go to the microwave above the stove.
Slice the apple in the microwave.
Look at the stove and then back to the microwave.
Put the knife in the microwave.
Look at the stove and then back to the microwave.
Pick up a slice of apple in the microwave.
Go to the sink.
Rinse the apple in the sink.
Go to the fridge.
Put the washed apple slice in the fridge.
Turn and go to the counter by the microwave.
Pick up a butter knife on the counter.
Go to the counter next to the toaster.
Slice the bread on the counter.
Go across the room to the fridge.
Put the knife in the fridge.
Go back to the counter with the toaster on it.
Pick up a slice of bread.
Go across the room to the fridge.
Put the bread in the fridge to cool it off.
Go to the trash bin at the end of the counter.
Put the cold bread in the trash bin.
Turn left, then right and face the white counter in front of you.
Take the knife off the counter in front of you.
Turn right and face the counter with the bread on the left.
Slice the bread on the counter in front of you.
Turn around and face the fridge in front of you.
Open the fridge, place the knife inside and close it.
Turn around and face the white counter in front of you with the bread on top.
Take a slice of bread off the counter in front of you.
Turn around and face the fridge in front of you.
Place the bread slice in the fridge in front of you and take it out.
Turn around and face the white trash can in the left corner.
Place the slice of bread in the white trash can in front of you.
Turn and go to the kitchen counter that is to the left of the stove.
Pick up the knife that is to the left of the egg on the counter.
With the knife in hand turn and go to the toaster that is on the counter to the right of the stove.
With the knife slice the bread that is to the right of the toaster.
With the knife in hand go to the fridge.
Open the fridge and place the knife on the top shelf.  Shut the fridge.
Turn around and go the the counter where the toaster is.
Pick up a piece of sliced bread from the middle of the loaf.
With the piece of sliced bread in hand turn and go back to the fridge.
Open fridge with the bread in your other hand.  Place bread on top of the knife that is on top shelf. Close fridge.  Open fridge and grab the bread that is on the top shelf on the knife.
With the slice of bread in hand turn and go to the trash can that is to the left of the counter.
Place the slice of bread in the trash.
Move forward to face the green counter.
Pick the fork up from the counter.
Go left and then right and then turn to the left to face the sink.
Put the fork in the sink and turn the water on and then turn it off and pick the fork up.
Turn to the right while standing in front of the sink.
Put the fork down on the counter to the right of the sink.
Walk to the green table ahead.
Pick up the silver fork to the right side of the table.
Turn left, hang a right at the fridge and walk to the sink on the left.
Put the fork in the sink, rinse it for a few seconds and pick it back up.
Turn right to face the white stove.
Put the rinsed fork in front of the coffee maker on the counter to the left.
Step back from the kitchen island in front of you. 
Pick up the fork to the right of the pencil, on the island. 
Turn to our left and go past the island then turn to your right, go past the refrigerator, to the sink on your left. 
Place the fork in the sink, turn the water on, rinse the fork off, turn the water off, and remove the fork from the sink. 
Turn to the counter top above the dishwasher, to your right. 
Place the fork on the counter top to the right of the sink.
Turn around, move to the sink.
Pick up the sponge in the sink.
Turn around, bring the sponge to the stove on the right.
Put the sponge in the pot on the stove. 
Pick up the pot on the stove. 
Turn around, bring the pot to the table on the right, to the left side of the table.
Put the pot with sponge on the table.
turn around to face sink
pick up sponge from sink
turn left, walk to face stove
put sponge into pot on back right burner on stove
pick up pot from stove
turn around to walk to face left side of white table
put pot on table
Turn and go to the sink.
Pick up a sponge in the sink.
Turn and go to the stove.
Put the sponge in the pot on the stove.
Pick up the pot on the stove. 
Turn and go to the table.
Put the pot on the table. 
Walk straight to the sink.
Pick up the knife from the sink.
Turn right and face the counter.
Slice the tomato on the counter.
Move right and face the microwave.
Place the knife in the microwave.
Walk back to the tomato.
Grab a slice of the tomato.
Walk back to the microwave.
Heat the tomato slice in the microwave.
Turn around and walk to the green trashcan on the other side of the room.
Place the slice in the trashcan.
turn right, turn left, walk straight to the sink
pick up knife from the counter
turn right to the counter
cut tomato with the knife
turn right, turn left to the microwave
open door, put knife on shelf, close door
turn left, turn right to the counter
pick tomato off of the counter
turn right, turn left to the microwave
open door, place tomato on shelf, close door, cook, open door, remove tomato, close door
turn right, turn right, walk straight to the trash can
place tomato in the trash can
Go ahead to the sink.
Pick up the knife on the counter in front of the sink.
Turn right and go to the microwave.
Cut the tomato on the counter.
Turn and go close to the microwave.
Put the knife in the microwave.
Turn left and go back to the tomato.
Pick up a slice of tomato.
Go back to the microwave.
Cook the tomato in the microwave and pick it back up.
Turn right, go to the wall, turn right and go to the green trash can.
Put the slice of tomato in the trash can.
Walk forward and turn left to face the end of the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn around and walk across the room to face the kitchen table.
Cut the loaf of bread on the table into slices.
Place the knife on the kitchen table.
Pick up the bread slice on the kitchen table.
Turn around and walk across the room, then turn left and walk forward to face the fridge.
Cool the bread slice in the fridge and then remove it.
Turn around and walk across the room, then turn right and look up to face the microwave.
Place the slice of bread in the microwave.
Walk toward the white door and turn left to face side of the counter with the knife on it.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn to your left, cross the room, walk to the white table.
Stand at the side of the table where there is a cup and a wine bottle.
Slice the loaf of bread at the center of the table.
Place the knife on the table parallel to the loaf of bread and in front of the wine bottle nearest the cup, pick up a center slice of bread.
Turn to your left and walk toward the white door, hang a right to the fridge.
Open the fridge door, place the bread slice on the rack in the fridge, close the fridge door; after cooling open the fridge door, pick up the slice of bread, close the fridge door.
Turn to your left and walk to the front of the stove, look up to the microwave above the stove.
Open the microwave door place the slice of bread in the microwave, close the microwave door.
Walk over to the door, then turn left and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the large metal knife off of the counter.
Turn left and walk across the room, then turn right and walk over the round white table.
Slice up the loaf of bread that is closest to the tomato on the table.
Put the large metal knife down on the table in front of the wine bottle.
Pick up a piece of sliced bread.
Turn left and walk forward, then turn left and walk over to the fridge.
Open the fridge door and put the piece of sliced bread inside then close the fridge door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and remove the piece of sliced bread, then close the fridge door.
Turn around and walk over to the counter, then turn right and walk up to the oven and look up at the microwave.
Open the microwave and put the chilled piece of sliced bread in the microwave then close the microwave door.
Turn right and walk forward, then hang a right and walk over to the wooden table.
Pick up the butter knife off of the wooden table.
Turn right and walk over to the sink.
Put the knife in the sink and turn on the water, after a couple seconds turn off the sink and take out the now clean butter knife.
Turn around and walk back over to the wooden table.
Put the clean butter knife standing up on the wooden table in front of the closest bowl.
Turn right, go forward a bit, turn right and go to the table
Pick up the knife on the table
Turn right and go to the sink
Put the knife in the sink, open the water, wait, pick up the knife 
Turn around, go to the table, turn right
Put the knife in the bowl on the table
Walk to the dining table behind you.
Grab the knife above the lettuce.
Walk to the kitchen sink to your right.
Put the knife in the sink, rinse the knife, then grab the knife.
Move back to the dining table.
Stand the knife in front of a bowl.
Turn left and look at the table.
Pick up the butter knife.
Turn right and walk to the microwave and look at it.
Open the top left cabinet above the microwave and put the knife in the black mug.
Take the mug out of the cabinet.
Turn around and walk to the right side of the table.
Place the mug on the table to the right of the sponge.
Turn left to face the green table.
Pick up the small butter knife from the table.
Turn right towards the microwave.
Open the cabinet directly above the microwave and  place the knife in the cup.
Take the cup out of the cabinet.
Turn around and walk towards the green table.
Place the cup with the knife to the right of the sponge on the table.
Turn to the kitchen island on your left. 
Pick up the butter knife, on the kitchen island, by the spatula. 
Turn to your right and walk to the stove and microwave to your right. 
Place the knife in the black coffee cup that is in the top, left cabinet, above the microwave.
Remove the black coffee cup with a butter knife inside it, from the left cabinet above the microwave. 
Turn around and walk straight, until you reach the center of the kitchen island, then turn to your left. 
Place the black coffee cup, with a knife inside it, on the kitchen island, to the right of the green and yellow sponge. 
Turn to the left and face the green table.
Pick the butter knife up from behind the cup.
Bring the butter knife over to the stove and look up at the cabinet.
Put the butter knife in the black mug in the cabinet.
Pick up the black mug with the butter knife in it.
Go back over to the green table, stand between it and the fridge and turn left to face the table.
Put the mug down on the edge of the table in front of the spatula with the black handle.
Turn left and look at the items on the table.
Pick up the knife next to the honey.
Turn right and walk forward to face the cupboard above the stove.
Open the cupboard and put the knife in the mug that is on the shelf.
Pick up the mug that you placed the knife in.
Bring the mug and knife to chest level, then turn right and head to the table that will be on your left.
Place the mug holding the knife on the table to the right of the sponge.
Turn left and face the coffee maker to the left of the fridge
Pick up the tomato from the counter in front of the coffee maker
Turn left and walk a few feet over to the rectangular table
Put the tomato down on the table just left of the salt shakers
Move to the small counter top to the left of the fridge by the coffee maker
Pick up the tomato on top of the counter top
Carry the tomato to the left where the white table top is
Place the tomato on top of the table to the left of both salt shakers
Turn left to face the coffee machine
Pick up the tomato that is in front of the coffee machine
turn left and head forward, then turn right at the white table so that you are facing the white table
Place to tomato on the table to the left of the salt shakers
Turn to your right move forward then turn right again facing the sink
Pick up the spoon on the sink
Turn around to your left then walk towards the stove
Put the spoon in the pan on the stove
Pick up the pan with spoon 
Turn to your right and walk straight to the table on your left
Put the pan with spoon on the table beside the cabbage
Go right and the right again to face the sink.
Pick the spoon up from the sink.
Cross the room and turn to face the stove.
Put the spoon in the pot.
Pick the pot up from the stove.
Cross the room and turn left to face the white table.
Put the pot down on the table.
turn around and head towards the sink
pick up the table spoon from the sink
turn around and head towards the gas
drop the spoon in the pot on the gas
pick up the pot
turn right towards the table 
drop the pot on the table
Turn left and move forward, then turn left and go toward the wall, then turn left and go to the door, then turn left to face the counter.
Pick up the plate on the counter.
Turn around and turn right, go forward to the end of the counter, then turn right and go to the fridge ahead.
Open the fridge, put the plate inside, chill it, then take it out.
Go to the stove behind you, then look up at the microwave.
Open the microwave, put the plate inside, then close it.
Turn left and walk until your past the counter to your left then when you are turn left and walk forward until you get to the yellow wall then turn left and walk to the door  then turn left.
Pick up the plate that's in front of you to the left of the apple.
Turn left and take a step to your left then walk until you pass the counter to your right then turn right and walk to the fridge then turn left to face it.
Chill the plate in the fridge then take it back out and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the stove that's in front of you slightly to your left.
Look up and put the plate in the microwave then close the door.
Turn left and walk almost to the wall, then turn left. Walk past the counter then turn left and walk to the door. Finally, face the left counter.
Pick up the plate on the counter.
Turn left and veer right after the counter ends, walking to the fridge.
Place the plate in the fridge, ahead and to the right of the lettuce. Close the door, wait a moment, and take it out again.
Turn around and walk to the stove.
Place the plate in the microwave above the stove.
Turn around, walk to the counter by the stove
grab the potato on the counter
turn left, walk to the microwave
put the potato in the microwave, heat the potato, open the microwave, take the potato out
turn left, walk to the grey trash bin
put the potato in the trash bin
Turn around and head towards the microwave on your left.
Pick up the potato next to the microwave.
Take a step to the left to face the microwave.
Place the potato in it, heat the potato up, and take the potato out.
Take a step to the left to face the grey bin on the floor.
Place the potato in the bin.
Turn around, then walk until you reach the microwave, and turn right to face it.
Pick up the potato from in front of the microwave.
Walk a little closer to the microwave so you can face it.
Warm the potato in the microwave, then take it out.
Walk to the trashcan to the left of the microwave
Place the potato in the trash.
Turn left and take a step then turn left and walk to the table.
Pick up the wine glass that's in front of you.
Take a step to your right.
Warm the wine glass in the microwave then take it back out and close the door.
Turn left and take a step then turn left and take a small step.
Open the cupboard to the left of the stove and put the wine glass down there and close the door.
Turn left, hang a left at the counter and walk to the white table on the left.
Pick up the clear glass in front of the green sponge on the right corner of the table.
Turn right and walk to the microwave on the counter to the left.
Put the glass inside the microwave behind the egg, heat it for a few seconds, remove it and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the lower cabinet to the left of the stove.
Place the heated glass on a plate inside the cabinet and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the white table to the left of the microwave. 
Pick up the wine glass in front of the sponge. 
Walk to the microwave to the right of the table. 
Open the microwave door, put the glass in the microwave, close the door, open the door, take the glass out of the microwave, and close the door. 
Turn around and face the cabinet below the counter to the left of the stove. 
Open the cabinet door, place the glass in the cabinet, close the door. 
Turn right to the island.
Pick up the butter knife on the island.
Take the knife to the opposite corner of the island.
Slice the potato on the island.
Go to the fridge.
Put the knife in the fridge.
Go back to the corner of the island with the potato slice.
Pick up a potato slice on the counter.
Go to the microwave.
Cook the potato in the microwave.
Move over to the fridge.
Put the potato slice in the fridge.
move right to the table
pick up the knife from the table
head to the other side of the table
slice the potato on the table
turn around to the fridge
place the knife in the fridge
turn around to the table
pick up a potato slice from the table
turn right to the oven 
place the slice to cook in the oven and take it out
turn right to the fridge
place the potato slice in the fridge
turn right to the table
pick up knife from the table
turn left, turn right, walk straight, turn right to the table 
cut the potato on the table
turn right, turn right to the fridge
open door, place knife on the shelf, close door
turn right, turn right to the table
pick up the potato from the table
turn right, walk straight, turn right to the microwave
open door, place potato on shelf, close door, cook, open door, remove potato, close door
turn right, turn left to the fridge
open door, place potato on shelf, close door
Turn right and go to the sink.
Take the wineglass on the right out of the sink.
Turn left and go to the microwave.
Open the microwave, heat the glass and take it out.
Look up to the cupboards above the microwave.
Open the cupboard and put the wineglass in the cupboard.
Turn right, walk to the sink. 
Grab the wine glass in the back of the sink. 
Turn left, walk to the end of the counter, face the microwave.
Put the wine glass in the microwave for a few seconds, take the wine glass out of the microwave. 
Look up at the cupboard above the microwave. 
Put the wine glass in the cupboard with the coffee mug. 
Turn right and walk up to the kitchen sink
Pick up the left most wine glass from the sink
Turn left and walk over to the microwave
Warm the glass in the microwave then remove it
Look up to the cupboard above the microwave
Put the wine glass into the left cupboard above the microwave
Turn right and walk straight towards the counter in between the sink and microwave.
Pick up the yellow knife in front of the spatula on the counter.
Turn right and head towards the loaf of bread next to the stove on your left.
Slice a piece of bread on the counter.
Place the knife on the counter.
Pick up the slice of bread from the counter.
Turn left and walk towards the microwave on  the counter to your left.
Place the bread in the microwave, heat it cup, and take it out of the microwave.
Turn left and walk towards the toaster on the counter to your left.
Place the slice of in front of the toaster on the counter.
Walk over to the area of counter in between the microwave and the ink.
Pick up the large metal knife with a golden handle off of the counter in front of you.
Turn left and walk over to the wall, the turn left again and walk over to the counter.
Slice the loaf of bread on the counter.
Put the large metal knife on the counter in front of the loaf of bread.
Pick up the end slice of bread off the counter.
Turn left and walk over to the microwave on the counter.
Open the microwave and put the slice of bread inside, then microwave it for a couple seconds, after that open the microwave and take out the slice of bread, then close the microwave door.
Turn left and walk over to the toaster on the counter.
Put the heated slice of bread on the counter in front of the toaster.
Walk to your right to reach the counter top to the right of the sink.
Pick up the knife to the left of the tomato.
Turn left, hang a left at the wall with the window and head to the counter with the bread.
Slice the loaf of bread on the counter top.
Put the knife down in front of the loaf of bread.
Pick up the slice of bread closest to the knife on the counter top.
Turn left, hang a left before the white table and head to the microwave.
Place the bread inside the microwave, heat it for three seconds, remove the bread from the microwave and close the door.
Turn left and hang a left at the sink to head to the red toaster on the counter top.
Place the bread slice in front of the toaster on the counter.
Walk towards the counter, then turn right and walk over to the section of counter to the right of the sink.
Pick up the large metal knife with a golden handle off the counter.
Turn left and walk over to the wall, then hang a left and walk up to the counter.
Slice up the loaf of bread that is on the counter to the right of the stove.
Place the knife on the counter in front of the sliced loaf of bread.
Pick up the end slice of bread of off the counter.
Turn left and walk over to the microwave on the counter.
Heat up the slice of bread in the microwave, then remove it and close the microwave door.
Turn left and walk towards the wall, then hang a left and walk up to the counter.
Place the heated slice of bread on the counter in front of the toaster.
Turn right, move to the counter between the sink and the microwave.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn left, move to the counter right of the stove.
Slice the bread with the knife.
Put the knife on the counter.
Pick up a slice of bread.
Turn left, move to the counter where the microwave is.
Put the bread slice in the microwave, cook it, pick it back up.
Turn left, move to the counter where the toaster is.
Put the bread slice on the counter.
Move to stand in front of the counter between the kitchen sink and microwave. 
Pick up the sharp knife from the counter. 
Carry the knife to the small counter space to the right of the stove. 
Slice the loaf of bread on the counter using the knife. 
Place the knife on the counter in front of the loaf of bread. 
Pick up the end slice of bread from the counter. 
Carry the slice of bread to the microwave. 
Place the bread inside the microwave and then remove it once it's done heating. 
Turn and carry the slice of bread to the counter where the toaster is. 
Place the slice of bread on the counter in front of the toaster.
Turn left and go to the left sink
Grab the knife out of the sink
Turn right and go to the microwave
Cut the apple in the microwave into three slices
Put the knife in the microwave
Grab a slice of apple out of the microwave
Turn right and go to the fridge
Leave the apple in the fridge. Take the apple out after some time
Turn around and go to the trash can
Put the apple in the trash can
turn around and then turn right towards the sink
pick up the knife on the edge of the counter
turn right then turn right again and walk straight then turn left and walk straight towards the microwave
open the microwave door
put the knife inside the microwave 
remove a piece of apple from the microwave and close the door
turn right then walk straight towards the wall then turn left towards the fridge
open the fridge and put the apple slice on the shelf then close the door then open the door and remove the apple slice and close the fridge door again
turn right then turn right again and walk straight towards the garbage can
look down and throw away the apple slice into the garbage can
turn left, go to sink on the left
pick up silver knife on counter in front of sink
turn right, go to counter with microwave
open microwave, slice apple
place knife in microwave
pick up apple slice from microwave, close microwave
go to refrigerator to the right
place apple slice on second shelf of refrigerator, close refrigerator, open refrigerator, pick up apple slice, close refrigerator
turn around, go to green bin to the left of stove
place apple slice in green bin
Go right and cross the room to face the sink.
Pick the fork up from the left side of the sink.
Turn to the right and face the right side of the sink.
Put the fork in the sink and turn the water on and then off and pick the fork up again.
Turn and open the drawer to the left of the sink.
Put the fork in the drawer.
Move forward and when you get close to the fridge, turn right to continue across the room to the sink.
Pick up the fork from the drying rack on the left side of the sink.
Move a step to the right while carrying the fork.
Place the fork in the right side of the sink, turn on the water and then remove the fork.
Turn left to face the dishwasher while keeping the sink to your right.
Open the drawer just left of the sink and place the fork inside.
Turn right and walk to the sink.
Pick up the fork on the counter by the sink.
Take a step right.
Wash the fork in the sink.
Turn left.
Open the drawer all the way to the left, but on the same side of the counter as the sink and place the fork in it.
go to dining table to the left
pick up knife with yellow handle off of table between tomato and spatula
slice tomato to the left of fork on the table
turn to the right, then to the left, look at table
slice tomato behind fork on table
go to microwave to the right, open microwave
place knife in back of microwave behind wine glass
go to table with tomatoes on left
pick up tomato slice from behind fork
go to microwave to the right
place tomato slice in microwave in front of wine glass
go to table to the left
pick up tomato slice to the left of fork
go to microwave on the right
place tomato slice in front right corner of microwave
Move to the left end of the white table where there are two tomatoes and utensils.
Pick up the knife that is on the table. 
Slice the tomato on the left side. 
Move down to the very end of the table. 
Slice the tomato on the right side. 
Move across the room to the microwave.
Put the knife inside the microwave.
Return to the table with the tomatoes.
Pick up the tomatoes off of the table. 
Move to the microwave and open the door. 
Place the tomatoes inside the microwave.
Close the door. Move back to the white table with the tomatoes.
Pick up another slice of tomato that is on the counter. 
Move back to the microwave and open the door. 
Put the tomato in the microwave and close the door.
Turn to the right, walk a few steps, turn left, and walk toward the white table.
Pick up the knife next to the tomato on the left.
Slice up the tomato on the left.
Turn right, take a step then turn back around facing the white table.
On the table, slice up the tomato on the right.
Turn right for a few steps and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door, put the knife in the very back of the microwave, and close the door.
Turn left, walk a step, and turn right to face the tomatoes on the white table.
On the table, pick up a tomato slice from the middle of the tomato on the right.
Turn right, take a step, turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door, put the tomato slice in the microwave to the left of the mug, and close the door.
Turn left, walk a step, and turn right to face the tomatoes on the white table.
On the table, pick up the tomato slice from the end of the tomato on the left.
Turn right for a few steps and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door, put the tomato slice in the microwave to the right of the mug, and close the door.
Move to the counter by the coffee machine.
Pick up the large pot from the counter. 
Bring the pot to the fridge.
Chill the pot in the fridge for a few seconds. 
Bring the pot to the wooden rack.
Put the pot on the wooden rack to the left of the red bowl. 
Turn left and walk to the sink and hang a right and walk to the dishwasher and turn left to face the counter.
Pick up the pot on the counter.
Turn right and walk to the fridge.
Open the fridge set, the pot down on the top shelf, close the fridge, open the fridge up and take the pot back out.
Turn left and walk to the end of the counter and take a left, walk past the stove to the shelf and face the shelf.
Place the pot on the shelf next to the paper towels.
Turn to your right, walk over to the sink, and face the counter top to the right of the sink.
Pick up the metal pot to the right of the sink.
Turn to the right, walk forward, and open the fridge.
Chill the pot in the fridge and then remove it.
Turn around the other direction, walk towards the counter, turn left, and walk until you reach the wooden shelves.
Place the pot on the shelves.
Walk around the room to the fridge, and open it.
Grab the plate from the top shelf of the fridge.
Walk around the island to the microwave.
Place the plate in the microwave.
Grab the plate out of the microwave and go to the cabinet next to it.
Place the plate in the cabinet.
Turn left and go to the front of the refrigerator.
take out the white plate on the top shelf of the refrigerator and close the door.
Turn left and go around the kitchen island to the front of the stove. 
Microwave the white plate and take it out and close the microwave door.
Move over to the counter on the right of the stove, and reach for the cabinet above the counter.
Place the white plate in the cabinet and close the cabinet door. 
Turn left and go to the refrigerator on the right
Open the refrigerator and take the saucer from the top shelf
Turn left and go to the microwave above the stove
Open the microwave, put the saucer in and turn the microwave on, then take the saucer out
Go right to the upper cabinet to the right of the microwave
Open the door, put the saucer on the shelf and close the cabinet door
Turn around and head towards the kitchen table top to the right of the refrigerator, with a salt shaker on top of it. 
Pick up the knife sitting on top of the kitchen table top next to the salt shaker. 
Use the knife to slice the tomato sitting on top of the kitchen table top.
Take the knife and head towards the microwave oven. 
Put the knife in the microwave oven. 
Turn back towards the sliced tomato sitting on top of the kitchen table top.
Pick up a slice of the tomato on top of the kitchen table top. 
Turn around and head back towards the microwave oven. 
Cook the tomato slice in the microwave with the knife and take it out. 
Turn around and head towards the window to the left of the oven stove. 
Drop the tomato slice in front of the window. 
Turn around and go to the counter with the toaster
Grab the knife off of the counter
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices
Turn right and stop at the microwave
Put the knife in the microwave
Turn left and stop at the counter
Grab a slice of tomato
Turn right and stop at the microwave
Heat the tomato in the microwave and then take it out
Turn around and go to the trash can
Put the tomato in the trash can
Turn right and walk around to face the counter on the right.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices.
Step to the right to face the microwave.
Place the knife in the microwave.
Step to the left to face the tomato on the counter.
Pick up a slice of tomato on the counter.
Step to the right to face the microwave.
Heat the tomato slice and remove it from the microwave.
Turn around and cross the room, the turn right and walk forward to face the trash can.
Place the tomato slice into the trash can.
Turn around and walk over to the kitchen counter in front of the toaster.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn around while carrying the knife.
Walk over to the microwave.
Place the knife inside the microwave.
Close the microwave door then turn around and walk back over to the counter.
Pick up one slice of tomato from the counter.
Take the slice of tomato back to the microwave oven and open the microwave door.
Put the tomato slice inside the microwave, close the door, and turn the microwave on. In two seconds, turn the microwave off and open the door. Take the tomato out of the microwave.
Take the slice of tomato over to the trash can.
Put the slice of tomato in the trashcan.
Turn around, hang a left at the wall, cross the room, turn left at the counter against the wall, go towards the loaf of bread to your left and turn right to face the toaster on the counter.
Pick up the knife in front of the tomato.
Slice the tomato next to the toaster.
Turn right, head towards the wall, and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door, place the knife inside and close the door.
Turn left, head towards the toaster on your right side on top of the counter, and turn right to face the toaster.
Pick up a single slice of tomato from the middle of the tomato.
Turn right, head towards the wall and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door, place the tomato slice on the plate behind and to the right of the knife, close the door, heat the tomato, open the door and pick up the slice of tomato, and close the door.
Turn around, cross the room to the white door, turn right and face the window on your left side.
Put the tomato slice in the white container to the right of the window.
Turn around and turn left and walk to the table at the end of the room
Grab the knife by the salt
Slice the tomato on the table
Turn right and walk to the microwave
Open microwave and put the knife in the microwave, close the microwave
Turn left and walk back to the middle of the table
Grab a slice of tomato
Turn right and walk to the microwave
Open the microwave, put the slice of tomato in the microwave, close the microwave and turn it on, open the microwave when it's done, take the slice of tomato out, close the microwave
Turn around and walk to the window by the door
Throw the slice of tomato in the trash can under the window
Move to the counter to the right of the door to the left of the stove
Pick up a cup from the counter
Move to the sink to the right of the stove
clean the cup in the sink and pick it back up
Move to the coffee maker to the left of the fridge
Place the cup on the coffee maker
move left towards the table, then right towards the table under the shelf
pick up the mug
move right and then left towards the sink
rinse the mug in the sink
turn right towards the wall and then right towards the coffee maker
place the mug under the coffee maker
Turn around in the kitchen
Walk to the counter
Grab the coffee cup that is on the counter
Take it to the kitchen sink
Get a cup of water
Take the cup of water to the coffee pot
Go straight and turn to your right to face the oven
Grab the pan that is on the stove
Turn to the right and head to the sink
Place the pan inside the sink and wash it. Grab the pan out of the sink
Turn around and walk to the oven
Place the cleaned pan on top of the stove
Walk straight ahead and turn to the stove on your right.
Pick up the dirty pan from the stove. 
Turn to your right and go to the sink.
Put the pan into the sink and wash it.
Take the pan out of the sink, turn around and head back to the stove.
Put the clean pan back on the stove, on the right front burner.
Move to the stove.
Pick up the dirty pan from the stove.
Bring the pan to the sink.
Clean the pan in the sink. 
Bring the pan to the stove.
Put the pan on the stove. 
Go forward to the wall, hang a right, go forward to the counter with the apple on it.
Pick up the knife that is right in front of the bottle of wine. 
Go to the right side of the counter. 
Cut the lettuce that is closest to the edge of the counter in slices. 
Turn to the left, go to the fridge. 
Open the fridge, put the knife inside, close the fridge. 
Turn around, go to the far side of the counter. 
Pick up a slice of the lettuce from the lettuce you just cut.
Turn to the left, go to the fridge. 
Open the fridge, put the lettuce inside, close the fridge, remove the cold lettuce from the fridge, close the door. 
Turn to the right, go to the stove, turn to the right and go to the garbage can that is to the right of the stove. 
Put the lettuce in the garbage can. 
Walk right toward the wall, then turn right and walk to the green island bar. 
Pick up the knife closest to the wine bottle.
Move to your right at the bar. 
Slice the head of lettuce on the right side of the bar. 
Turn to your left and walk to the refrigerator. 
Put the knife in the bottom drawer of the refrigerator. 
Turn around and walk back to the green bar. 
Pick up a slice of lettuce.
Turn around and walk back to the refrigerator. 
Put the slice of lettuce in the bottom drawer of the refrigerator, leave it until it gets cold, then take it out. 
Turn to your right and walk toward the stove, then turn left, then right and face the silver trash can next to the stove. 
Put the slice of lettuce in the trash can. 
walk straight then turn to the right
Walk in to the kitchen
Walk to the counter
Grab the knife that is on the counter
Walk to the end of the counter
Cut the lettuce in a slice 
Take the knife to the fridge
Open the door to the fridge 
Place the knife inside
Go to the counter and get the lettuce
Carry the lettuce to the fridge and put it inside
Take the lettuce out of the fridge walk to the trash and throw it away
Turn right and walk across the room, then hang a right and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the large metal knife off of the counter.
Turn right and walk forward, then hang a right and walk up to the tomato on the counter.
Slice up the tomato on the counter.
Turn around and walk over to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the large metal knife inside, then close the fridge.
Walk back over to where the slice tomato is on the counter behind you.
Pick up a piece of sliced tomato.
Walk back over to the fridge behind you.
Open the fridge and put the piece of sliced tomato inside then close the door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and remove the now chilled piece of sliced tomato.
Turn around and walk forward, then hang a left and walk up to the oven and look up at the microwave.
Open the microwave and put the chilled piece of sliced tomato inside, the close the door.
turn around to the table
pick up the knife from the table
turn around to the table
slice the tomato on the table
turn around to the fridge
drop the knife in the fridge
turn around to the table
pick up a slice from the  table
turn around to the fridge 
place the tomato in the fridge to cool and then take it out
turn right to the overhead oven 
place the tomato in the oven
Turn around to walk across the room to the counter to the left of the fridge.
Pick up the knife from the countertop.
Turn around to walk to the dishwasher.
Slice the tomato on the counter above the dishwasher.
Turn around to walk to the fridge.
Set the knife down in the fridge.
Turn around to walk to the tomato on the counter.
Pick up a slice of tomato.
Turn around and walk to the fridge.
Chill the tomato slice in the fridge, removing it afterwards.
Turn around to walk to the microwave.
Set the tomato slice down in the microwave.
walk to face microwave
pick up egg from counter near microwave
step back to face microwave
heat and remove egg from microwave
walk to face round wooden table
put egg on table
Turn right and walk to the counter.
Pick up the egg from the back of the counter next to the bottle.
Turn left and walk to the microwave on the right.
Put the egg inside the microwave, heat it, remove it and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the round wooden table on the right.
Put the heated egg on the right side of the table to the left of the glass.
Turn right and step forward to face the egg on the counter.
Pick up the egg on the counter.
Step to the left to face the microwave.
Heat the egg in the microwave and remove it.
Turn around and cross the room and turn right to face the kitchen table.
Place the egg on the kitchen table.
Go to the stove on your left
Pick up the pan from the stove
Turn left and go to the cabinet at the end of the room
Put the pan on the cabinet top
Pick up the kitchen spoon from the cabinet top
Put the spoon on the pan
Turn and go to the stove. 
Pick up a pot on the stove. 
Turn and go to the counter by the coffee machine. 
Put the pot on the counter.
Pick up a ladle on the counter.
Put the ladle in the pot on the counter. 
Go to the stove on your left.
Pick up the pan on the front right of the stove.
Turn left, bring the pan to the counter. 
Put the pan on the counter, in front of the kettle. 
Pick up the spoon on the counter.
Stand the spoon in the pan on the counter.
Turn around to face the stove.
Pick up the round pan from the stove. 
Bring the pan to the fridge. 
Chill the pan in the fridge for 5 seconds. 
Bring the pan back to the stove. 
Put the pan down at the back right of the stove. 
Turn left and move towards the dishwasher and then turn left when in front of the oven.
Pick up the pan from the back left burner on the oven top.
Turn right and move towards the toaster and then turn right and move to the refrigerator next to the microwave.
Open the refrigerator door and leave the pan on the first shelf to chill. Open the refrigerator door and pick up the pan.
Turn around and move to the oven. 
Place the pan on the back right burner on the oven top to the left of the glass bowl.
Turn left and walk to the stove and turn left to face it.
Pick up the burner from the top left burner.
Turn right and make your way over to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the pan on the bottom shelf and close the fridge letting the pan chill for a while before picking it back up and closing the fridge again.
Turn around and walk back to the stove.
Put the pan on the top right burner.
Turn left towards the sink and then turn right towards the metal bowl on the counter.
Pick up the ice cream scoop to the left of the metal bowl.
Take a step to the left to face the sink.
Place the scoop in the left sink, wash it, and pick it back up.
Take a step backwards to find the cabinet below the right sink.
Place the scoop in the cabinet and close the door.
Head to the spoon on the counter next to the microwave. 
Pick up the spoon on the counter. 
Turn around, bring the spoon the the sink on the right.
Put the spoon in the left sink and wash it with water. 
Take the cleaned spoon to the right cabinet under the sink. 
Put the cleaned spoon in the right cabinet. 
Turn left and walk toward the sink then turn right and face the dishwasher
Pick up the ladle on the counter
While holding the ladle turn in a full circle until facing the sink
Put the ladle in the sink and turn on the water for a second, then turn the water off and pick the ladle up again
Turn around in a circle and face the sink again then open the cupboard below the sink on the right side
Put the ladle in side the cupboard and close the door
Walk forward, then hang a left and walk up to the sink.
Pick up the sponge out of the sink.
Turn right and walk forward, then turn left to face the sink.
Put the sponge on the black plate that is in the sink.
Pick up the black plate with the sponge on it out of the sink.
Turn around and walk towards the door, then turn left and look up at the upper cabinets above the fridge.
Open the rightmost cabinet door and put the plate with the sponge on it in the cabinet and close the door.
Turn left and walk across the room. 
Take the green sponge from the left side of the sink. 
Turn to the right and take one step, then turn left to face the sink. 
Put the sponge on the black tray in the sink. 
Pick up the black tray with the sponge on it. 
Turn around and take three steps, then turn left and look up. 
Open the cabinet and put the tray with the sponge on it inside the cabinet.
turn left and head to the sink
pick up the sponge 
turn right to the sink 
place the sponge in the pan in the sink
pick up the pan
turn right and move to the overhead shelf
place the pan in the shelf
Turn right and walk towards the table then turn left and walk to the trash can.
Take the knife from the counter above the trash can.
Turn left and walk around the counter then turn right and face the counter with the loaf of bread.
Cut the bread into slices.
Turn left and walk to the refrigerator on your right.
Put the knife inside the refrigerator and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the counter with the bread on it on the right side of the fridge.
Pick up a slice of bread from the counter.
Turn left then step right to the fridge.
Put the bread in the refrigerator and close the door, take the bread out of the fridge.
Turn around and walk towards the counter with the bottle on it then turn right to the stove.
Put the bread in the microwave.
Turn right and walk across the room, then turn around to the left and walk forward to face the end of the counter.
Pick up the knife on the end of the counter.
Walk to the left of the counter and walk to the end of the counter and turn right to face the loaf of bread on the counter.
Cut the bread on the counter into slices.
Step to the left to face the fridge.
Put the knife in the fridge on the top shelf.
Step to the right to face the bread on the counter.
Pick up a slice of bread on the counter.
Step to the left to face the fridge.
Cool the bread slice in the fridge and then remove it.
Turn around and walk across the room, then turn right and face the microwave above the stove.
Place the slice of bread in the microwave.
turn around and head for the table
pick up the knife on the table
head straight for the coffee maker
slice the bread by the maker
move left to the fridge
place the knife in the fridge
move right to the bread
pick up a slice from the bread
head left to the fridge
place the bread to cool and then take it out
turn around and head for the oven 
place the bread in the oven
Head to to the left side of the table by the tomato.
Pick up the tomato on the table.
 Bring the tomato to the sink on the right.
Wash the tomato in the sink. 
Bring the tomato back to the table behind you.
Put the tomato on the table in front of the lettuce. 
Move a few feet left and turn to face the large wooden table
Pick up the tomato from the left side of the table
Turn right and walk over to the kitchen sink
Wash the tomato under water in the sink then remove it
Turn around and walk back over to the large wooden table
Put the tomato down on the table
move to the left a bit and turn to face the table again
grab a tomato off of the table
turn right and walk to the end of the room where the sink is
place the tomato inside of the sink, rinse it off, and then take it back out
turn around and walk back over to the table at the end of the room, and turn to face the table on the right
place the tomato down on the table
Turn left and walk to the counter.
Pick up the knife that's in front of you on the counter vertically.
Turn left and take a step to your left.
Cut the left half of the loaf of bread into slices please.
Take a step to your right please.
Stand the knife on point near the handle of the ice cream scoop almost touching the blue part of the handle with the tip and let it fall.
Take a step back to your left please.
Pick up the middle slice of bread please.
Turn around and walk to the counter then turn left and walk to the microwave.
Warm the bread in the microwave then take it back out and close the door.
Turn left and walk past the counter to your right then turn right and walk past the counter and stool then turn right and walk to the door then turn right to face the garbage.
Put the bread in the garbage please.
Turn to the left, go to the counter just left of the stove.
Pick up the yellow handled knife off the counter that is closest to the salt.
Turn around, go forward, turn to the bread on the counter to the right.
Cut the bread that is on the counter into slices.
Move to the right at the counter.
Put the knife down on the counter to the right of the gold spoon.
Move to the left at the counter to the loaf of bread.
Pick up a slice of bread from the counter.
Turn around, go to the counter across the room, turn to the microwave on the left.
Put the bread inside the microwave, turn it on to cook, remove the bread once it is done cooking.
Turn to the left, go to the counter, turn left, go all the way around to the other side of the counter, go to the black garbage can that is past the chairs.
Put the slice of bread into the garbage can.
Go to the left of the stove stove
Pick up the knife on the left
Turn to the loaf of bread
Cut the loaf of bread
Turn to the right
Place the knife down on the counter
Go to the sliced bread
Take a slice of bread
Go to the microwave
Heat the bread in the microwave
Go to the black bin
Put the bread in the bin
Turn around and walk to the round table.
Pick up the ladle from the table.
Turn right, then right again to the sink.
Put the ladle in the sink and wash it, then pick it up again.
Turn around and walk back to the table.
Set the ladle down on the table.
Move to the table to the left of you
Pick up a scoop from the table
Move to the sink behind you
Clean the scoop in the sink
Move to the dining table behind you
Put the scoop on the table
Turn around and go to the right to face the white table.
Pick the ladle up from the table.
Turn around and go to the right to stand in front of the sink.
Put the sink in the bottle and turn the water on and then off and pick up the ladle.
Turn around and go to stand at the white table.
Put the ladle on the table.
Turn left and walk to the sink to your right.
Grab the egg by the lettuce.
Turn right and walk to the fridge to your right.
Place the egg inside the fridge, cool it then remove it.
With the egg, turn right and walk to the sink to your right.
Place the cool egg in the sink.
Turn left and walk towards the wall, then turn right to face the sink.
Pick up the egg off of the counter to the left of the sink.
Turn right and walk towards the wall, then hang a right and walk up to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the egg inside and then close the door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and take the egg out, then close the door.
Turn right and walk forward, then hang a right and walk up to the sink.
Put the chilled egg in the sink basin
Turn to the left and then face the sink on the right.
Pick up the egg from the left of the sink.
Carry the egg and turn to the right. Then turn right again and face the fridge.
Open the fridge and place the egg inside. Shut the door and then open door and take out the egg. Shut the door.
Carry the egg and turn to the right, then turn right again to move to the sink.
Place the egg in the sink.
Turn to the right and then right again to face the fridge.
Open the fridge and take out the bottle from the bottom. Shut the door.
Carry the bottle and turn to the right and then the right again to face the counter.
Open the bottom cabinet and place the bottle inside, shut the door.
Turn around to locate the fridge.
Open the fridge and take out the bottle.
Hold the bottle and turn around to the counter.
Open the bottom cabinet, and place the bottle inside.
turn around and move to the refrigerator
open the fridge and remove the bottle of wine, close the door
turn around and move to the counter across from the fridge where the toaster is sitting
open the second cabinet door, put the wine in to the cabinet and close the door
turn back around and face the fridge
open the fridge door, remove a second bottle of wine, close the door
turn back around and move back to the cabinet underneath the toaster
open the second cabinet door, put the wine bottle in to the cabinet with the first one and close the door
Go to the refrigerator to your right.
Take out bottle of wine from the middle shelf in the refrigerator.
go to the red garbage pale that is behind you
Place the bottle of wine in the second cabinet from the left
Go to the refrigerator that is behind you.
Take a bottle of wine from the middle shelf of the refrigerator.
go to the red garbage pale that is behind you
Place the bottle of wine in the second cabinet from the left next to the other bottle of wine
Turn right and hang a right at the sink to face the counter next to the stove.
Open the upper right cabinet, pick up the spoon with the blue handle and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the sink on the right.
Put the spoon into the sink on the left side, rinse it for a few seconds, and pick it back up.
Turn around, walk to the stove on the left and turn left to face the cabinets under the sink.
Open the lower right cabinet, put the rinsed spoon inside the cabinet in front of the glass on the right side and close the door.
Turn right then head to the cabinet above the counter
Open the cabinet and pick up the ladle then close the cabinet 
Turn left then head to the right side of the  sink
Put the ladle in the sink and rinse it
Turn right and move little further from the sink
Open the cabinet under the sink then put the ladle in and close the cabinet
Go to the cupboard
Take a measuring spoon out of the cupboard
Go to the sink
Wash the measuring spoon
Go to the sink cabinet
Put the measuring spoon in the cabinet
Turn to the right three times and proceed to the front of the sink.
Pick up the knife to the left of the sink.
Turn to the right, move to the right side of the sink and face it.
Slice the potato in front of the pot with the knife.
Place the knife in the pot.
Pick up a slice of potato.
Put the slice of potato into the pot.
Remove the pot from the counter and hold it.
Turn to the right, move forward and turn to the left to face the fridge.
Open the fridge door, place the pot into the fridge and shut it.
Turn around, walk towards the wine bottle then go right to get to the sink.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn right walk just past the sink to the potato on the counter.
Dice the potato with the knife.
Put the knife in the pot behind the potato.
Pick up the smallest piece of diced potato.
Put the potato slice in the pot with the knife.
Pick up the pot with the knife and potato slice in it.
Turn right and walk to the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator, put the pot inside next to the loaf of bread and then close it. 
Turn around and walk to the counter, turn right and walk to the sink, 
Pick up the knife.
Face the potato on the counter.
Slice the potato on the counter.
Put the knife in the pot.
Pick up the potato slice.
Put the potato slice in the pot.
Pick up the pot.
Turn right, walk to the fridge, and turn left.
Open the fridge, put the pot in the fridge, and close the fridge.
Turn around and walk to the kitchen sink, then turn right to face the counter.
Pick up the knife on the left in front of the cup.
Turn left to face the kitchen sink.
Slice the tomato in the top right of the counter.
Turn around, step forward, and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the knife to the back of the apple, close the door.
Return to the kitchen sink.
Pick up a slice of tomato.
Turn around, step forward, turn right, step forward, turn right again to face the kitchen sink.
Place the tomato in the left sink, turn on the water for a few seconds, then turn water off. Pick up the tomato slice.
Turn right, step forward, turn left to face the right compartment of the sink.
Place the tomato on the blade of the butter knife.
Turn around and face the counter on your right.
Take the knife off of the counter in front of you.
Face the sink on your left.
Slice the tomato in front of you.
Turn around and face the microwave to your left.
Place the knife in the microwave in front of you then close it.
Face the sink to your left. 
Take a tomato slice off of the counter in front of you.
Turn left and face the sink to your right.
Wash the tomato slice in the sink in front of you then take it out.
Turn right then face the sink to your left.
Place the tomato slice by the sink in front of you.
turn around, walk straight, turn right to the counter
pick up knife from the counter
turn to the left, look at the sink
turn around look at the sink
turn right , turn left to the microwave
open door, place knife in to microwave, close door
turn left, walk to the sink
pick up tomato from counter
turn around, turn to the right, turn right to the counter
place tomato in to the sink, turn water on, turn off water, pick up tomato
turn right, turn left to the counter
place tomato on to the counter
Turn left, walk to counter, right to the coffee maker
Pick up the mug from the coffee maker.
Walk left to the right side of the table.
Place mug on table between the forks.
Pick up fork closest to the plant.
Place the fork in the mug.
Go forward to counter to coffee maker on the left
Pick up white coffee cup from coffee maker
Turn left, go to dining table on left
Place coffee cup on dining table, behind fork, to the right of tomato
Pick up fork touch plant on dining table
place fork in white coffee cup on dining table
Turn left, head towards the microwave, turn left, and head towards the coffee maker.
Pick up the cup from the coffee maker.
Turn left and head towards the table to your left.
Place the cup to the left of the green sponge on the table.
Pick up the middle fork on the table.
Place the fork in the cup behind the fork closest to you.
Move forward, then turn left to face the white table.
Pick up the potato on the white table.
Turn around, then turn left to go to the fridge.
Open the fridge, put the potato inside and chill it, then take the potato out.
Turn right and go to the sink up ahead.
Put the potato in the left sink basin.
Walk over to the white table against the wall on your left.
Pick up the potato off of the white table.
Turn around and walk forward, then hang a left and walk up to the fridge.
Put the potato in the fridge for a couple seconds to chill it then take it out.
Turn right and walk over to the sink.
Put the chilled potato in the left sink basin.
Take a step to your left then walk a step forward then turn left and walk to the white table.
Pick up the potato that's in front of you under the head of lettuce.
Turn right and walk to the fridge.
Chill the potato in the fridge then get it back out and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the sink.
Put the potato in the left sink.
Go forward and turn left to face the counter.
Pick the potato up from the left of the bread.
Go right and turn to face the microwave.
Put the potato in the microwave and shut the door and then open it and take the potato out and shut the door again.
Go left and then turn right to face the fridge.
Put the potato in the fridge.
Walk forward and turn left to face the kitchen counter below the mirror
Pick up the potato from the kitchen counter
Turn right and walk to the microwave on the right side of the counter
Put the potato in the microwave, cook it, and remove it
Turn left and walk around to the fridge
Open the fridge and put the potato on the lower shelf next to the egg
Walk to the middle of the counter on the left.
Pick up the potato to the left of the loaf of bread on the counter.
Turn right and walk to the microwave on the left.
Put the potato inside the microwave, heat it, remove it, and close the door.
Turn left and walk to the black fridge on the right.
Put the heated potato on the bottom shelf to the right of the egg and close the door.
go to the end of the counter top across the room and turn to the left and go to the counter
pick up the apple from the counter top
turn to the left and take a few steps and turn to the left and take a few steps and turn to the left facing the microwave
put the apple in the microwave and cook it and when finish cooking take out the apple from the microwave
turn to the left and go to the counter and turn left and go to the chair and turn right and take a step and turn left and take a few steps and turn right facing the waste basket
put the apple in the waste basket
Walk straight ahead to the white garbage bag and turn left, walk straight ahead to the counter with the coffee maker on it. 
Pick up the apple to the right of the coffee maker. 
Turn and walk to the microwave. 
Open the microwave door, put the apple in the microwave, close the door, heat up the apple, open the door, take the apple out of the microwave, and close the door. 
Walk to the black bin to the left of the fridge. 
Put the apple inside of the black bin. 
walk to face coffee maker on counter top
pick up apple from right side of coffee maker
walk to face microwave
cook apple in microwave, remove apple from microwave
walk to face trash bin to left of fridge
put apple inside trash bin
Turn right and head towards the door then turn right and head to the table
Pick up the yellow knife from the right edge of the table
Step back from the table
Slice the tomato that is on the table
Turn right and go onto the tiled floor then turn right and go to the fridge
Put the knife on a shelf in the fridge
Turn right and go alongside the table with the bottle of wine then turn right and go back to the table with the tomato on it
Pick up the end slice of the tomato
Turn right and go back onto the tiled floor, then turn right and go to the fridge
Put the tomato slice in the fridge next to the knife and let it chill then remove the tomato slice from the fridge
Turn left and go to the kitchen counter then turn right towards the microwave
Put the tomato slice in the microwave and cook it
Turn to the white table
Pick up the knife
Look down at the tomato
Cut the tomato into slices
Go to the refrigerator
Put the knife in the refrigerator
Go to the white table
Pick up a tomato slice
Go to the refrigerator
Chill the tomato slice
Go to the microwave
Put the tomato slice in the microwave
Turn right and take a step then turn right and walk to the table.
Pick up the yellow handled knife that's in front of you.
Look down at the tomato.
Slice the tomato into slices with the knife.
Turn right and walk until you're even with the fridge then turn right and walk to it when you are.
Open the fridge and put the knife in there then close the door.
Walk back over to thee sliced tomato.
Pick up a slice of the tomato please.
Walk back over the the fridge and face it please.
Chill the slice of tomato in the fridge then get it back out and close the door.
Turn left and walk to the counter then turn right and walk to the microwave.
Put the slice of tomato in the microwave then close the door.
Go to table on right with loaf of bread
Pick of knife between loaf and fork
Go to counter with microwave
Place knife on counter
Walk to the table to your right
Pick up the knife from the table
Turn around and walk towards the microwave behind you
Place the knife right next to the egg on the table.
turn right and to face the wooden kitchen countertop
grab the knife from the middle of the counter top there
turn around and walk over to the microwave
place the knife to the left in front of the microwave
Turn right and walk to the counter with the coffee maker on the left.
Pick up the white mug from the platform on the coffee maker.
Turn around and walk to the sink on the right.
Put the mug inside the sink, fill it with water and pick it back up.
Turn right and walk to the coffee maker on the left.
Put the mug with water on the platform of the coffee maker.
go to the coffee pot
pick up the mug from the machine
take the mug to the sink
fill the mug with water
take the full mug back to the machine
put the mug back under the coffee machine
Walk forward to the coffee machine
Pick up the mug
Turn around until you're facing the sink
Put the mug in the sink, fill it with water, and take it back out
Turn right, walk ahead a step, then turn left to face the coffee machine
Place the filled mug where you picked it up from
Take a step to your left.
Pick up the potato that's above the tomato.
Take another step to your left.
Cook the potato in the microwave and then get it back out and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the stove then turn left and walk to the fridge.
Put the potato in the fridge by the tomato and close the door.
move left towards the shelf
pick up the potato 
move left towards the microwave
place the potato in the microwave and allow to cook and then take it out
turn around towards the fridge
place the potato in the fridge
Turn left, go ahead, turn right to face counter with spoon and tomato on it.
Pick up tomato behind the tomato and to the left of the stove.
Turn left, go to microwave, turn right to face microwave.
Open microwave, place potato standing on its end in microwave, close door.  Turn on microwave.  When it turns off, open door and take out potato.  Close door.
Turn right, walk ahead.  Turn right, go to refrigerator.  Open refrigerator door.
Put the potato in the refrigerator, on top shelf to the left of the cup.  Close refrigerator.
Turn around and step forward to face the tea pot on the counter.
Pick up the tea pot on the counter.
Turn right to face the sink.
Wash the tea pot in the sink and remove it.
Turn around and cross the room and turn right to face the end of the white table.
Place the tea pot on the white table.
Turn around and walk to the coffee maker on the counter.
Pick up the kettle on the counter.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Wash the kettle in the sink.
Turn around and walk straight to the white table, then go to the left side of it.
Place the kettle on the table on the far left side, near the middle.
Turn around, move to the counter right of the stove.
Pick up the kettle on the counter. 
Turn around, bring the kettle to the sink on the left. 
Wash the kettle in the sink with water.
Turn around, bring the kettle to the table with the bread on it.
Put the kettle on the table.
turn around, go to gray bin to the left of stove
pick up tomato from gray bin
go to sink to the right
place tomato in sink, turn on water, turn off water, pick up tomato from sink
turn left, go around counter to the left, to microwave on counter
place tomato on right side of gray plate in microwave, close microwave
Turn around and walk to the garbage to the right of the stove then turn right to face it.
Pick up the apple that's in front of you in the garbage..
Turn right and walk to the sink.
Wash the apple in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Turn around and walk to the wall then turn left and walk to the microwave.
Put the apple in the microwave and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the end of the counter, then turn right and face the bin.
Pick up the apple in the bin.
Turn right and walk to the sink.
Wash the apple in the sink.
Turn left and walk to the wall, then turn left and walk to the microwave.
Place the apple in a microwave.
Move to the sink, right of the fridge.
Pick up the sponge on the counter in front of the sink. 
Bring the sponge to the fridge on the left.
Put the sponge in the pan in the fridge.
Pick up the pan with sponge in the fridge. 
Turn around, bring the pan over to the round table in the opposite corner of the room.
Put the pan with sponge on the table next to the apple
Walk forward, then hang a right and walk over to the sink.
Pick up the sponge off of the counter in front of the sink.
Turn left and walk towards the wall, then turn right and walk up to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the sponge on the metal pan in the fridge.
Pick up the metal pan with the sponge on it out of the fridge.
Walk over to the round white table in the far corner of the room to your right.
Put the pan with the sponge on it on the white table.
walk to face sink
pick up sponge from sink edge
walk to face fridge
put sponge in frying pan inside fridge
pick up frying pan from fridge
walk to face round white table
put frying pan on table
Turn around, step forward, then turn left to go to the sink.
Pick up the leftmost potato in the sink.
Turn right to go to the microwave.
Heat the potato in the microwave.
Turn right, go forward, then turn right to face the table.
Put the potato on the table, in front of the spoon.
walk over to the front of the sink
take one potato out of the sink
walk the clean potato over to the microwave next to the fridge
cook the potato in the microwave
take the cooked potato over to the set dining table
gently place the potato onto the dining table
Turn around and face the sink.
Take the potato on the left out of the sink.
Turn to the right and face the microwave.
Put the potato in and start it and then take it out when it's done and shut the door.
Go right and then right again to face the white table.
Set the potato on the white table.
Move to the white rectangular table.
Pick up the knife next to the bread. 
Bring the knife to the sink. 
Wash the knife in the sink with water. 
Bring the knife to the counter by the tomato.
Put the knife in the drawer under the tomato. 
Turn around and go to your right to the table.
Pick up the knife nearest to the bread.
Turn to your right, go straight ,and then to the sink at your right.
Wash the knife in the sink.
Turn around and go to the counter with the tomato.
Place the knife in the cabinet beneath the tomato.
go over to the white kitchen table
grab a butter knife off of the table
go over to the kitchen sink
place the knife in the sink and clean it, then pick it back up
walk over to the far left of the kitchen counter next to the stove
place the knife inside of the far left pull out drawer
Turn around and walk towards the microwave next to the fridge on your left.
Take out the apple inside the microwave.
Turn right to face two plates on the counter.
Place the apple on the plate in front.
Pick up the plate with the apple from the counter.
Turn left to face the microwave.
Place the plate in the microwave and close it.
Turn around, walk to the microwave in the kitchen
Open the door to the microwave
Take the apple out of the microwave
Turn to the right, Put the apple on the plate
Pick up the plate with the apple
Turn to the left, put the plate in the microwave
Close the door to the microwave
Turn around and go to the microwave on the counter. 
Take the apple out of the microwave. 
Turn to the right and go to the plate on the counter. 
Put the apple on a plate. 
Pick up the plate with the apple on it.
Turn to the left and go to the microwave. 
Put the plate in the microwave. 
Turn to your right, then face the microwave on your left.
Open the microwave door and remove the apple in the microwave.
Turn right and face the counter top with the toaster and red vase above it.
Place the apple on the plate closest to the edge of the counter 
Pick up the plate with the apple on top.
Face left and return to the microwave
Open the microwave door and place the plate in the microwave.
Turn around, head across the kitchen to the white table
Take the cup from the table
Head to the left across the kitchen 
Put the cup in the sink
Turn around and walk to the white oven. Turn left at the oven and walk to the corner to the right of the white table.
Pick up the orange cup on the white table.
Turn around and walk to the white oven. Turn right at the oven and walk to the counter to your left. 
Put the orange cup in the sink at the right end of the counter.
Go to the white table
Pick up the spoon and cup from the table
Go to the sink
Place the spoon and cup in the sink
Look into the sink.
Pick up the knife from the sink.
Turn around and move to the white table.
Use the knife to slice the bread.
Lower the knife to the table.
Put down the knife on the table.
Examine the bread slices on the table.
Pick up a slice of bread.
Turn Left and walk towards the refrigerator.
Open refrigerator and place bread inside momentarily, then remove bread.
Turn left and move towards the microwave.
Place the slice of bread in microwave.
Stay in front of the counter to the left of the sink.
Take the knife from behind the bottle on the counter.
Turn around, go to the white table and face the table.
Cut the bread on the table into slices.
Stay in front of the table.
Put the knife on the bread on the table.
Stay in front of the table.
Take a slice of bread from the table.
Turn around and go to the refrigerator.
Put the bread on the top shelf of the refrigerator. Close then open the refrigerator. Take the bread from the refrigerator.
Turn around, head to the right to the microwave.
Put the bread in the microwave.
look down to the sink
pick up the knife from the sink
turn left and go to the white dining table
slice the loaf of bread on the table above the apple
look down to the table
place the knife on the left side of the sliced loaf of bread
look up to the wall
pick up the slice of bread that is third from the right
turn left and go to the refrigerator 
open the refrigerator door, place the slice of bread on the top shelf in the refrigerator, close the refrigerator door, wait a second, open the refrigerator door, pick up the slice of bread from the top shelf, and close the refrigerator door again
turn left and go to the microwave
open the microwave door, and put the piece of bread in to the microwave, then close the microwave door
Move forward, then turn right, move forward, then turn right to face the kitchen island.
Pick up the knife on the counter, to the right of the bread.
Turn around, to face the stove.
Put the knife in the pot on the stove.
Pick up the pot with a knife in it from the stove.
Turn around, move forward, then go left to approach the sink.
Put the pot in the center of the sink.
MOve to the island across from the stove
Pick up a knife from the island
Move to the stove behind you
Put the knife in a pot on the stove
Pick p the pot from the stove
Move to the sink to the right
Put the pot in the sink
Go straight and then turn to the right and face the short side of the island.
Pick up the knife from the right side of the counter.
Carry the knife and turn around to the stove.
Place the knife in the pot on the left side of the stove.
Pick up the pot from the stove.
Carry the pot and knife and turn to the right to go to the sink.
Place the pot and knife in the sink.
Turn around, take two steps, turn left and stop in front of the bread on the table.
Pick up the loaf of bread from the table.
Turn left for one step, take another left for five steps and stop in front of the refrigerator.
Open both the refrigerator and the freezer doors and place the bread in the middle of the top shelf of the refrigerator, right side, wait a few moments then open both doors again and pick up the bread and shut the doors.
Turn left for four steps, turn right for one step, turn left and stop in front of the stove.
Put the bread on the counter to the right of the stove, to the back and front left of the silver crock. 
Turn around and walk to the table on your left.
Grab the bread from the table
Turn around and walk to the fridge.
Place the bread in the fridge, wait a little while, and remove the bread from the fridge.
Turn to your left and approach the oven
Place the bread on the counter to the right of the oven.
Turn around and find the loaf of bread to the left of the tomato on the table.
Pick up the loaf of bread from the table.
Turn around and head towards the fridge.
Place the loaf on the top right, let it cool, and take it back out.
Turn left and walk towards the stove.
Place the loaf of bread on the counter to the right of the stove.
turn to the left go right towards the table
pick up the knife from the table
turn to the left go forward go right towards the counter
slice a potato that is on top of the counter
turn around to the left open the bottom cabinet and put the knife inside of it 
turn to the right 
pick up a slice of the potato that is on the counter
turn to the right
turn to the left towards the refrigerator 
put the slice of potato inside of the refrigerator get it back out 
turn to the left go left go right towards the trash can
put the slice of potato inside the trash can
Turn left then head to the table
Pick up the knife on the table
Turn right then head to the counter beside the microwave
Slice the potato on the counter in front of the microwave
Turn left then walk forward facing the trash bin
Open the first cabinet put inside the knife
Turn right then face the counter
Pick up a slice potato
Turn right then head to the fridge
Open the fridge put in and out the slice potato 
Turn right then head to the trash bin
Put the slice potato in the bin
Turn around and walk to the table to your right.
Grab the butter knife on the table.
Turn right walk to the microwave to your right.
With the knife, slice the potato next to the left of the microwave on the counter.
Turn around to face the waste basket.
Open the cabinet by the waste basket and place the knife inside.
Turn around to face the microwave on the counter.
Grab a slice of the potato that's by the microwave on the counter.
Turn right and walk to the fridge to your left.
Place the slice of potato inside, chill it and remove it.
Turn left and walk to the waste basket to your left.
Place the cool slice of potato inside the waste basket.
Turn and go to the counter by the refrigerator.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn and go to the round table.
Put the knife in the coffee cup on the round table.
Pick up the coffee cup on the round table. 
Turn and go to the small table in the corner.
Put the coffee cup on the small table.
Turn right, move to the counter right of the fridge, left of the stove.
Pick up the knife on the counter. 
Turn around, move to the door, turn left, move to the round table.
Put the knife in the mug on the table. 
Pick up the mug with knife on the table.
Turn around, bring the mug with knife to the small black table in the corner to the left.
Put the mug with knife on the small black table.
Go to the counter left of the stove
Pick up the butterknife from the counter
Go to the round black table
Place the knife in a mug on the table
Pick up the mug
Go to the small black table
Place the mug down on the small black table
Make a left to walk to the stove.
Pick up the rightmost tea kettle from the stove.
Turn right to walk to the sink.
Rinse the tea kettle in the sink.
Turn right and hang another right to reach the table.
Set the tea kettle down on the table.
Walk over to the oven
Grab the tea pot
Walk over to the sink
Fill the pot with water
Walk over to the table
Place the pot on the table
Turn to your left and go to the stove
Pick up the right-side kettle from the burner
Turn around and walk to the sink
Put the kettle into the sink, washed it with water, shut off the water, and pick up the kettle
Turn around, go to the other end of the room to face the white table
Place the kettle on the table
Take a step to the left and face the counter top with the pan on top of it in front of you
Pick up the egg that is sitting to the left of the salt shaker
Turn to the right and go to the black fridge that is ahead of you to the left
Open the fridge and place the egg on the third shelf in front of the egg already there, then close the door.  Open the fridge and pick up the egg on the third shelf that is closest to you. The egg that is in front of the other egg. Then close the door
Turn around and cross the room to the microwave and turn left to face the microwave
Open the microwave and place the egg inside to the left of the plate then close the door
Go to the left a step and face the counter with the pot.
Take the egg next to the salt on the counter.
Turn right, go forward to the stove top, turn left, go forward, turn right at the fridge, go to the fridge.
Put the egg on the lowest shelf in the fridge in front of the potato. Close and then open the fridge. Take the egg from the fridge.
Turn right, go forward to the stove top, turn right, go forward to the wall, turn left, go forward to the microwave.
Put the egg in the microwave.
Move over a bit to the left facing the counter. 
Pick up the egg from the counter. 
Turn right and walk to the fridge on the right. 
Open the fridge door, put the egg down on the third shelf, close the door, open the door, take the egg out of the fridge, close the door. 
Turn and walk to the microwave on the other side of the room. 
Put the egg down in the microwave and close the drawer. 
Walk forward then turn right and walk up to the counter right of the stove
Pick up the egg from the counter
Turn around and walk up to the microwave
Cook the egg in the microwave then remove it
Turn left to face the kitchen sink
Put the egg in the sink
Turn right after the table, walk to the counter with the toaster on it and turn left. 
Pick up the egg that's in front of the spoon on the right. 
Turn around and walk to the microwave. 
Open the microwave door, put the egg in the microwave to the right of the mug, close the door, heat the egg, take the egg out of the microwave, and close the door. 
Turn left to face the sink. 
Put the egg inside of the sink to the left of the spatula. 
Go across the room, turn right, go across the room and turn left towards the counter.
Pick up the egg from the counter.
Turn around and head to the microwave.
Put the egg in the microwave, cook it and pick it back up.
Turn left towards the sink.
Put the egg in the sink to the left of the spatula.
turn around and move towards the table
pick up the white container
turn right and head towards the gas cooker and then right towards the shelf
place the container on the shelf
Move to the table near the stove.
Pick up the salt from the table. 
Bring the salt to the small black table.
Put the salt on the small black table. 
Turn around and move past the chair next to the window then turn left and face the table.
Pick up the salt shaker to the left of the loaf of bread from the table.
Turn right, move towards the oven, then turn right and move towards the small table between the sink and the trash bag in the corner of the room.
Place the salt shaker to the right of the spoon on the front right corner of the small table.
Walk forward, then turn left and walk up to the small blue bin to the left of the fridge.
Pick up the tomato out of the small blue bin.
Turn around and take a step forward, then turn left and walk up to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the tomato inside then close the door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and remove the now chilled tomato, then close the door.
Turn left and walk forward, then turn right and walk up to the small blue bin.
Put the chilled tomato in the small blue bin.
Walk over to the trash bin
Grab the tomato
Walk over to the fridge
Chill the tomato in the fridge and take it out
Walk over to the trash bin
Put the tomato in the trash
Go forward, turn around to the blue garbage can next to the fridge.
Pick up the tomato that is in the garbage can.
Turn around, go to the left to the fridge.
Put the tomato in the fridge and close the door, remove it once it is cold. 
Turn to the left, go to the garbage can to the left of the fridge.
Put the tomato in the garbage can.
Take a step forward, then turn left and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the apple that is on the counter.
Turn around and take a step forward, then turn right ad begin walking across the room, hang a left and walk up to the kitchen island.
Put the apple down on the edge of the kitchen island.
Pick up the butter knife that is closest to the large metal knife on the kitchen island.
Use the butter knife to slice the apple on the island into three pieces.
Put the butter knife down vertically on the island in between the apple slices.
Pick up the rightmost apple slice off of the island.
Turn around and take a step forward.
Open the fridge and place the apple slice inside on the bottom shelf, then close the fridge door.
Turn left and walk to the counter to the right of the fridge.
Pick up the apple on the counter.
Turn left and walk to the counter on the left.
Put the apple on the counter.
Pick up the silver knife under and gold knife on the counter.
Slice the apple with the knife.
Put the knife in the apple and leave it there.
Take an apple slice from the counter.
Turn around and walk to the fridge.
Open the fridge door, put the apple slice inside, and close the door.
Turn left to face the counter to the right of the fridge.
Take the apple from the counter.
Turn around and go straight and to the right to the kitchen island.
Put the apple on the kitchen island counter.
Take the small knife that is under the large knife on counter.
Cut the apple into pieces.
Put the knife on the apple on the counter.
Take a piece of the apple from the counter.
Turn around and go straight to the fridge.
Put the piece of apple on the lowest shelf in the fridge.
Turn to your left and face the counter
Grab the apple off of the counter
Turn around and head to the kitchen island
Put the apple on the kitchen island
Grab the small knife off of the kitchen island
Cut the apple into three slices
Put the knife down on the kitchen island
Grab one of the apple slices
Turn around and head to the fridge
Put the apple into the fridge. Close the door
turn to your left, walk towards the refrigerator and face the counter on the right side of the fridge.
Pick up the apple on the edge of the counter.
Turn to your left and go to the island directly behind you.
Place the apple on the counter of the island in front of you.
Pick up the silver butter knife in the middle of the counter and flip the yellow butter knife over and place back on counter.
Cut the apple with the silver butter knife into three equal pieces.
leave the knife in the top.
Pick up one piece of the apple.
Turn to your left until you are facing the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator and place the apple slice on the third shelf from the top in the fridge.
Turn around to face the salt on the end of the table.
Pick up the salt on the table.
Turn right and cross the room and turn right to face the small black table.
Place the salt on the small black table.
Take a step to the right to face the salt on the counter.
Pick up the salt on the counter.
Take a step to the left to face the small black table.
Place the salt on the table.
Turn around and face the table with the trash can nest to it.
Pick the salt shaker on the left up from the table.
Go right and cross the room and then turn to the right to face the small black table.
Put the salt shaker down on the black table.
Move to the right and face the counter to the left of the sink.
Pick the salt shaker up from the counter.
Move to the left and face the black tablet to the left of the counter.
Put the salt shaker on the black table.
turn to face table next to garbage can
pick up salt shaker from table
walk forward to face small black shelves 
put shaker on shelves
move slightly right to face counter to right of shelves
pick up salt shaker from counter
move left to face black shelves
put shaker on shelves
Turn around, walk to the round table. 
Pick up the knife next to the coffee pot. 
Step closer to the table.
Cut the bread on the table. 
Take a step to the right. 
Put the knife on the table to the right of the bread. 
Take a step to the left. 
Pick up a piece of the bread. 
Turn right, walk to the microwave. 
Put the bread in the microwave for a few seconds, take the bread back out of the microwave. 
Turn around, walk back to the table. 
Put the bread next to the tomato on the table. 
Turn around and face the wooden table
Pick up the knife off of the table
Move slightly to your left and face the table again
Slice the loaf of bread
Move slightly to your right and face the table again
Put the knife down on the table
Move slightly to your left and face the table again
Pick up a slice of bread
Turn all the way to the right and face the microwave
Put the bread in the microwave and cook it for a few seconds
Turn all the way around and face back the to the table
Put down the bread on to the table
Turn around and walk to the loaf of bread on the table.
Pick up the yellow knife closest to the coffee machine.
Walk to the bread on the table.
Cut up the loaf of bread on the table.
Walk one step to the right and face the table.
Place the knife to the right of the loaf of bread on the table.
Walk to the cut up loaf of bread on the table.
Pick up a slice of bread from the table.
Turn right and walk to the microwave.
Microwave the slice of bread and then pick up the slice of bread from the microwave.
Turn around and walk to the wooden table.
Place the slice of bread to the right of the knife on the table.
Walk to the counter with the knife between the head of lettuce and toaster on it.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn to your right and stand in front of the loaf of bread on the counter.
Slice the tomato located to the right of the bread.
Turn to your left and walk around the island to stand in front of the sink.
Place the knife in the sink.
Turn to your right and walk around the island to stand in front of the sliced tomato next to the loaf of bread.
Pick up a tomato slice from the counter.
Turn to your left and walk around the island to stand in front of the sink.
Place the tomato slice in the sink, turn on the faucet to partially fill the sink with water, turn off the faucet, wash the tomato slice. drain the sink, pick up the tomato slice.
Turn to your right and walk around the island to stand in front of the microwave oven at the far end of the counter that the sliced tomato is on.
Open the microwave door, place the tomato slice on the left side of the plate with the egg on it in the microwave, close the door.
Walk forward and right to the kitchen counter by the stove
Pick up the knife by the lettuce from the kitchen counter
Turn right and walk a few feet then turn back left to face the counter
Cut the tomato on the counter with the knife
Turn left and walk all the way around the kitchen island to the sink
Put the knife in the sink
Turn around and walk back over to the kitchen counter on the other side of the island
Pick up a slice of tomato from the counter
Turn left and walk back around the kitchen island to the sink
Wash the tomato under water in the sink then remove it
Turn around and walk around the kitchen island to the microwave on the counter
Put the tomato slice in the microwave
go forward turn to the right
pick up a knife from the counter 
turn to the right go left
slice the tomato that is on the counter
turn to the left go left turn to the left go forward towards the sink
put the knife inside the sink
turn to the right go right turn to the right go left towards the counter 
pick up a slice of tomato from the counter
turn to the left go left turn to the left go right towards the sink
put the slice of tomato inside the sink
rinse off the slice of tomato turn to the right go right turn to the right go left towards the microwave
put the slice of tomato inside the microwave
Go to the white table to your left. 
Pick up the butter knife between the wine glass and the pump bottle, on the table. 
Turn around and go to the counter across from you, between the stove and the refrigerator.
Cut the potato on the back of the counter, to the right of the toaster, into slices. 
Move over to the left of the counter so that you are directly in front of the toaster. 
Put the knife on the right side of the counter, behind the wine glass. 
Move back over to your right, closer to the sliced potato. 
Pick up a potato slice from the counter. 
Go t the front of the refrigerator, to your right. 
Place the potato slice on the top shelf of the refrigerator, give it a moment to chill, then remove the potato slice from the refrigerator. 
Turn around and go back to the white table across from you. 
Place the potato slice on the table between the wine bottle and the ladle.
Turn left, move forward, then turn right to face the table.
Pick up the butter knife on the table, on top of the spoon.
Turn left, move forward, then turn left to face the counter adjacent to the fridge.
Slice the potato on the counter, to the right of the toaster.
Turn left, move forward, then turn right to face the counter.
Put the butter knife on the counter, to the right of the toaster.
Turn right, move forward, then turn left to face the counter.
Pick up a slice of potato.
Go to the fridge, to your right.
Chill the potato slice in the fridge.
Turn left, go forward, then turn left to approach the table.
Put the potato slice on the table, to the right of the wine bottle.
turn left and head to the table
pick up the knife
turn around and head for the table 
slice the potato on it
turn around and head for the table
drop the knife on the table
move right on the table
pick up a slice of potato
turn around to the fridge
cool the potato in the fridge
turn around to the table
place the potato on the table
Turn right and walk along the counter until you get to the counter left of the microwave.
Pick up the tan bowl on the counter.
Turn left and walk along the counter to the fridge on the right.
Place the bowl in the fridge, to the left of the leftmost black mug. Close the door, wait a moment, and take it out again.
Look up.
Put the bowl in the top right cabinet above the fridge, to the left of the clear bowl.
Turn right, go across the room, turn right and then turn left to face the bowl on the counter.
Pick up the bowl on the counter.
Turn left and go to the fridge.
Chill the bowl in the fridge and then take it back out.
Look up at the cabinet above the fridge.
Put the bowl in the right cabinet above the fridge.
walk to face counter top with brown cup
pick up cup from counter
walk to face fridge
chill and remove cup from fridge
gaze up to face cabinet above fridge
put cup inside cabinet
Turn around and go to the sink.
Pick up the right mug on the counter. 
Head to the left to the counter left of the stove. 
Put the the mug on the counter next to the trash can.
Pick up the fork from the counter. 
Put the fork in the mug. 
Turn right and walk to the sink. 
Pick up the cup closest to the spoon. 
Turn left and walk to the counter between the stove and trash bin. 
Place the cup on the counter. 
Pick up the fork behind the spatula. 
Place the fork in the cup. 
Move to the sink to the right of the stove.
Pick up the bowl from the left side of the sink.
Move to the left side of the stove before the bin.
Place the bowl on the counter to the left of the stove.
Pick up the fork from the same counter.
Place the fork inside the bowl on the counter.
Turn left, walk towards the door, before the table turn left, go to the space between the table and the fridge, face the round table.
Take the large knife from the table.
Cut the apple into pieces on the table.
Turn right, go straight, turn left, go to the wall, turn right to face the bin.
Put the knife in the bin.
Turn around, go back to the space between the fridge and the table, face the table.
Take a piece of apple.
Turn right, go to the microwave by the end of the counter.
Put the apple in the microwave, turn the microwave on, take the apple from the microwave.
Go to the bin to the left of the microwave.
Put the apple in the bin.
Turn around and go to the table in the corner.
Pick up the knife with the yellow handle.
Slice the apple that is closest to the knife and bowl into three pieces.
Turn to your right and go to the trash can.
Put the knife in the trash can.
Go back to the table.
Pick up one piece of the sliced apple.
Turn to your right and go to the microwave on the counter.
Microwave the apple and then pick it up again.
Go to the trash can on your left.
Throw away the apple.
Turn left, walk straight, turn left towards the round wooden table
Pick up the knife with the yellow handle
Cut the red apple on the table into slices
Turn right, walk straight, turn left, walk straight, turn right towards the trash bin
Put the knife inside the trash bin
Turn left, walk straight, turn right towards the round wooden table
Pick up the red slice of apple
Turn right, walk straight, turn left, turn right, walk straight towards the counter with a microwave
Open the microwave, put the apple inside, set the timer, close the microwave, take out the apple, close the microwave
Turn left and walk towards the trash can
Place the apple inside the trash can
Move to the sink to the left of you.
Pick up an apple from the sink.
Move to the bin behind you before the fridge on the right.
Place the apple inside of the bin.
Move to the microwave in front of you to the right slightly.
Retrieve the apple from the microwave and close the door.
Move to the bin to the left of you.
Place the apple inside of the bin.
Turn to the left and walk towards the sink and face it
Pick up the green apple from the sink
Turn around and walk to the trash bin next to the refrigerator and face it on the right
Place the apple inside the trash bin
Turn to the right and face the microwave
Open up the microwave and take out the apple, then close the door back
Turn to the left and face the trash bin next to the refrigerator
Place the apple inside the trash bin
Turn left and walk over to the kitchen sink.
Pick up the green apple off of the counter to the left of the sink.
Turn around and walk over to the small grey bin in between the counter and fridge.
Place the apple inside the small grey bin in front of the potato.
Turn right and begin walking to the sink, then turn left and walk up to the microwave.
Open the microwave and remove the green apple that is inside, then close the microwave door.
Turn around and take a step forward, then turn right and walk over to the small grey bin in between the counter and fridge.
Place the apple into the grey bin to the right of the apple that is already in there.
Turn to the left and walk straight towards the sink
Pick up the green apple from the sink 
Turn around and walk straight then face the right at the trash bin
Place the green apple inside the trash bin
Turn to the right and walk straight then turn left and face the microwave
Open the microwave and remove the green apple then close the door
Turn to the left and walk straight then face the trash bin on the right
Place the green apple inside the trash bin
Turn left and go to the counter to the left of the sink. 
Take the green apple behind the metal grater. 
Turn around and take the apple to the trash can between the refrigerator and the counter.
Put the apple in the trash can. 
Go right to the microwave above the middle of the counter. 
Take the apple out of the microwave.
Take the apple to the trash can between the refrigerator and the counter.
Put the apple into the trash can. 
Turn left, head towards the door, turn left towards the counter on your left, turn left to face the counter.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Take a step to the right.
Slice the tomato on the counter into several slices.
Turn right, walk towards the middle of the kitchen, turn left towards the stove, and then turn right towards the sink.
Place the knife in the sink.
Turn around and head towards the counter.
Pick up a slice of tomato from the counter.
Turn around and head towards the microwave on your left.
Open the microwave, place the slice in it, heat it up, and then take it out of the microwave.
Turn right towards the sink.
Place the slice tomato to the left of the apple in the sink.
turn to face the door, cross the room to beyond the stool, and turn left. Go forward until you are next to the counter. Turn to face the counter.
pick up the knife
move towards the refrigerator but stop when centered on the counter
slice the tomato with the knife
cross the room and go to the sink
place the knife in the sink
cross the room and return to where you sliced the tomato
take a slice of tomato
cross the room and go to the microwave
open the microwave door, place the tomato slice in the microwave, and close the door. Heat the tomato slice in the microwave for 3 seconds. Open the microwave door, and remove the tomato. Close the microwave door.
turn right to face the sink
place the tomato slice in the sink
Twist-turn around and take an left. Left again.
Take the knife only from the table.
Turn twist and step forward with the knife in hand.
Touch the red ball of yarn on the table.
turn right and then to the left.
Drop the knife on the counter.
turn right twist and and right along to the table.
Pick up the red egg only from the table.
Walk forward and to the left to the microwave .
You have to open the microwave door and put the egg in it.
Push the door closed and enter the green stamp button. Afterward take out the red egg and in hand.
Over the counter on the right drop the red egg in.
Back up, turn to the right to face the table. 
Pick up the knife with the yellow handle from the table.
Turn to the right walk forward and around to the other side of the table.
Back up and slice the potato that is to the left of the sponge.
Walk forward and then turn to the right and walk over to the microwave with knife in hand.
Open the microwave, place the knife inside, close the microwave door.
Turn to the right and walk back to the table.
Step back and grab a potato slice from the table. 
Walk forward, turn to the right, and walk to the refrigerator with potato slice in hand.
Open the refrigerator door, place potato slice on shelf, close the refrigerator door. Open the refrigerator door and remove the potato slice. Close the refrigerator door.
Back up and turn to the right, and walk over to the microwave with potato slice in hand.
Open the microwave door place the potato slice on the plate behind the knife, close the microwave door.
Turn right towards the round black table.
Pick up the sharp knife from the table.
Make your way clock wise around a quarter of the round black table and face it again.
Slice the potato next to the sponge.
Turn around to face the opposite direction and walk all the way across the room to the microwave on the counter.
Open the microwave, place the sharp knife inside, and close the door.
Turn around again and return to the black round table.
Pick up the end slice of the potato.
Turn to your right and approach the refrigerator just a step away.
Put the potato slice in the refrigerator to chill for a moment before removing it.
Take the potato slice to the microwave where the sharp knife was placed.
Put the potato slice into the microwave.
turn right to the table
pick up the knife
turn around the table
slice the potato on the table
turn around to the oven
place the knife in the oven 
turn around to the table
pick up an slice
head to the fridge
place the slice to cool and then take it out
turn  left to the oven 
place the slice in the oven
Turn around and cross the room to face the knife on the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn around and step forward to face the center table.
Cut the bread on the center table into slices.
Turn right and walk forward to face the fridge.
Place the knife in the fridge.
Turn around and walk forward and turn right to face the center table.
Pick up a slice of bread on the center table.
Turn right and walk forward to face the fridge.
Cool the bread slice in the fridge and remove it.
Turn around and walk around to face the trash can in the corner of the room.
Place the bread slice in the trash can.
Turn around, go to the counter 
Pick up the knife on the counter
Turn right, go forward, turn right at the table
Slice the bread on the table
Turn right, go forward, turn right and go to the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Turn right, go forward, turn right and go to the table
Pick up a bread slice from the table
Turn right, go forward, turn right and go to the fridge
Put the bread slice in the fridge, wait, pick up the bread slice from the fridge
Turn left, go forward, turn left go forward, turn right in front of the bin
Put the bread slice in the bin
Turn around and walk to the counter with the yellow-handled knife sitting in front of the toaster.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn to your right and walk to the end of the island that has an apple and fork on it.
Slice the loaf of bread located at the middle of the island.
Turn to your right and carry the knife to the fridge.
Open the fridge door, place the knife on the bottom shelf in front of the apple, close the door.
Turn to your right and walk to the end of the island that has an apple and fork on it.
Pick up the center slice of bread from the loaf.
Turn to your right and carry the bread slice to the fridge.
Open the fridge door and place the bread slice on the second shelf from the bottom, close the door; after cooling open the fridge door, pick up the bread slice, close the door.
Turn to your left and carry the slice of bread in the direction of the window, hang a left and walk to the blue bin on the floor at the far end of the counter.
Place the slice of bread in the blue bin.
Look around to find the knife.
On the counter pick up the knife beside the pan.
head towards the stove.
Put the knife at the baking sheet.
pick up the baking sheet on the counter. 
Look around and turn left facing the two apples.
Put the baking sheet to the counter beside the two apples. 
Turn around and walk across the room, then turn right and take one step, then turn left and face the counter. 
Pick up the knife that is next to the toaster on the counter. 
Take one step to the left and then turn to face the counter. 
Put the knife in the pan that is on the right side of the stove. 
Pick up the pan that is on the right side of the stove. 
Turn to the left and take one step, then turn right to face the counter. 
Put the pan down on the counter to the left of the apples. 
Turn to your left then cross the room head to the counter with toaster
Pick up the knife on the counter beside the toaster
Turn to your left then walk few step face the stove
Put the knife in the pan on the stove
Pick up the pan with knife
Turn to your left then make few steps until the end of the counter beside the fridge
Put the pan with knife on the counter beside the fridge
turn around and go to the right crossing the room towards the fridge and turn left to the counter
pick the knife on the counter up
turn around and go forward and to the right to the counter with the apple sitting on it.
cut the apple on the counter
turn to the right and go forward turning right to the fridge
open the fridge and set the knife on the shelf
close the door and turn right and go back to the counter
pick up an apple slice sitting on the counter
turn right and cross the kitchen to the microwave
open the microwave and place the apple inside turn it on for a second and then remove the apple and close the door
turn right and cross the room back to the counter
place the slice on the counter
Turn around and go to the counter on the right of the sink.
Pick up the gray knife on the counter. 
Turn around and go to the left side of the island.
Cut the apple on the counter into three parts.
Turn right and go to the refrigerator on the right. 
Place the knife on middle shelf in the refrigerator.
Turn right and go back to the island with the apple. 
Take one piece of apple from the counter.
Turn right to go to the microwave on the right. 
Remove the apple from the microwave after heating it. 
Turn right and go back to the island. 
Place the apple piece on the counter on the left of  the rest of the apple. 
Turn left, go to the fridge, turn right to the counter
Pick up the knife on the counter
Turn around, go forward, turn right at the table 
Cut the apple on the table 
Turn right, go forward, turn right at the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Turn right, go forward, turn right at the table 
Pick up an apple piece from the table 
Turn left, go forward, turn left at the microwave
Put the apple piece in the microwave, start the microwave, wait, pick up the apple piece from the microwave
Turn right, go forward, turn right at the table 
Put the apple piece on the table 
Turn right and walk to the rack of wooden shelves ahead.
Pick up the white mug from the middle shelf on the left side of the rack.
Turn around, hang a right at the counter and walk to the microwave on the counter ahead.
Put the mug inside the microwave on the plate, heat it for a few seconds, remove it and close the door.
Turn around and turn right at the counter to face the coffee maker.
Put the heated mug on the platform of the coffee maker on the counter.
Move forward to the wooden rack.
Pick up the mug on the rack. 
Turn around, bring the mug to the sink, turn right, bring the mug to the microwave on the counter, left of the fridge. 
Heat the mug in the microwave.
Bring the heated mug to the coffee machine on the counter behind you, next to the toaster. 
Put the heated mug on the coffee machine. 
Turn right and walk to the shelving unit.
Pick up the white mug on one of the shelves.
Turn around and walk to the counter, then turn right and walk to the microwave.
Heat the mug in the microwave.
Turn around and walk to the coffee maker on the counter.
Place the mug in the coffee maker.
Turn and go to the island counter where the plate and the loaf of bread are.
Pick up the potato that is behind the plate on the counter.
With the potato in hand turn and go to the microwave.
Open the microwave while holding the potato in the other hand and place to potato in the middle of the microwave. Close the door and start it.  When finished open the door and grab the potato.
With the potato in hand turn and go to the trash can so you are facing the window.
Place the potato in the trash can behind bottle.
Turn around, hang a left at the wall and turn left to face the counter.
Pick up the potato next to the plate on the counter.
Turn around and walk to the microwave on the counter to the left.
Put the potato inside the microwave, heat it, remove it and close the door.
Turn around, hang a right at the door and walk to the gray bin on the floor to the left.
Put the heated potato inside the gray bin on the floor.
Turn around and walk along the kitchen island, turning left at the end and turning to face the island.
Pick up the potato next to the kettle on the counter.
Turn right and walk to the microwave.
Heat the potato in the microwave.
Turn around and walk to the white door, then turn right and walk to the gray trash bin.
Place the potato in the trash bin.
Turn to the right, go across the room to the black table that is on the right. 
Pick up the potato that is on the table. 
Turn around, go to the stove, hang a left, go to the garbage can, hang a right, go to the microwave.
Put the potato in the microwave and turn it on, remove cooked potato from the microwave.
Turn to the left, go forward, turn to the left, go forward to the black table that is on the right.
Put the potato on the table in front of the salt.
Take a step forward then hang a right and walk over to the white table, turn right and walk up to the black shelving unit to the left of the counter.
Pick up the sweet potato off of the black shelving unit.
Walk over to the microwave in the far corner of the room behind you.
Microwave the sweet potato for a couple seconds then take it out of the microwave and close the door.
Turn left and walk forward, then hang a left and walk over to the white table, then turn right and walk up to the black shelving unit.
Put the heated sweet potato on the front right corner of the top of the black shelving unit.
Turn right and head to the black shelf on your right 
Pick up the potato on the shelf
Turn around walk across the room and head to the microwave
Open the microwave and put in and out the potato then close the microwave
Turn around to your left then head to the black shelf
Put the potato on the edge of the black shelf
Turn left then head to the counter on your left
Pick up the ladle beside the coffee maker on the counter
Turn right then face the cabinet above the sink
Open the cabinet put the ladle on the pan 
Pick up the pan with ladle 
Turn left and face the counter
Put the pan with ladle on the counter
Turn around and head to the counter on the right side of the dishwasher.
Pick up the spoon from behind the apple off the top of the counter.
Turn to the right and go to the front of the sink.
Open the cabinet and place the spoon inside the pan. 
Take the pan out and close the door.
Turn left and move back to the end of the counter.
Place the pan to the left of the soup spoon on the shelf above the counter.
Turn around and go to the end of the counter, make a right and go to the stove, then turn left and go to the counter across from you. 
Pick up the ladle on the counter top. 
Turn to the cabinets above the sink, on your right. 
Place the ladle in the pan, that is in the top cabinet. 
Pick up the pan with the ladle inside it. 
Turn to your left and go back to the counter top the ladle was on. 
Place the pan with the ladle inside it on the back, raised counter top, to the left of the spoon. 
Take one step then turn to the right and face the table.
Pick up the dirty bowl that is in the middle of the table.
Turn around and walk to the sink. 
Put the bowl in the sink, turn the water on for three seconds to fill the bowl, then turn the water off and take the bowl.
Turn around and take one step, then turn left and walk to the stove.
Look up and put the bowl in the microwave.
Walk forward then turn right and walk up to the island.
Pick up the leftmost dirty bowl off of the island.
Walk over to the sink behind you.
Put the dirty bowl in the sink and turn on the water, after a couple seconds turn the water off and remove the now clean bowl full of water.
Walk over to the oven that is to your right and look up at the microwave.
Put the clean bowl of water in the microwave and close the microwave door.
look down at the floor and walk forward and stop mid table turn right 
pick up the square dish from the table 
turning to the right turn around and walk towards the sink 
place the dish into the sink and rinse with water pick the clean dish back up 
turn to the right turn all  the way around then back to the left  walk towards the stove and open the microwave 
place the dish in the microwave 
Turn around and walk towards the sink, hang a right and walk towards the microwave oven.
Pick up the pan located to the left of the microwave oven.
Turn around and walk to the front of the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator door and place the pan, with its handle pointing right, onto the top shelf and to the right of the tomato.
Pick up the egg on the bottom shelf of the refrigerator.
Place the egg in the pan on the top shelf.
Turn around, and to the right to find the microwave.
Pick up the plate from the counter, on the left side of the microwave.
Take a step to the right and face the fridge.
Open the fridge, and place the plate inside.
Take the egg out of the fridge.
Place the egg on the plate inside the fridge.
Turn around and stand in front of the microwave.
Pick up the pan to the left of the microwave.
Go to the fridge.
Put the pan in the fridge.
Pick up an egg from the fridge.
Put the egg in the pan.
Look down and turn around and go towards the sink and then turn right and walk to the microwave.
Pick up the cooking pan to the left of the microwave.
Turn right and then turn left at the fridge
open the fridge and put the pan inside of it
Pick up the egg from the bottom shelf
Put the egg into the pan in the fridge
Turn around and go to the microwave.
Pick up that plate that is on the counter to the left of the microwave.
With the plate turn around and go to the fridge.
Open the fridge.  Place the plate on the top shelf to the right of the tomato.
Pick up the egg that is on the second shelf to the left of the tomato.
Place the egg on the plate that is on the top shelf to the right of the tomato.
Turn around and take a step then turn left to face the microwave.
Take the potato out of the microwave.
Look up at the cupboard above the microwave.
Open the cupboard above the microwave and put the potato in the glass bowl that's up there.
Grab the bowl with the potato and close the door.
Look back down at the microwave.
Put the bowl with the potato in it in the microwave.
Turn around, take a step, turn left, open the microwave.
Take the potato out of the microwave, close the microwave. 
Open the cabinet door above the microwave. 
Put the potato in the bowl in the cabinet. 
Take the bowl with the potato out of the cabinet, close the cabinet. 
Lower the bowl to the counter.
Open the microwave, put the bowl in the microwave, close the microwave door. 
Turn around and walk to the microwave that is to the right of the fridge.
Open the microwave, take out the potato that is in the microwave, and shut the microwave door.
Holding the potato, look at the white cabinet above the microwave.
Open the cabinet and put the potato inside of the glass bowl that is sitting in the cabinet.
Take out the bowl with the potato and shut the cabinet door.
Look down at the microwave below the white cabinet next to the fridge.
Open the microwave, place the bowl with potato inside the microwave, then shut the microwave door.
Turn right and move towards the circular table, then turn right and go to the small black table to the left of the white table.
Pick up the spoon on the small black table.
Turn around and move to the coffee pot and turn left and face the counter between the sink and the stove.
Open the cupboard below this portion of the counter, place the spoon into the mug in the cupboard.
Pick up the mug with the spoon in it, closing the cupboard.
Turn around and move to the opposite side of the room, then turn right and move to face the small black table.
place the mug with the spoon in it on the small black table.
Turn right and walk over to the black table, then turn right and walk over to the black shelving unit to the left of the white table.
Pick up the metal spoon off of the black shelving unit.
Turn right and walk towards the fridge, then hang a right and walk over to the counter, turn left and walk up to the counter and look down.
Open the cabinet door below the counter and put the spoon in the white mug that is in the cabinet.
Pick up the white mug with the spoon in it out of the cabinet and close the cabinet door.
Turn around and walk back over to the black shelving unit in the corner of the room.
Put the white mug with the spoon in it on the top of the black shelving unit.
Turn right and go towards the wall, then turn right to go to the black table.
Pick up the spoon on the black table.
Turn right and move forward, then turn right to go toward the coffee maker, then turn left to go to the counter ahead.
Open the cabinet beneath the counter and put the spoon inside the mug located in the cabinet.
Take the mug from the cabinet.
Turn around and return to the black table.
Put the mug on the black table.
Walk over to the microwave
Grab the plate out of the cabinet
Walk over to the sink
Clean the plate
Walk over to the fridge
Put the plate in the fridge
Turn right, head left to the counter and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the left upper cabinet above the microwave, pick up the black plate inside and close the door.
Turn around and walk to the sink on the left.
Put the black plate inside the sink, rinse it for a few seconds and pick it back up.
Turn around and walk to the black fridge on the right.
Put the rinsed plate on the bottom shelf to the left of the clear container inside the fridge and close the door.
Head past the fridge, turn left to face the microwave.
Take the dirty plate out of the cabinet above the microwave. 
Turn around, bring the dirty plate to the sink on the left.
Wash the plate in the sink. 
Bring the cleaned plate to the fridge on the left.
Put the cleaned plate in the fridge.
Turn left and head to the counter with microwave
Pick up the bread knife on the counter beside the microwave
Turn left the head to the sink
Slice the cabbage in the sink
Turn right then head to the fridge 
Open the fridge put in the bread knife
Turn left head to the sink 
Pick up a slice of cabbage 
Turn right head to the fridge
Open the fridge put in and out the cabbage
Turn right head to the trash bin
Put the slice cabbage in the trash bin
Turn around and face the counter near the microwave on your right.
Take the knife from the counter in front of you.
Turn left and face the sink with the lettuce in front of you.
Slice the lettuce in the sink in front of you.
Turn around and face the fridge to your left.
Place the knife in the fridge in front of you and close the fridge.
Turn left and face the sink in front of you.
Take a lettuce slice from the sink in front of you.
Turn around and face the fridge on your left.
Place the lettuce slice in the fridge in front of you, take the lettuce out and close it.
Turn around and face the green bin in front of you.
Place the lettuce in the green bin in front of you.
Turn left and step forward to face the counter to the left of the stove.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn left to face the sink.
Cut the lettuce in the sink into slices.
Turn around and walk forward to face the fridge.
Place the knife in the fridge.
Turn left and walk across the room to face the sink.
Pick up a slice of lettuce in the sink.
Turn around and walk forward to face the fridge.
Cool the slice of lettuce in the fridge and then remove it.
Turn around and step forward to face the trash can.
Place the slice of lettuce in the trash can.
Turn left and head to the stove.
Pick up the pot on the stove.
Turn around, go across the room, turn right and go to the table.
Put the pot on the table to the left of the fork.
Turn right and go to the apple on the table.
Pick up the apple from the table.
Turn right and go back to the pot on the table.
Put the apple in the pot on the table.
Move to the right and face the table.
Pick up the knife on the table.
Turn left and go back to the pot on the table.
Cut the apple in the pot on the table.
Turn around and face the stove.
Grab the big pot off the stove.
Turn around and walk straight, then turn right to the table.
Place the pot to the left of the fork.
Move right further down the table.
Grab the apple off of the table.
Walk back to where the pot is
Place the apple inside the pot
Head back to where the apple used to be.
Grab the knife from the table.
Head back to where the pot is once more.
Slice the apple that's in the pot.
Turn around and step forward to face the stove.
Pick up the pot on the stove.
Turn left and walk across the room to face the left end of the table.
Place the pot on the table.
Step to the right to face the table.
Pick up the apple on the table.
Step to the left to face the pot on the table.
Place the apple in the pot on the table.
Look right to face the knife on the table.
Pick up the knife on the table.
Step left to face the pot on the table.
Cut the apple in the pot into three pieces.
Turn right and go around the counter to the other side.
Pick up the knife in front of the lettuce on the counter.
Move to the left and turn toward the counter.
Cut the potato on the counter.
Go right and then turn left to the lettuce.
Put the knife on the counter in front of the lettuce.
Turn right and go back to the sliced potato.
Pick up a slice of potato.
Turn around and go to the fridge.
Chill the slice of potato in the fridge and pick it back up.
Turn around, go across the room, turn left, go toward the door and then turn right to the trash can.
Put the slice of potato in the trash can.
go to the counter
pick up the yellow-handled knife
take the knife to the potato on the counter
slice the potato
take the knife to the counter to the right of the sink
put the knife on the counter
go back to the counter with the potato
pick up one slice
take the slice to the fridge
chill the slice in the fridge then remove
take the slice to the trash bin
put the slice in the bin
Walk to the stove and turn left to face the counter.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Walk over to the left to the potato.
Slice the potato with the knife.
Go back to where the knife came from.
Put the knife back on the counter.
Walk back to the potato slices.
Pick up a potato slice off of the counter.
Walk over to the fridge.
Place the potato in the fridge and take it back out.
Take the slice of potato to the black trash can by the door.
Place the potato in the trash can.
Go right to the counter with the coffee maker.
Take a potato from the bin under the counter.
Turn around, go to the black stand to the left of the white table.
Put the potato on the bottom right corner of the stand.
Go right to the white table.
Take the yellow handle knife from the table.
Go left to the black stand.
Cut the potato on the stand into slices.
Turn right, go to the counter to the left of the oven.
Cut the potato on the stand into slices.
Put the knife on the counter in front of the potato.
Take a slice of potato from the counter.
Turn around, go to the door, turn right, go to the black stand.
Put the slice of potato on the black stand to the left of the other potato.
Walk towards the counter
Pick up potato from plastic bin under the counter
Walk with potato towards small table on the corner
Set potato in the corner table
Walk towards white table
Pick up yellow knife from white table
Walk with yellow knife towards small table in the corner
Slice potato on the small corner table
Walk with knife towards counter next to stove
Slice potato on counter next to stove
Put knife on counter with the 
Take a slice of potato from the potato
Walk with the slice of potato towards the small corner table
Set the slice of potato on the corner table
Turn right and head towards the green bin beneath the counter.
Pick up the plum from the bin.
Turn around and head towards the small black table next to the wall.
Place the plum on the right corner closest to you.
Turn right, head towards the end of the white table, turn left and face the yellow knife on the table.
Pick up the yellow knife from the table.
Turn left and head towards the black table on your right.
Slice the plum on the table into several slices.
Turn right and head towards the counter to the right of the fridge.
Slice the plum on the counter into several slices.
Place the knife on the counter.
Pick up a slice of plum from the counter.
Turn around and head towards the small black table to  your right.
Place the slice of plum to the right of the spoon on the table.
Turn around and move to the counter with the microwave.
Pick up the potato on the counter. 
Bring the potato over to the microwave.
Heat the potato in the microwave.
Bring the heated potato to the trash can left of the microwave. 
Put the heated potato in the trash can. 
Turn right, turn right again, cross room to face the microwave.
Pick up potato from counter to right of microwave.
Walk to microwave and face it, put potato in microwave, turn microwave on.
Remove potato from microwave.
Turn left, walk to garbage can, face garbage can.
Put potato in garbage can.
Turn around and go to the counter next to the stove.
Pick up the potato in front of the apple.
Turn to the left and walk to the microwave on the right.
Cook the potato in the microwave and get it out.
Turn left and walk towards the wall, then turn left to face the trash can.
Put the potato in the trash can.
Turn right to go to the near corner of the window on your left, then right again and go forward to the counter between the stove and the sink.
Pick up the ladle from the back of the counter near the stove.
Take the ladle to the sink to your left.
Wash the ladle in the sink.
Turn to your left and go forward until you reach the counter that was on your left.
Put the ladle away in the lower right cabinet that is in the corner to the right of the white dishwasher.
Turn to your right walk straight then cross the room go to the left side of the stove
Pick up the ladle on the counter
Turn to your left move forward then turn right
Put the ladle in the sink and rinse it
Pick up the ladle then turn left then head to the second right cabinet beside the washer
Open the cabinet then put in the ladle then close the cabinet
Cross the room and stand in front of the counter to the left of the stove.
Pick the big spoon up from the counter.
Move left and turn to face the sink.
Put the big spoon in the sink and turn the water on and then off and pick the spoon up again.
Turn to face to the left lower cabinets, to the right of the white appliance.
Open the cabinet door of the far right cabinet in the corner and put the spoon in and then shut the door.
Turn around and walk in the direction of the sink, hang a left to the counter to the left of the stove.
Pick up the tomato located on the counter adjacent to the left front burner of the stove.
Turn around and walk to the microwave oven.
Open the microwave door, place the tomato in the right side, close the door, turn the microwave on; after it turns off, open the door, pick up the tomato, close the door.
Turn to the counter to the right of the sink.
Place the tomato at the front of the counter near to the sink.
Turn around and walk to the sink then turn left and walk to the counter
Pick up the tomato on the left that is sitting next to the stove
Turn around and walk to the microwave
Open the microwave and place the tomato inside, close the door and turn it on. Then open the microwave and pick up the tomato and close the door
Turn to your left and face the counter to the right of the sink
Place the tomato on the counter
Turn around and walk over to the counter, then turn left and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the tomato off of the counter.
Turn around and walk over to the microwave.
Put the tomato in the microwave and heat it up for a couple seconds then take it out.
Turn left to face the counter.
Put the heated tomato on the front edge of the counter to the right of the sink.
Turn left to move to the fridge, then head right and continue to the far end of the counter by the microwave.
Pick up the butter knife from the counter.
Turn around and carry the knife to the fridge.
Open the fridge and slice the apple on the shelf with the knife.
Carry the knife to stand in front of the stove, which is right of the fridge.
Place the knife in the pan on the back right burner.
Turn left to return back to the fridge.
Remove a slice of apple from the fridge.
Carry the apple slice to the stove on your right.
Place the apple slice in the pan on the front right corner of the stove.
Pick up the pan with the apple slice in it.
Turn left and carry the pan to the fridge, then turn left again to face the round kitchen table.
Place the pan with the apple in it on the table.
Go to the counter to the left of the microwave.
Pick up the butter knife on the counter.
Turn and go to the fridge.
Slice the apple on the shelf in the fridge.
Turn and go to the stove.
Put the butter knife in the pan on the back right burner.
Turn and go back to the fridge.
Pick up a slice of apple from the fridge.
Go back to the stove.
Set the apple slice down in the pan on the front right burner.
Pick up the pan with the apple slice in it.
Go to the round table.
Set the pan with the apple slice down on the table.
go to counter to the left of microwave
pick up knife in front of paper towels from counter
turn around, go to white refrigerator to the right
open refrigerator, slice yellow apple on top shelf of refrigerator
go to stove to the right
place knife in pan on back right burner of stove
go to refrigerator to the left
pick up apple slice from top shelf of refrigerator, close refrigerator
go to stove to the right
place apple slice in pan on front right burner of stove
pick up pan with apple slice from stove
turn left, go to the right of chair by round dining table
place pan with apple slice in front of dispenser on table 
Walk over to the head of lettuce you see in front of you.
Open the cabinet door above the head of lettuce and grab the wine bottle before closing the door.
Turn right and walk to the sink then turn right and walk to the wall. and turn left
Put the wine bottle in the black garbage can.
Turn around and take a step then turn right and walk to the counter in front of you.
Open the cupboard door hanging on the wall to your right and grab the wine bottle you see there.
Walk back over to the garbage where you put the first bottle.
Put this bottle in the garbage next to the other.
Go straight towards the counter to the left of the oven.
Take the green bottle from the cabinet above the counter.
Turn right and go straight, at the sink turn right, go straight to the wall, turn left to face the black bin next to the fridge.
Put the bottle in the bin.
Turn left, go straight to the counter to the right of the oven.
Take the green bottle from the cabinet on the right above the counter.
Turn around, go straight to the wall, turn left to face the black bin next to the fridge.
Put the bottle in the bin.
Go toward the left to the lettuce next to the stove 
Open the cabinet on top of the lettuce and pick up the big bottle. 
Go to the right, turn right at the end of the path, go straight and turn to the left toward the trash can. 
Put the bottle inside the trash can. 
Turn around, go to the right and walk straight to the white cabinet with of a little blue bottle on it. 
Open the cabinet on top of the blue bottle and grab the big bottle. 
Turn around and walk straight back to the trash can. 
Put the bottle inside the trash can. 
Move to the counter above the dishwasher.
Pick up the butter knife on the counter.
Move over to the right to the sink.
Set the butter knife in the cup in the sink.
Pick up the cup with the butter knife in it.
Go to the counter to the right of the microwave.
Set the cup with the butter knife down on the counter.
Approach the counter in front of you.
Pick up the the knife on the counter.
Turn to your right and walk to the the sink.
Place the knife in the cup in the sink.
Pick up the the cup in the sink.
Turn to your left and approach the counter on the left of the sink.
Place the cup on the counter to the left of the sink.
Turn left and take a step forward, then turn right and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the butter knife off of the counter.
Turn right and walk towards the oven, then turn right to face the sink.
Put the butter knife handle down into the brown cup that is in the sink basin.
Pick up the brown cup with the butter knife in it.
Turn left and walk towards the wall, then turn right to face the counter.
Put the brown cup with the butter knife in it on the counter.
Walked over to the dishwasher. 
Picked up a knife from the counter
Took knife to kitchen sink.
Placed knife in cup in the kitchen sink.
Removed cup from kitchen sink
Walked over to dishwasher
Placed cup on the counter. 
Take a step left.
Pick the knife up off the counter.
Take a couple steps right to the sink.
Put the knife in the brown glass.
Pick up the glass with the knife in it.
Take a step left to your original position.
Place the stack of items on the counter in front of the bread.
Look around then stand in front of the knife on the counter.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Walk over to the sink.
Put the knife inside the glass in the sink.
Pick up the glass from the sink.
Walk over to the counter near the loaf of bread.
Place the glass on the counter.
Turn right and go to the counter on the left
Pick up the gray plate from the counter
Turn right and go to the refrigerator
Open the refrigerator and put the plate on the top shelf
Pick up the tomato from the refrigerator
Put the tomato on top of the gray plate
Turn right and go forward, turn left at the fridge, then go forward to the counter.
Pick up the plate from the counter.
Turn around and go to the fridge ahead
Open the fridge and put the plate inside.
Pick up the tomato in the fridge.
Put the tomato on the plate in the fridge.
Move to the counter of ahead of you, on the right, right of the toaster.
Pick up the gray plate on the counter. 
Turn around, bring the plate to the fridge.
Open the bottom of the fridge, put the plate on the top shelf in the fridge.
Pick up the tomato in the fridge.
Put the tomato on the plate in the fridge. 
Turn left and move to the left sink.
Open the bottom left cabinet door under the sink and remove the front left salt shaker from the cabinet.
Turn right and face the counter with the microwave.
Put the salt shaker on the counter to the right of the water bottle.
Turn right  and move to the cabinet under the right side of the microwave.
Take the salt shaker out of the cabinet.
Turn left and go back to the counter on the left side of the microwave.
Set the second salt shaker on the counter to the left of the other salt shaker.
Turn left, move to the counter in front of the sink.
Pick up the salt from the cabinet below the sink.
Turn right, move to the counter to the right of the sink.
Place the salt on the counter.
Turn right, move to the counter in front of the microwave.
Pick up the salt from the cabinet below the microwave.
Turn left, move to the counter to the right of the sink.
Place the salt on the counter.
Turn and go to the sink.
Take a container out of the cabinet under the sink.
Turn and go to the counter by the sink.
Put the container on the counter.
Turn and go to the microwave.
Take a container out of the cabinet under the microwave.
Turn and go to the counter by the sink.
Put the container on the counter.
turn right and walk to the kitchen counter ahead
grab a knife off of the kitchen counter there
turn around and walk over to the end of the room, then hang a left and walk to the white table ahead
slice up the lettuce on the table there
back up a bit and then face the white table ahead of you again
place the knife down on the table there
move forwards a bit to the right side of the table
grab a lettuce slice off of the table
turn around and walk to the table ahead, then take a right and walk over to the stove at the end of the room
place a lettuce slice in the pot on the back right burner
pick up the pot off of the back right burner
turn right and walk over to the kitchen counter on your left to the right of the kitchen sink
place the pot down on the kitchen counter on your right
Turn 90 degrees to the right and face the counter.
Pick up the knife laying on top of the phone.
Holding the knife, turn 270 degrees and exit the kitchen, walking towards the door.  Then, turn left to face the table nearest the door. 
Slice the green vegetable on the table that is on the right hand side of the black cup.
Turn 180 degrees, take a step away from the table, then turn 180 degrees to face the table again.
Toss the knife onto the table to the right of the sliced green vegetable.
Go closer to the table again, near the knife and sliced green vegetable.
Pick up one slice of the green vegetable, the slice on the right end to the left of the top of the vegetable.
Holding the slice, turn around 180 degrees and move forward a few steps, then turn right 90 degrees and walk straight into the kitchen to the stove top.
Put the slice of vegetable into the black pot that is sitting on the back right burner on the stove top.  
Pick up the pot with the slice in it.
Turn right 90 degrees, walk past the sink on your left, then turn left 90 degrees to face the counter.
Put the pot down on the counter top to the right of the sink and left of the sponge.
Turn left and face the counter
Pick up the knife that is on the counter
Turn around and head to the table that is across the room to your right
Slice the lettuce that is sitting on the table
Turn around and take a step then turn back around and face the white table
Place the knife on the table to the right of the sliced lettuce
Take a step to the right and then step closer to the white table
Pick up a slice of lettuce
Turn around and walk to the white table across the room then turn right and walk to the stove.
Place the slice of lettuce in to the pot that is sitting on the back right burner of the stove
Pick up the pot on the back right burner of the stove that contains the lettuce
Turn to your right and walk to the counter top that is to the right of the sink. 
Place the pot containing the lettuce on the counter top
Turn right to face the counter.
Pick up the knife laying on the counter.
Turn around and walk across the room to the right to face the table.
Cut the lettuce on the table into slices.
Step back from the table and face it.
Put the knife on the table.
Step closer to the table and face the lettuce.
Pick up a slice of the lettuce.
Turn to the left and walk across the room to face the stove
Place the lettuce slice into the pot on the back right burner.
Pick up the pot with the lettuce slice in it off of the back right burner.
Step to the right and face the counter to the right of the sink.
Place the pot with lettuce slice in it on the counter to the right of the sink.
Turn  to your right and face the kitchen counter.
Pick up the knife the right of the plate.
Turn around and walk to the other side of the room, then make a left until you reach the white table
Slice the lettuce to the right of the mug.
Turn around to face the table on the opposite side of the room, then face the white table again.
Place the knife down on the table, to the right of the lettuce.
Make a right turn and face the door, then return to face the white table.
Pick up one slice of lettuce.
Turn around to face the table on the opposite side of the room, then proceed straight to the stove top.
Place the lettuce in the pot to the right of the tea kettle.
Pick up the pot with the lettuce.
Turn to the right and face the counter top above the dishwasher.
Place the pot on the counter top above the dishwasher
Turn right, move to the counter opposite the stove.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn right, move to the counter left of the refrigerator.
Slice the potato on the counter.
Turn right, move to the counter, right of the dishwasher.
Put the knife on the counter.
Turn left, move to the counter left of the refrigerator.
Pick up a slice of potato.
Turn right, move to in front of the stove.
Put the potato slice into the microwave, cook it, pick it back up.
Turn right, move to the counter, right of the dishwasher.
Put the potato slice on the counter, right of the knife.
Turn to the right and walk towards the dishwasher, then turn right again and face the counter
Pick up the knife that is sitting on the counter
Turn right and cross the room to the counter top, the one with the two spatulas
Slice the potato that is sitting on the counter top  to the left of the bowl
Turn around and cross the room to the dishwasher
Place the knife on the counter above the dishwasher
Turn around and cross the room to the counter top, the one with the two spatulas and sliced potato
Pick up a slice of the potato
Turn around and cross the room then turn left and walk to the microwave that is above the stove
Open the microwave and place the slice of potato inside to the right of the egg then close the door and turn it on.  Open the microwave and pick up the slice of potato and then close the door 
Turn around and cross the room, hang right and walk to the counter top above the dishwasher
Place the cooked potato slice on the counter top to the right of the knife
Go to the end of the counter
Pick up the knife
Go to the counter left of the fridge
Cut the potato on the counter
Go to the counter right of the dishwasher
Put the knife down
Go to the sliced potato
Take a potato slice
Go to the microwave
Heat the potato slice
Go to the counter right of the dishwasher
Put the potato slice down
Walk over to the section of counter to the right of the sink.
Pick up the sponge off of the counter in front of you.
Look up to face the counter.
Put the sponge into the metal pan on the counter.
Pick up the metal pan with sponge in it off of the counter.
Turn left and walk over to the sink.
Put the metal pan with the sponge in it into the sink.
Turn right and take two steps then turn left and walk to the counter with the sponge on it.
Pick up the sponge that's in front of you.
Look at the frying pan.
Put the sponge in the frying pan to your right please.
Pick up the frying pan with the sponge in it.
Move to your left until you're in front of the sink.
Put the frying pan with the sponge in it in the sink.
Turn to the right, go towards the garbage can, hang a left and go to the counter at the other end of the room.
Pick up the sponge that is on the counter. 
Move forward towards the counter. 
Put the sponge in the pan that is on the counter. 
Pick up the pan containing the sponge from the counter. 
Hang a left, go to the sink that is on the right.
Put the pan in the sink.
Turn around and stop at the counter to the right of the fridge
Grab the knife that's on the counter
Stand up straight in front of the counter
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices
Turn slightly to the right
Put the knife down in the bowl
Turn slightly to the right
Grab one of the tomato slices
Turn around and head to the microwave
Heat the tomato in the microwave. Take the tomato out of the microwave.
Turn left and stop at the coffee maker
Put the tomato on the counter in front of the coffee maker
Turn around and head towards the counter.
Grab the knife off the counter.
Face the tomato.
Cut the tomato into slices.
Face the counter.
Put the knife back down.
Face the tomato.
Pick up a slice of tomato.
Turn around and head towards the microwave.
Put the tomato in the microwave, cook it, and take it out.
Turn and face the the counter to the left of you.
Put the tomato on the counter.
Turn around to face the counter to the left of the fridge.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Face the tomato on the counter.
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices.
Take a step to the right and face the pan on the counter.
Put the knife on the pan on the counter.
Step to the left and face the tomato on the counter.
Pick up a slice of a tomato on the counter.
Turn around and walk across the room to face the microwave.
Heat the tomato slice in the microwave and then remove it.
Take a step to the left and face the counter to the left of the sink.
Place the tomato slice on the counter.
Turn to the right, take a step, then turn right and walk forward to face the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Focus on the tomato.
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices.
Turn right, take a step, then turn to the left to face the pan on the counter.
Put the knife in the pan.
Turn to the left, take a step, then turn to the right to face the pan on the counter.
Pick up a tomato slice laying on the counter.
Turn to the right, take a step, then turn right and walk across the room and face the microwave.
Open the microwave, put the tomato slice inside, , close the microwave, heat the tomato slice, open microwave, remove tomato slice, close microwave.
Turn around, take a step, then turn to the right, take a step, then turn right to face the counter.
Put the tomato slice on the counter.
Turn around, go forward to the counter where the toaster is.
Pick up the knife that is on the counter. 
Turn around, hang a right and go to the sink. 
Cut the potato that is in the right side of the sink into slices.
Turn to the left and go to the microwave.
Put the knife inside the microwave.
Turn around, go to the sink with the potato in it that is on the left. 
Pick up a slice of potato from inside the sink.
Turn to the left and go to the microwave.
Put the potato inside the microwave and turn it on to cook, remove the potato once it is done cooking.
Turn to the left, go across the room, hang a left and go to the fridge.
Put the potato inside the fridge.
go to the counter to the right of the sink
pick up the knife from the counter
take the knife to the sink
cut the potato in the sink with the knife
take the knife to the microwave
cook the knife in the microwave
walk back to the sink
pick up one slice of potato from the sink
take the slice to the microwave
cook the slice in the microwave then remove
take the slice to the fridge
put the potato slice in the fridge
Turn around to face the counter where the toaster is.
Pick up the knife from the countertop.
Turn left to walk to the sink.
Slice the potato in the sink with the knife.
Turn left to walk to the microwave.
Put the knife in the microwave.
Turn right to walk to the sink.
Pick up a slice of potato from the sink.
Turn left to walk to the microwave.
Heat up the potato in the microwave, taking it out afterwards.
Turn around and make your way to the fridge across the room.
Put the potato slice in the fridge.
Move to the middle of the counter to the left of the stove.
Pick up a wine bottle from the counter.
Move to the fridge behind you.
Place and chill the bottle in the fridge before retrieving and closing the door.
Move to the bin behind you on the left side of the counter.
Place the bottle in the bin.
Turn to the left and turn again to face the counter with the bottle on it.
Pick the bottle up from the counter.
Turn around and face the fridge.
Put the bottle in the fridge, shut the door and then open the door and pick up the bottle.
Turn around and walk to face the red trash bin.
Put the bottle in the trash bin.
Turn to your left, walk towards the stove, stop and turn left at the wine bottle on the countertop.
Pick up the wine bottle  on the counter.
Turn around and carry the wine bottle to the fridge.
Open the fridge door and place the bottle on the top shelf of the fridge and close the fridge door; after cooling, open the fridge door, pick up the wine bottle, close the fridge door.
Turn around and walk to the brown bin on the floor to the left of the counter with the toaster on it.
Place the wine bottle inside the brown bin to the back end of the bin nearest the wall and behind the white bottle in the bin.
Turn left and go to the counter to the right of the toaster.
Pick up the wine bottle.
Turn around and go to the fridge.
Chill the wine and then take it out of the fridge.
Turn around and go to the trash can.
Throw away the wine bottle.
turn left, walk into kitchen, turn left until facing counter with wine bottle and two plates
pick up wine bottle
turn right until facing fridge, walk over to fridge
open door, put bottle on top shelf, close door, wait, open door, pick up wine bottle again
turn right and face red garbage can, walk over to garbage can
put wine bottle in garbage can 
Turn around and walk in the direction of the oven.
Stop and turn left at the wine bottle.
Pick up the wine bottle, turn around and carry it to the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator door, place the bottle on the right side of the top shelf near the front edge of the shelf, close the refrigerator door; open the refrigerator door and pick up the wine bottle, close the door.
Turn around and carry the wine bottle to the brown receptacle on the floor directly to the left of the counter with the toaster.
Place the wine bottle towards the inside of the receptacle nearest the wall with the window.
Turn around, go past the counter, and turn right to go to the sink.
Remove the potato on the sink.
Turn left and go to the microwave above the stove.
Heat the potato in the microwave.
Turn around and go left, past the counter, and around to the table.
Place the potato on the counter, to the right of the book and to the left of the bowl.
walk on over to the kitchen sink
grab the potato off of the left sink
turn a bit and walk over to the stove
put the potato in the microwave above the stove too cook, then take it back out
turn around and walk over to the kitchen table
place the cooked potato on top of the table
Move to the sink.
Pick up the potato on the sink. 
Bring the potato to the microwave. 
Heat the potato in the microwave. 
Bring the potato to the table. 
Put the potato on the table next to the book. 
Go to the right side of the white table.
Pick up the gray knife on the right side towards the back.
Move over to the tomato between the chef knife and the grater. 
Slice the tomato on the table.
Turn around and go to the cabinet to the right of the stove.
Place the knife inside the cabinet
Turn around back to the white table.
Pick up a slice of a tomato. 
Turn around and go to the refrigerator on the right.
Chill the tomato slice inside and take it out. 
Turn left to go to the microwave on the counter. 
Place the tomato slice inside the microwave.
Turn right and go to the right of the white table
Grab the butter knife off of the table
Move slightly to the left and look down at the table
Cut the tomato on the table into slices
Turn around and face the cabinets at the bottom
Put the knife in the bottom left cabinet
Turn around and face the white table
Grab a slice of the tomato
Turn around and go to the fridge
Put the tomato in the fridge and close the fridge. Open the fridge and take out the tomato.
Turn around and go to the microwave
Put the tomato in the microwave
turn right to the table
pick up the knife 
turn around to the tomato
slice the tomato with the knife
turn around to the cupboard 
drop the knife in it
turn around to the slice
pick up a tomato slice
lead to the fridge
place the tomato to cool and then take it out
turn around and head to the microwave
place the tomato in the microwave
Turn right, go to the dishwasher to the right of the sink.
Take the knife from the counter above the dishwasher.
Turn left, go straight to the wall, turn left to face the round black table.
Cut the bread next to the apple into slices.
Move over left while facing towards the table.
Put the knife to the left of the black bowl.
Move over right while facing towards the table.
Take a slice of bread from the table.
Turn left, go to the microwave on the other side of the room.
Put the bread in the microwave, turn on the microwave, take the bread from the microwave.
Turn around, go straight to the round table, turn right, go to the fridge.
Put the bread on the lower right shelf of the fridge right of the tomato.
Walk to the counter over the dishwasher.
Pick up the shark knife on the counter.
Go across the room to the table.
Slice the loaf of bread on the table.
Go to the left side of the table.
Put the sharp knife down next to the pan.
Go back to the right side of the table.
Pick up a piece of bread from the table.
Take the bread across the room to the microwave.
Put the slice of bread into the microwave, heat the bread, and take the warm bread out of the microwave.
Walk across the room to the fridge to the right of the table.
Put the warm bread in the fridge.
Turn around, head towards the counter, and then turn left towards the coffee maker on the counter.
Pick up the yellow knife to the left of the coffee maker.
Turn left, walk towards the wall on the other side of the room, turn left to face the round black table.
Slice the bread on the table into several slices with the knife.
Take a step to the left.
Place the knife to the front of the other knife on the table.
Take a step to the right.
Pick up a bread slice from the middle of the loaf of bread.
Turn left and head towards the microwave on the counter at the other end of the room.
Place the bread inside the microwave, heat it up, and take it out.
Turn around and head towards the fridge on your right.
Open the fridge, place the slice of bread on the top right shelf, and close the fridge.
turn around and walk forwards to the sink ahead
grab the knife off of the ground in front of the sink
turn around and walk over to the fridge at the end of the room on the left
open the fridge and cut up the potato inside, then close the door
turn left and walk over to the microwave on the right side of the kitchen counter to the left of the fridge
place the knife inside of the microwave
move back over to the front of the fridge to your right
grab a potato slice out of the fridge
turn left and walk over to the kitchen sink ahead
place the potato slice on the left side kitchen sink
Turn around and face the kitchen sink.
Pick the yellow knife up off of the floor.
Go to the right and face the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator, cut the potato inside and close the refrigerator.
Go to the left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the knife inside of it, and close the microwave.
Go to the right to face the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator, pick up the slice of potato and close the refrigerator.
Turn around, go to the right, and face the sink.
Place the slice of potato in the sink.
Turn around and head towards the kitchen sink.
Pick up knife that's on the floor.
Turn around and head towards door, turn left to face fridge.
Open fridge, slice potato on middle shelf, close the fridge door.
Turn left, walk up, turn right to face microwave.
Open microwave and place knife inside, close microwave.
Return to fridge and open door.
Take first slice of potato from fridge and close door.
Head towards the kitchen sink of the left.
Put the potato in the sink.
Turn around and face the ground
Grab the knife that is on the ground
Turn around and head to the fridge
Open the fridge and cut the potato in half
Turn left and stop at the microwave
Put the knife in the microwave
Turn right and stop at the fridge
Open the fridge and grab one of the potato slices
Turn left and head to the sink
Put the potato in the sink
Turn left, go straight, then turn right at the microwave.
Take the mug from the cabinet to the left, above the microwave.
Go to the sink to your right.
Wash the mug in the sink.
Turn around, move forward, turn right to go to the coffee maker.
Place the mug at the coffee maker.
Walk to your left to the end of the room and turn to the right to the cabinet on top of the microwave. 
Open the cabinet on top of the microwave, pick up a dirty white cup and close the door. 
Walk to the right and turn to the right to go to the sink. 
Put the cup in the sink, turn on the water for a few seconds, turn it off and pick up the clean cup. 
Go to the left and turn to the left to the coffee maker on the counter top and near the wall.  
Put the clean cup on the coffee maker. 
Turn right and head to the microwave.
Open the cabinet above the microwave and pick up the dirty mug in there. 
Turn left and bring the dirty mug to the sink
Clean the mug in in the sink. 
Bring the cleaned mug to the coffee machine on the left. 
Put the mug on the coffee machine.
Turn to the left, and then the right to face the microwave.
Open the top cabinet and take out a mug.
Take the mug and take a few steps to the right towards the sink.
Place the mug in the sink and turn on the water. Turn off the water and pick up the mug again.
Carry the mug and turn around and go to the right to the coffee machine.
Place the mug under the coffee machine.
Turn left, move to counter in front of microwave.
Open cabinet on upper left, pick up dirty cup.
Turn to the right, move to the counter in front of the sink.
Place dirty cup into the sink, rinse cup, pick cup up.
Turn to the left, move to the counter in front of the coffee maker.
Put the cup into the coffee maker.
Turn to the left and then face the sink on the right.
Pick up the tomato from the edge of the counter.
Hold the tomato and move a step to the right.
Place the tomato in the sink and turn on the water. Turn off the water and pick up the tomato.
Carry the tomato and turn around to the microwave cart.
Place the tomato on the left side of the microwave cart.
Turn left and walk until you're even with the left side of the sink turning right and walking to it once you're even with it.
Pick up the tomato that's in front of you on the edge of the counter by the sink..
Take a small step to your right.
Wash the tomato in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Turn right and walk to the microwave that's on your right and stand in front of it facing it.
Put the tomato on the counter by the microwave directly under the pepper grinder.
Turn left and walk towards the oven, then hang a right and walk up to the counter.
Pick up the tomato off of the counter.
Turn right and walk towards the wall, then turn left to face the sink.
Put the tomato in the sink and turn on the water, after a couple seconds turn the water off and remove the now clean tomato.
Turn right and walk towards the wall, then hang a right and walk up to the microwave.
Put the clean tomato on the front left corner of the counter in front of you.
Go to the counter with the toaster on it.
Pick up the butter knife in front of the toaster.
Turn and go to the counter to the left of the sink.
Slice the lettuce on the counter.
Turn and go to the refrigerator.
Put the knife in the fridge.
Go back to the counter to the left of the sink.
Pick up a piece of lettuce.
Go to the stove across the room.
Put the lettuce in the pan on the back left burner.
Pick up the pan with the lettuce on it.
Turn right and go across the room to the fridge.
Put the pan with lettuce in it into the fridge.
Turn around and walk to the counter on the left side of the fridge with the toaster on it.
Take the knife from the counter.
Turn around and walk towards the white table then turn right to the counter with the lettuce on it.
Cut the lettuce with the knife.
Turn right and walk past the table then turn left and go to the refrigerator.
Put the knife on a shelf inside the fridge.
Turn around and walk towards the table then turn right and walk to the counter on the left side of the sink.
Pick up a slice of lettuce from the counter.
Turn around then turn left and walk to the stove on your left.
Put the lettuce in the pan on the back of the stove.
Pick up the pan with the lettuce.
Turn right and walk to the refrigerator.
Put the pan inside the fridge.
Turn left, walk straight, turn right to the toaster
Pick up the silver knife on the counter
Turn left, turn left, Walk to the counter
Cut the green vegetable on the left into slices
Turn right, turn right, walk straight, turn left to the fridge, 
Open the fridge, Put the knife at the top
Turn left, turn left, walk straight, turn right, walk straight to the sink
Pick up a slice off the vegetable on the counter
Turn right, turn right, turn left, walk straight to the oven
Put the slice in the pan
Pick up the pan on the stove
Turn right, turn left to the fridge
Put the pan in the fridge, close the door
Turn right and walk to the small table containing the blue coffee machine.
Pick up the black and gray mug from the table.
Turn left and walk to the sink.
Put the mug in the sink, rinse it off, and take it out of the sink.
Turn around and walk back to the blue coffee machine.
Put the mug on the coffee machine.
Turn around, move to the coffee machine on your left.
Pick up the dirty mug on the coffee machine. 
Turn left, bring the mug to the sink.
Wash the mug in the sink with water. 
Take the mug back to the coffee machine next to the fridge. 
Put the cleaned mug on the coffee machine. 
Turn around and walk towards the wall, then turn left and walk up to the counter to the left of the fridge.
Pick up the dirty mug off of the counter.
Turn left and walk over to the sink.
Put the dirty mug in the sink basin, then turn on the water, after a couple seconds turn the water off and remove the now clean mug.
Turn right and walk forward, then turn right and walk over to the counter to the left of the fridge.
Put the clean coffee mug into the coffee machine on the counter.
Turn around and go to the wall, then turn left and move forward, then turn left to face the kitchen island.
Pick up the tomato from the kitchen island.
Go to the sink across the room, adjacent to the dishwasher.
Wash the tomato in the sink.
Turn around and step forward, then turn left to face the fridge.
Open the fridge, put the tomato inside, and close the fridge.
Walk over to the table.
Grab the tomato
Walk over to the sink
Wash the tomato
Grab the tomato and walk over to the fridge
Place the tomato in the fridge
Turn around and walk over to the wall, then hang a left and walk over to the side of the kitchen island.
Pick up the tomato off of the kitchen island.
Walk over to the kitchen sink.
Wash the tomato in the kitchen sink and then pick it back up.
Turn around and walk forward, then hang a left and walk up to the fridge.
Put the clean tomato in the fridge on the bottom shelf then close the door.
Turn and go to the cupboard above the microwave. 
Pick up a plate in the cupboard. 
Turn and go to the microwave.
Heat the plate in the microwave. 
Turn and go to the counter by the toaster. 
Put the plate on the counter. 
Turn around, walk forward two steps, turn right, walk to counter, turn left facing microwave, 
Open cupboard above microwave, remove plate from cupboard, shut cupboard
Look down at microwave, open microwave
Put plate inside microwave, close microwave, turn on, open microwave
Remove plate from microwave, Turn right
Place plate on top of counter in front of soap
turn to face microwave and cabinets above
open right cabinet door, remove octagon plate, close the door
move gaze down to face microwave
heat plate in microwave, remove from microwave
turn right to face counter top with a coffee maker
put the plate on the counter top to the left of the coffee maker
Go across the room to the table with the wooden chair.
Pick up the egg by the wall on the table.
Take the egg to the fridge.
Cool off the egg in the fridge.
Take the cold egg to the end table at the end of the counter, by the trash bag.
Set the cold egg down on the end table.
Turn to your left walk few steps, turn left facing the table with a chair
Pick up the egg beside the plate on the table
Turn to your left, cross the room look for the fridge
Open the lower fridge door and put egg inside and out then close the door
Turn to your left and head to the end of the counter you will see a black shelf behind
Put the on the egg of the table beside the tomato
Turn around and walk towards the dining table.
Pick up the egg from the table.
Turn around and walk towards the fridge.
Place the egg on the top shelf inside the fridge, let it cool and take it back out.
Turn left towards the white table, and then turn right to face a small black table.
Place the egg on the right corner of the table.
Turn around and face the counter to the left of the sink.
Pick the black cup up from the counter.
Turn around and go to the microwave and stand in front of it.
Put the cup in the microwave and close the door and then open the door and pick the cup up and shut the door.
Turn to the right and face the bottom left corner cabinet.
Put the cup in the bottom left cabinet, in the corner, and shut the door.
Turn to the counter
Pick up the black bowl
Go to the microwave
Heat the bowl in the microwave
Go to the cabinet
Place the bowl in the cabinet
Turn around and walk to the counter ahead.
Pick up the black glass on the counter in front of the gray bowl.
Turn around and walk to the white stove on the right.
Put the glass inside the microwave above the stove, heat it for a few seconds, remove it and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the cabinets under the counter ahead.
Open the lower left cabinet, put the heated glass inside and close the door.
Position yourself to you're standing facing the fridge in front of you to your right and when you get there turn left and take two steps then turn left and walk to the table.
Pick up the tea pot that's in front of you.
Turn around and take a step then turn right and walk to the counter then take a step to your right then walk to the sink on your left turning left to face it when you get there.
Wash the tea pot in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Go back to where you got the tea pot.
Put the tea pot above the head of lettuce on the left side of the table.
Walk to the right, turn left near the table, walk towards the fridge and then turn left to go to the other side of the table. 
Pick up a tea pot from on top of the black round table. 
Turn around, walk forward and turn to the left to go to the sink. 
Put the tea pot in the sink, turn on the water for a few seconds, turn it off and pick up the tea pot again. 
Walk to the left, walk towards the wall and turn left to face the black round table.
Put the tea pot behind the lettuce on the round table. 
Walk around the table, and face the table.
Pick up the tea kettle.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Put the tea kettle in the sink, turn on the water, turn off the water, and pick up the tea kettle.
Turn left, walk to the wall, and face the table.
Put the tea kettle on the table.
Turn around and then walk around the table to face the opposite side.
Pick up the apple on the table.
Turn right and walk forward to face the microwave.
Heat the apple in the microwave and then remove it.
Step to the right to face the fridge.
Place the apple in the fridge to the left of the pan.
Turn around, move around the left side of the island, go to face the apple on the island. 
Pick up the apple on the island. 
Turn right, bring the apple to the microwave on the right. 
Heat the apple in the microwave.
Bring the heated apple to the fridge on the right.
Put the heated apple in the fridge.
Turn around and go to the other side of the kitchen center console.
Pick up the apple on top of the kitchen center console.
Turn right and head towards the microwave oven. 
Place the apple in the microwave oven, heat it, and take it out. 
Head towards the front of the refrigerator on the right. 
Open the refrigerator door and place the apple on the shelf next to the pan, before closing the door. 
Turn right and walk over to the right side of the white table on your left.
Pick up the large metal knife off of the white table.
Turn right and walk over to the counter, then turn left to face the microwave.
Slice up the tomato on the counter to the right of the microwave.
Open the microwave and put the large metal knife inside.
Pick up a piece of sliced tomato off of the counter.
Walk over to the fridge behind you.
Open the fridge and put the piece of sliced tomato inside then close the door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and remove the now chilled piece of sliced tomato then close the door.
Walk over to the kitchen sink.
Put the chilled piece of sliced tomato in the rightmost sink basin.
go to the right side of the white table
pick up the knife from the table
take the knife to the microwave
open the microwave door
put the knife in the microwave
take the tomato slice from the microwave
take the tomato slice to the fridge
put the slice in the fridge, chill, then remove
take the slice to the sink
put the slice in the sink
Go to the right of the table
Grab the knife off of the table
Turn right and go to the microwave
Slice the apple in the microwave
Put the knife in the microwave
Grab a slice of the apple
Turn around and go to the fridge
Cool the apple in the fridge and then take it out
Turn left and go to the sink
Put the apple in the sink
Turn left and walk up to the white table, then walk around the white table to the counter with the coffee machine on it.
Pick up the metal fork off of the counter.
Walk over to the white table on your left.
Put the fork in the black mug on the table.
Pick up the black mug with the fork in it off of the table.
Turn right and walk over to the counter with the coffee machine on it.
Put the mug with the fork in it on the counter in front of the coffee machine.
Turn around and go to the table with the coffee maker on it
Grab the fork that's on the table
Turn left and stop at the white table on the right
Put the fork in the black mug on the table
Grab the mug off of the table
Turn right and stop at the table with the coffee maker
Put the mug on the table
Turn around and then right. Turn left to find the coffee machine.
Pick up the fork from in front of the coffee machine.
Carry the fork and take a few steps left to the white table.
Place the fork inside a cup toward the back of the table.
Pick up the cup from the back of the table.
Take the cup and fork and move a few steps right.
Place the cup and fork on the counter in front of the coffee machine.
Turn right, proceed to table.  Turn right, proceed to sink.
Pick up mug from sink, located to the right of the spatula.
Turn around, proceed to wall.  Turn left, proceed to refrigerator.
Open refrigerator, place mug on top shelf to the right of the tomato.  Close refrigerator, wait five seconds, open refrigerator.  Remove mug from refrigerator, close refrigerator door.
Turn left, proceed to counter on right.  Turn right to face coffee maker.  
Place mug on coffee maker to the right of the lettuce. 
Turn right and walk to the white table, hang right and walk to the sink
Pick up the black coffee mug that is sitting in the sink
Turn around and head across the room to the fridge on the left
Open the firshe and place the mug on the top shelf then close the fridge to chill the mug.  Then open the fridge and pick up the mug and close the door 
Turn left then hang and quick right to face the coffee maker that is sitting to the left of the fridge
Place the mug in the coffee maker
Turn right and walk across the room, then turn right and walk across the room. 
Take the black coffee mug from the sink. 
Turn around and walk across the room, then turn left and walk to the fridge. 
Open the fridge and put the cup on the top shelf, then close the door to the fridge for three seconds, then open it and take the cup out of the fridge. 
Turn left and take two steps, then turn right to face the coffee maker. 
Place the coffee cup in the coffee maker. 
Turn to your right and face the microwave above the sink.
Open the microwave door, pick up the apple, and close the microwave door.
Turn the left then turn back to the right and face the sink.
Put the apple in the sink on the right, near the top left corner of the sink, turn the water on to wash the apple, turn the water off, then pick the apple back up.
Turn to the left to turn around, walk to the refrigerator, then turn right to face the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator door, put the apple on the top shelf to the right of the bowl and avocado, then close the refrigerator door.
Turn to your right and walk up to the microwave above the sink. 
Remove an apple from the microwave. 
Step back from the microwave. 
Place the apple in the larger, right sink, turn the water on, rinse the apple, turn the water off, and pick the apple back up. 
Turn around and go to the refrigerator. 
Place the apple in the refrigerator, on the top shelf. 
Turn right and walk forward to the microwave.
Open the microwave, take out the apple and close the microwave.
Walk slightly to the left and stand in between the two sink basins.
Put the apple in the right sink basin, rinse it off, and take it back out of the sink.
Turn around and walk to the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator, put the apple in front of the bowl and close the refrigerator.
Turn to the left, go forward to the counter on the right where the yellow handled knife is. 
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Use the knife to cut the bread into slices. 
Turn to the right, go forward to the counter on the right where the bread and tomato are. 
Use the knife to cut the bread into slices. 
Turn to the left, go forward to the wall, turn to the left, go forward to the garbage can. 
Put the knife in to the garbage can.
Turn around, go forward, go to the right, go forward, hang a left and go to the counter where the bread and tomato are. 
Pick up a slice of bread from the counter. 
Turn to the left, go forward to the wall, turn to the left, go forward to the garbage can. 
Put the bread in to the garbage can. 
Turn around, go forward to the counter, turn to the right, go forward to the counter on the right where the bread is. 
Pick up a slice of bread from the counter. 
Turn to the right, go forward to the wall, turn to the left, go forward to the garbage can. 
Put the bread in to the garbage can. 
Turn left, go straight and stop just before reaching the door.  Turn right to face the short end of the counter.
Pick up the knife off of the counter that is to the left of the bread.
Slice half the loaf of bread on the counter.
Turn right and walk past the fridge to the middle of the counter.  Turn right to face the counter.
Slice half the loaf of bread on the counter that is in front of the tomato.
Still holding the knife, turn around and walk to the trash can in the corner.
Put the knife into the trash can behind the apple.
Turn around and walk back to the middle of the counter that is to the left of the fridge.  Stand in front of the loaf of bread.
Pick up the end slice from the loaf of bread.
Turn around and walk to the trash can in the corner.
Put the slice of bread into the trash can to the left of the apple.
Turn around and walk towards the counter.  Then turn right and go past the fridge towards the door.  Stop just before the door and turn right to face the short edge of the counter.
Pick up one slice of bread from the loaf on the counter.
Turn right and walk past the fridge.  Then turn left and walk to the trash can in the corner.
Put the slice of bread into the trash can in front of the other slice of bread.
Turn to your left walk straight face the end of the counter on your right
Pick up the knife on the counter
Slice the bread on the counter
Turn to your right walk straight head to the counter far right side
Slice the bread in front of you on the counter
Turn to your left head to the trash bin 
Drop the knife in the trash bin
Turn to your right walk forward then turn right, then turn left towards the counter
Pick up a slice of bread on the counter
Turn to your left head to the trash bin
Drop the slice of bread in the trash bin
Turn to your left walk forward then right head to the counter beside the stove
Get a slice of bread on the  counter
Turn to your right walk forward then left head to the trash bin
Drop the slice of bread in the trash bin
go right, go forward to counter to left of the stove
pick up egg from counter in front of utensil holder
go to microwave above stove
place egg in center of microwave, close microwave
turn around, go to green counter on the right, face red pen on counter
pick up egg from counter behind red pen
turn left, go to microwave above stove
place egg in front of glass on left side of microwave, close microwave
Turn right and walk to the counter, facing the stove.
Pick up the egg on the counter to the left of the stove.
Step right to face the microwave.
Place the egg in the microwave at the center.
Turn around and veer left to the right side of the table.
Pick up the egg on the table.
Turn left and walk back to the microwave.
Place the egg in the microwave to the left of the first egg.
Turn right, take twelve steps and turn left to face the stove.
Pick up the egg from the counter, next to the stove.
Turn right, take one step and then turn left and walk to stand directly in front of the stove and stop.
Open the microwave door above the stove, place the egg in the microwave between the wine glass and the apple and then close the door.
Turn around, take four steps, turn left, and take two steps to the table. 
Pick up the egg from the middle of the table.
Turn around, take two steps, turn right, and take four steps to the stove.	
Open the microwave door, place the egg in the microwave to the left of the existing egg and in front of the wine glass, and then shut the door.
Turn around and take a step forward, then turn right and walk over to the counter.
Pick up the head of lettuce off of the counter.
Turn around and walk forward, then turn left and walk over to the sink.
Wash the head of lettuce in the sink and then pick it back up.
Turn around and take a step forward, then turn left and walk towards the counter, turn left again and walk up to the counter.
Put the clean head of lettuce on the counter.
Turn to the left and walk to the counter with the sponges.
Pick up the head of lettuce.
Turn right and move to the front of the sink.
Wash the lettuce in the sink with clean water and remove it.
Turn right and move next to the fork on the counter.
Place the lettuce on the counter.
Turn left and walk to the stove then take a step to your left.
Pick up the head of lettuce that's in front of you.
Turn right and walk to the sink.
Wash the lettuce in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Move about three steps to your right.
Put the lettuce on the counter above the dish washer..
Turn left, move forward, then turn left again, move forward and turn left to face the kitchen island.
Pick up the butter knife on the kitchen island, to the right of the bowl.
Turn left, move forward, then turn right, then turn left to go toward the counter with the toaster.
Put the butter knife in the mug, in the right cabinet above the counter.
Pick up the mug from the cabinet.
Turn left, move forward, then turn right to face the dishwasher.
Place the mug on the counter in front of the toaster.
Turn left towards the stove and then turn left towards the middle of the table to your left.
Pick up the knife in front of the white cup.
Turn left, walk towards the dishwasher and look up above the counter to find the cabinets.
Open the right cabinet door and place the knife in the cup inside.
Take the cup out of the cabinet and close the door.
Take a step to the left to face the toaster on the cabinet.
Place the cup in front of the toaster.
Move to the kitchen island past the stove on the right side.
Pick up a knife from the island.
Move the the cabinet above and in between the toaster and sink.
Open the cabinet and place the knife in side the cup.
Pick up the cup from the cabinet and close the door.
Move to the counter in front of the toaster.
Place the cup on the counter near the toaster.
Turn around and then turn to your left to face the table
Pick up a knife off of the table
Turn to your left until you are facing the right cabinet
Open the cabinet and put the knife in a mug
Pick up the mug with the knife in and close the cabinet
Move to your left so you are now facing the toaster
Place the mug with the spoon in it on the kitchen counter
Walk ahead and left to the stove.
Pick up the pot on the back left burner.
Turn right and walk to the fridge on the left.
Place the pan in the fridge on the second shelf to the bottom. Close the door, wait a moment, and take it out again.
Turn around and walk ahead and slightly right to the white table.
Place the pan on the back right corner of the table.
Move to the left and face the left side of the stove.
Pick the pan up from the back of the stove.
Turn to the right and then the left to face the fridge.
Put the pan in the fridge and shut the door and then open the door and pick the pan up again.
Turn around and face the white table behind.
Put the pan down on the table.
Turn left move forward, then turn right to go to the stove.
Pick up the pan on the back left corner of the stove.
Turn right and go to the door, then turn left to face the fridge.
Open the fridge, put the pan inside and chill it, then take the pan out.
Turn left and move forward, then turn left to approach the white table.
Place the pan on the white table.
Turn right, go forward a bit, turn left, go to the sink
Open the cupboard under the sink, pick up the plate in it
Turn around, go forward, turn left in front of the stove, turn up to the microwave
Put the plate in the microwave, start the microwave, wait, pick up the plate
Turn around, go forward a bit, turn left and go to the sink
Put the plate in the sink
Turn right and walk forward, then hang a left and walk over to the sink.
Open the cabinet below the sink and take out the white plate then close the cabinet.
Turn around and walk forward, then hang a right and walk up to the stove and look up at the microwave.
Microwave the plate for a couple seconds then take it out of the microwave.
Walk back over to the kitchen sink.
Put the heated white plate in the sink basin.
Go straight across the room to the cupboards under the sink. 
Pull out a plate from the cupboards, under the sink. 
Turn around and go to the microwave above the stove, to your right. 
Place the plate in the microwave, heat it up, then remove the plate from the microwave. 
Turn to your right and go back to the sink. 
Place the plate in the sink. 
Walk forward and turn to the table to your left.
Pick up the sharp knife with the yellow handle.
Turn to your right and walk toward the sink.
Cut the apple that is in the sink basin into thirds.
Turn to your left and walk to the stove. 
Turn toward the stove on your right and place the knife, pointed side down, into the frying pan.
Turn to your right and walk to the sink. 
Pick up one piece of the apple from the sink basin. 
Turn to your left and walk to the stove.
Place the apple piece into the frying pan. 
Take the frying pan off of the burner.
Turn to your left and walk to the refrigerator.
Place the frying pan in the refrigerator. 
Move forward and face the grey table to your right.
Pick up the knife on the table.
Turn around and head to the sink on your left.
Cut the apple in the sink.
Go left to and face the stove.
Put the knife in the pan.
Turn right and head back to face the sink
Take a slice of the apple in the sink.
Turn left and face the stove on your right.
Put the apple in the pan.
Pick up the pan from the stove.
Turn left and head to the fridge.
Put the pan in the fridge and close it.
Walk forward, then turn left to face the round black table.
Pick up the large metal knife with a golden handle.
Turn around and begin walking across the room, then hang a left and walk up to the kitchen sink.
Use the knife to cut up the apple in the left sink basin.
Turn left and walk over to the oven, then turn right.
Place the knife in the frying pan on the back left burner.
Turn right and walk back over to the sink.
Pick up a piece of sliced apple.
Turn left and walk back over to the stove.
Place the piece of sliced apple into the frying pan with the knife in it.
Pick up the frying pan with the knife and piece of sliced apple in it.
Turn left and walk over to the fridge.
Open the upper fridge compartment and place the frying pan with the knife and piece of sliced apple in it into the fridge, then close the fridge door.
Turn around, then turn right to go to the sink.
Pick up the potato in the sink.
Turn around and go to the stove, then look up to view the microwave.
Open the microwave, put the potato inside and heat it up, then take the potato out.
Turn around, step forward, then turn left to go to the sink.
Put the potato in the sink.
Turn left and go to the sink
Pick up the potato that is sitting in the sink
Turn around and walk to the stove and turn right to face the stove
Open the microwave that is above the stove and place the potato inside, to the left of the mug, then close the door and turn it on. Then open the microwave and pick up the potato then close the door
Turn to the right and go to the sink
Place the potato into the sink in front of the white coffee mug
Turn around and take a step then turn right and walk to the counter.
Pick up the potato that's in front of you in the sink to the left of the pot.
Turn around and take a step then turn right to face the stove.
Look up and cook the potato in the microwave then take it back out and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the sink then step to your right.
Put the potato in the sink.
Turn around and walk to the table on the left.
Pick up the closest knife from the front of the table.
Look away from the table and then back to the table again.
Cut an apple to the left of the pepper mill.
Cut the apple again and remove a piece from the apple.
Pick up the cut piece of apple from the table.
Turn right and walk to the sink.
Rinse the apple at the sink.
Turn around and carry the piece of apple to the table.
Set the piece of apple down on the table next to the rest of the apple.
Turn around then face the white table to your right.
Pick up the knife from the table in front of you.
Turn left, then face the table to your right in front of the apple.
Slice the apple in front of you on the table.
Cut out an apple slice from the apple on the table.
Take an apple slice from the table.
Turn right and head towards the sink in front of you.
Wash the apple slice and take it out of the sink.
Turn around and face the table to your right.
Place the apple slice on the table in front of you.
Turn and walk to the table in front of the oven.
Pick up the knife closest to you. 
move a step to the left. 
Cut the apple to your left on the table.
Drop the knife on the ground.
Pick up a piece of the apple.
Turn and walk to the sink. 
Place the apple piece in the sink and turn the water on, rinse the apple, then turn the water off. 
Turn and walk back to the table you were at.
Place the apple piece on the table in front of you.
Turn around and head to the white table on the left
Grab the large knife off of the table
Move slightly to the left
Cut the apple into three slices
Lay the knife down on the table
Grab one of the apple slices
Turn right and head to the sink
Wash the apple in the sink and take it out
Turn around and head to the white table
Put the apple on the table
Turn around and walk to the white table with the football on it.
Pick up the yellow knife closest to the front of the table.
Take one step to the left and face the table with the football on it.
Cut up the yellow apple in front of the football.
Place the knife in front of the cut up apple on the table.
Pick up the a piece of the cut up yellow apple from the table.
Turn right and walk to the sink on the right.
Rinse the piece of apple in the sink and then pick up the piece of apple from the sink.
Turn around and walk to the table with the football on it.
Place the piece of apple in front of the cut up apple on the table.
turn left and head to the table
pick up a lettuce 
heat to the fridge ahead
place the lettuce in the fridge to cool and then take it out
turn around to the table
place the lettuce on the table 
turn left, go to left side of white dining table
pick up lettuce from white dining table
go to the refrigerator to the right
open refrigerator, put lettuce on left side of second shelf, close refrigerator, open refrigerator, pick up lettuce, close refrigerator
turn around, go to front of dining table by white dispenser
place lettuce to the left of knife on white dining table
Turn to your left then head to the left side of the table
Pick up the cabbage on the table
Turn around to your right then left move forward to the fridge
Open the fridge chill the cabbage, take it out then close the fridge
Turn to your left then walk straight face the table on your right
Put the cabbage on the table beside the knife
Turn around, move forward, then turn left to face the counter with the plant on it.
Pick up the fork on the counter, to the right of the plant.
Turn around, go forward, then turn left to face the fridge.
Put the fork in the cup, in the fridge.
Take the cup with a fork in it from the fridge.
Turn left, go forward, turn left, then move forward to go to the sink.
Put the cup in the sink, the right of the tomato.
Turn right and walk up to the kitchen counter right of the sink
Pick up the fork from the counter
Turn around and walk over to the fridge
Open the fridge and put the fork in the orange bowl
Pick up the orange bowl from the fridge
Turn left and walk over to the kitchen sink
Put the orange bowl in the kitchen sink
go to counter with plant to the right
pick up fork to the right of plant
turn around, go to refrigerator on the left
open refrigerator, place fork in orange cup in middle shelf of refrigerator
pick up orange cup with fork, close refrigerator
turn around, go to sink to the left
place orange cup with fork in sink, in front of potato
Turn around and then go left into the kitchen. Go straight back to the stove, but look to the counter on the right.
Pick up the spoon from the front of the counter. 
Take the spoon and turn around to locate the sink.
Place the spoon in the sink, turn the water on and then off. Take the spoon out of the sink.
While holding the spoon, turn to the right and open the top white drawer.
Place the spoon inside the drawer and close it.
Turn around to your left then cross the room, head to the right side of the counter
Pick up the spoon on the counter
Turn to your right then walk towards the sink
Put the spoon in the sink then rinse it
Turn to your right facing the drawer
Open the drawer  put the spoon inside then close the drawer
Turn around and walk to the counter on the other side of the two black stools.
Pick up the spoon from the counter.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Rinse the spoon in the sink and pick up the clean spoon.
Turn right to face the drawer to the right of the sink.
Place the clean spoon in the drawer to the right of the sink and then close it.
Turn around and cross the room to face the counter where the spoon is.
Pick the spoon up from the counter.
Turn around and stand in front of the sink.
Put the spoon in the sink, turn the water on and then turn the water off and then pick up the spoon.
Turn to the right.
Open the drawer and put the spoon in and then shut the drawer.
Turn around to your right, then head to the counter beside the stove and turn to your right
Pick up the spoon on the counter top
Turn around to your right and head to the sink
Put the spoon on the sink , rinse it then pick it up
Turn to your left and face the stove
Pull the cabinet drawer then put in the spoon in and close the drawer
walk in to the kitchen
Go to the counter
Grab the spoon that is on the counter
Take the dirty spoon to the kitchen sink
Place the spoon in the sink
Turn on the water and wash the spoon and put it away
Go forward and turn left to face the table with the coffee maker.
Pick the egg up from the table.
Turn around and go forward to stand in front of the microwave.
Put the egg in the microwave and shut the door and then open the door and pick the egg up again.
Go right and then right again to stand in front of the fridge.
Put the egg in the fridge and shut the door.
Walk towards the door, then turn left and walk up to the round wooden table.
Pick up the egg off of the round wooden table.
Turn around and over to the microwave on the counter.
Open the microwave and put the egg inside then close the door and turn on the microwave, after a couple seconds turn off the microwave and take out the egg.
Walk over to the black fridge behind you.
Open the fridge and put the heated egg in the fridge, then close the fridge door.
Go to the round table
Pick up the egg
Go to the microwave
Heat the egg
Go to the fridge
Put the egg in the fridge
Turn right and head to the long counter, the one with the load of bread
Pick up the knife that is sitting under the loaf of bread
Slice the loaf of bread
Turn left and focus to the cabinets under the counter.
Open the drawer is the on the right below the spoon and place the knife inside, close the drawer
Turn to the right and look to the countertop in front of you
Pick up a slice of bread
Turn around and cross the room, then hang a left and cross the room to the microwave above the stove
Open the microwave and place the bread inside then close the microwave and turn it on. Open the microwave and pick up the slice of bread and then close the microwave
Turn left and step to the counter on the left of the stove
Place the slice of bread on the counter in front of the butter knife
Turn and go to the counter.
Pick up a knife on the counter.
Slice the bread on the counter.
Turn and go to the drawer.
Put the knife in the drawer.
Turn and go to the bread.
Pick up a slice of bread.
Turn and go to the microwave. 
Heat the slice of bread in the microwave. 
Turn and go to the counter by the stove.
Put the slice of bread on the counter.
Go to the countertop
Pick up the knife near the load of bread
Cut the loaf of bread
Look at the drawer on the left
Put the knife in the drawer
Look at the loaf of bread
Take a slice of bread
Go to the microwave
Heat the slice of bread
Go to the counter left of the stove
Put the bread down on the counter
Head to the stove on the left. 
Pick up the large pot on the front of the stove. 
Turn around and bring the pot to the fridge.
Chill the pot in the fridge. 
Take out the pot, turn around and bring the pot back to the stove. 
Put the chilled pot back on the stove. 
turn left and walk to just short of the end of the room, make a right and walk over to the stove
grab the pot off of the front right burner
turn around and walk straight ahead to the refrigerator 
place the pot inside of the fridge to cool, then take it back out
turn right and walk to just short of the end of the room, and turn right to get to the stove ahead again
place the pot back on the stove on the front right burner
Turn left and walk forward, then turn right to go to the stove.
Pick up the pot from the stove.
Turn around and go to the fridge.
Put the pot in the fridge for a few moments, then take it out again.
Turn around and go back to the stove.
Put the pot on the stove.
Go to the counter above the dishwasher.
Pick up the butter knife behind the bread on the counter.
Move closer to the sink.
Slice the tomato on the left.
Move to the left to look at the cabinet above the bread.
Put the butter knife in the cabinet.
Move back to the counter above the dishwasher.
Pick up a tomato slice on the counter.
Turn around and go across the room to the stove.
Put the tomato slice in the pot on the back left burner of the stove.
Pick up the pot with the tomato slice in it.
Go to the table in the corner by the door.
Set the pot down on the table.
Turn around and head to the counter on the left
Grab the knife that's on the counter
Move slightly to the right
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices
Move slightly to the left and look at the cabinets
Open the cabinet on the left and put the knife inside
Move slightly to the right
Grab one of the tomato slices off the counter
Turn around and head to the oven
Put the tomato in the bowl in the top left stove
Grab the bowl off of the stove
Turn left and stop at the white table
Place the bowl on the table
Go to the end of the kitchen counter on the left. 
Pick up the gray knife behind the bread.
Move over to the tomatoes and cut the one on the left.
Move back to the bread.
Reach for the cupboard above the bread.
Open the cupboard and place the knife inside.
Move over right to the tomatoes.
Pick up a slice of tomato on the left.
Turn around and go to the stove.
Place the slice of tomato inside the large pot on the left. 
Pick up the pot with the tomato in it.
Turn left and go to the white table on the opposite side of the kitchen.
Place the pot with tomato on the table. 
Move to the left and face the counter top right next to the wall.
Pick the knife up from off of the counter top.
Move slightly to the right.
Slice the tomato on the left.
Move slightly to the left and look up to face the cabinet above the counter.
Open the cabinet, place the knife in the cabinet, and close the cabinet.
Look down and move slightly to the right to face the counter next to the sink.
Pick up a slice of the tomato.
Turn around and face the stove top.
Place the tomato slice in the pan to the left.
Pick the pan up with the tomato slice in it.
Turn to the left, walk straight then to the right to face the small white table in the corner.
Place the pan on the small white table.
Turn left and walk towards the counter
Grab the knife from the plate on the counter
Walk with the knife towards the cabinet 
Slice the tomato on the counter
Look up and Open the cabinet in front
Put the knife in the cabinet
Move towards the counter
Grab a slice of tomato on the counter
Walk with the slice of tomato towards the stove
Put the slice of tomato inside the pot
Grab the pot and walk towards the door
Turn right towards the table next to the door
Put the pot on the table
Turn left and walk towards the window, then turn right. 
Walk towards the black table.
Pick up the knife behind the loaf of bread on the black table.
Slice the tomato behind the blue plate closest to the loaf of bread. 
Take the knife and turn towards the cabinet about the black table.
Place the knife inside the cabinet above the black table.
Pick up the slice of tomato, turn all the way around.
Walk towards the stove.
Place the tomato slice into the pan nearest coffee maker,
Pick up the pan with the tomato slice in it.
Turn left and walk towards the door.
Turn right in front of the white table.
Place the pan on the white table.
Turn right and walk to the stove, then turn right and go to the sink.
Pick up the knife on the counter to the top left of the sink.
Take a step back to be centered with the sink.
Slice the apple in the sink.
Stand the knife upright in the sink to the right of the drain.
Pick up the top left slice of apple.
Turn left to face the microwave.
Place the apple in the microwave to the right of the egg and turn on for a few seconds.  Remove the apple when the microwave is off.
Return to the kitchen sink.
Place the apple in the sink behind the potato.
turn right to go towards the stove top, then make another right and face the sink
pick up the knife with the yellow handle to the left of the sink
face in the direction of the sink, holding the knife
slice the apple in the sink
place the knife in the sink over the sponge
pick up a slice of apple in the sink
turn left to face the microwave
open the microwave and place the slice in the microwave to the right of the egg, then shut the door and heat for several seconds before taking it out
turn right and face the sink with the apple slice in hand
place the apple slice in the sink to the left of the knife
turn around, go to counter to left of sink with green cup
pick up yellow handle knife behind green cup on counter
go to sink to the left
slice red apple in sink
place knife in sink to the left of apple
pick up apple slice from sink
turn left to counter with microwave
place apple slice on blue plate to the right of egg in microwave, microwave apple, take apple out of microwave, close microwave
turn right, face sink with knife
place apple slice to the left of yellow handle knife
Turn right to face the counter.
Pick up the tomato.
Turn right and go to the microwave.
Cook the tomato.
Turn left and go to the fridge.
Put the tomato in the fridge.
Turn right towards the tomato on the counter.
Pick up the tomato from the counter.
Turn right and walk toward the microwave on the counter by the wall.
Heat the tomato in the microwave for a few seconds, then take it out and close the microwave.
Turn left and walk to the refrigerator.
Put the tomato in the refrigerator, in front of and to the right of the potato, then close the refrigerator.
Look down, walk straight, turn right to face the pan on the counter.
Pick up the tomato next to the pan on the counter.
Turn around, walk straight to the kitchen island, turn left, walk straight to the toaster on the counter, turn right, walk straight to the wall and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the tomato on the plate in side the microwave, close the microwave door, cook the tomato, open the microwave door, remove the tomato from the microwave and close the microwave door.
Turn left, walk straight to the stove, turn left when you reach the stove, walk straight then turn right to face the fridge and look down.
Open the fridge, place the tomato inside, close the fridge.
Turn around and walk across the room then turn right to face the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn to the left and step to the left to face the stove.
Place the knife in the pan on the stove.
Pick up the pan with a knife in it on the stove.
Turn to the right and walk forward to face the sink.
Place the pan with a knife in it on the counter to the right of the sink.
Turn and move to stand at the counter to the left of the sink.
Pick up the butter knife from the counter. 
Carry the knife to stand in front of the stove, which is to your left.
Place the knife in the pan on the back left burner of the stove.
Pick up the pan with the knife in it from the stove.
Turn around and carry the pan and knife to the kitchen sink. 
Place the pan and knife on the counter to the right of the sink.
Turn around and walk to the counter with the knife and the tomato. 
Pick up the knife to the left of the tomato. 
Turn and walk to the stove on the right. 
Put the knight down in the pan on the back right burner of the stove. 
Pick up the pan from the stove. 
Turn and walk to the left of the sink. 
Place the pan on the counter to the right of the sink. 
Walk across the room, turn right, walk forward, then turn right and face the kitchen island.
Pick up the knife on the kitchen island.
Turn left, walk towards the refrigerator, turn right, walk across the room, then turn left to face the microwave.
Slice the potato on the left side of the plate inside the microwave.
Turn left, walk across the room, then turn left and walk to the stove.
Place the knife in the pan on the front right burner of the stove.
Turn left, walk across the room, then turn left and walk to the microwave.
Grab a potato slice from the microwave.
Turn left, walk across the room, turn left and walk to the stove.
Place the potato slice in the pan in front of the knife.
Pick up the pan with the potato slice and knife.
Turn around and walk to the refrigerator.
Place the pan with the knife and potato slice in the freezer.
Walk forward until your past the island on your right then turn right and take a step then turn right so you are facing the isle.
Pick up the yellow handled knife.
Turn left and walk over to the microwave and stand facing it.
Cut the potato in the microwave into slices then close the microwave.
Turn left and walk across the room and then move to stand in front of the stove.
Put the knife in the frying pan on the bottom right burner.
Walk across the room back to the microwave.
Take a slice of potato out of the microwave then close the microwave.
Walk back over to the stove.
Put the slice of potato in the pan with the knife.
Now pick all of it up.
Turn to your right and walk over to the fridge and stand in front of it facing it.
Put the pan in the top section of the fridge to the left of the lettuce.
Walk forward, turn right at the end of the kitchen island and turn right again to face the island.
Pick up the knife from the kitchen island.
Turn left, walk forward a little, turn right, walk to the wall and turn left to face the microwave.
Open the microwave door and slice the potato to the left and close the door.
Turn to the left, turn to the left after a step, turn to the right, walk forward, turn left at the refrigerator, and walk to the stove.
Place the knife standing up in the pan on the stove.
Turn to the left, walk towards the wall, take a left and stop in front of the microwave.
Open the microwave door, remove a slice from the potato on the left and close the door.
Turn to the left, move towards the island, turn to the left again, turn to the right, walk forward, turn left at the refrigerator, and walk to the stove.
Place the potato slice near the knife in the pan on the stove.
Take the pan off of the stove.
Turn to the left towards the sink, turn to the left and walk to the refrigerator.
Open the refrigerator door and place the pan in the freezer on the left side.
Turn left, go straight, after passing the counter turn right, go straight to the wall, turn left to face the round white table.
Take the spatula from the table.
Turn left, go straight and to the left to the counter to the right of the sink.
Put the spatula in the bowl in the second from the right cabinet above the counter.
Take the bowl from the cabinet.
Turn around, go straight and to the left to the wall to the right of the white round table, turn left to face the table.
Put the bowl on the table to the bottom left of the salt.
Turn around and walk across the room to the table
Place the spatula on the table
Pick the spatula up from the table and walk across the room to the cabinets to the right of the sink
Open the upper cabinet to the right of the sink
Take the bowl out of the upper cabinet to the right of the sink
Take the bowl and spatula to the table
Place the bowl and spatula on the table
Turn around and move to the white table to the right of the window.
Pick up the spatula near the edge of the table.
Walk to the counter space to the right of the sink.
Open the cabinet door closest to the kitchen sink and place the spatula inside of the bronze bowl.
Lift the bowl out of the cabinet.
Carry the bowl back to the white kitchen table on the opposite side of the room.
Place the bowl containing the spatula down on the table to the left of the salt.
Go left and then right to face the white table.
Pick up the spatula from the white table.
Turn around and go to the upper cabinets to the right of the sink.
Put the spatula in the cup.
Pick the cup up from the cabinet.
Turn around and go to the white table.
Set the cup on the table.
Turn left and walk toward the table, turn right and walk toward the wall, turn left and walk to the table.
Pick up the spatula at the back of the table.
 Turn left and walk to the counter.
Find the brown bowl a put the spatula in it.
Pick up the brown bowl with the spatula in it.
Turn around and walk to the table.
Set the bowl down next to the salt shaker.
Turn right, walk across the room to the counter, and turn right.
Pick up the spatula next to the potatoes. 
Turn right, take a few steps, turn left to face the sink. 
Put the spatula in the sink, turn on the water, turn off the water, pick up the spatula. 
Turn left to face the counter against the other wall. 
Open the top drawer under the potato, put the spatula in the drawer, close the drawer.
Walk across the kitchen to the counter past the sink.
Pick up the spatula on the counter.
Turn and take the spatula to the sink.
Rinse off the spatula in the sink.
Turn and face the counter with the potato on it.
Put the rinsed spatula in the drawer under the potato.
Turn right and walk to the counter past the sink, then face the counter on your right. 
Pick up the spatula on the counter top.
Walk to the sink on your right.
Put the spatula in the sink, run some water, and wash the spatula. Drain the sink.
Take the spatula out of the sink an turn to your left
Open the last drawer to the left of the sink and put the spatula in, then shut the drawer.
Turn around then face the cupboard under the toaster to the right of the oven
Open the cupboard and remove the salt inside then shut the cupboard door
Move to face the drawer directly above the cupboard
Place the salt inside the drawer, shut the drawer
go to the counternext to the stove 
pick up the salt shaker
take the salt to the  drawer to the right of the stove
put the salt in the drawer
Walk forward and turn to the right and go to the counter.
Open the cabinet under the counter and take out a salt shaker. 
Turn left and go forward to the oven. Turn around completely.
Open the drawer next to the oven and place the salt shaker inside. 
Walk across the room and turn left then turn right towards the table
Pick up the yellow knife on the table.
Turn left then walk around to the other side of the table.
Use the knife to cut up the apple into slices.
Turn around and walk over to the microwave.
Open the microwave and put the knife inside it then close it. 
Turn around to the table and walk towards it. 
Pick up the middle piece of apple. 
Turn around and walk over to the microwave.
Open the microwave and put in the apple. 
Take the apple out of the microwave and shut the door. 
Put the apple in the trash that is to the left of the microwave.
Walk towards the door and face the table on the left.
Pick up the yellow knife on the table.
Turn around, walk to the right, turn around again and face the table.
Cut the apple on the table into three pieces.
Turn around and face the microwave on the counter.
Open the microwave and place the knife inside of it.
Turn around to face the table.
Pick up a slice of apple on the table.
Turn around and place the apple inside of the microwave next to the knife.
Close the door to the microwave, wait a few seconds, then open the door and remove the slice.
Move to the left to face the garbage can.
Drop the apple slice in to the garbage can.
Walk towards the door and then turn left to face the round table.
Pick up the yellow knife from the table
Turn left and stand behind the metal chair to your left.
Slice the apple behind the cup into three pieces.
Turn around and walk towards the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the knife in it, and close it.
Turn around, head towards the round table.
Pick up the middle slice of apple from the table.
Turn around and head towards the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the apple in it, heat it up, and take out the apple.
Turn left and walk towards the bin on the floor to your right.
Place the apple in the bin.
Turn right, go straight, then turn right to go to the stove.
Pick up the kettle on the left front of the stove.
Turn right and go to the sink.
Wash the kettle in the sink.
Turn left and return to the stove.
Place the kettle on the front right corner of the stove.
Turn around, walk to the stove
Grab the kettle on the stove
Turn right, walk to the sink 
Put the kettle in the sink,open the faucet, wash the kettle in the sink, close the faucet, take the kettle
turn left, walk back to the stove
Put the kettle on the right bottom stove
Move to the stove to the left of the sink.
Pick up the tea kettle from the stove.
Move to the sink to the right of you.
Place the kettle in the water and fill with water before picking up and shutting off the water.
Move to the stove to the left of you.
Place the kettle on the stove.
Turn right move to in front of the stove.
Pick up the tea pot from the stove.
Turn right move to in front of the sink.
Put the tea pot in to the sink, fill it with water, pick it back up.
Turn left move to in front of the stove.
Put the tea pot on the right forward burner of the stove.
Turn to your right twice so that you are facing the stove
Pick up the kettle from the stove
Turn right, then turn to your left, facing the sink
Place the kettle in the sink, turn on and off the water, then pick up the kettle again
Turn to your left and go back to facing the right part of the stove
Place the full kettle on the stove
Move ahead to the green sponge on the counter on the right.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn right and move across the room to the microwave.
Cut up the apple in the microwave.
Turn around an move to the fridge on your right.
Put the knife in the middle of the bottom shelf in the fridge.
Turn right and move back to the microwave.
Take a piece of apple out of the microwave.
Turn around and head back to the fridge on the right.
Put the apple in the fridge to the left of the knife for a few seconds and then take it back out again.
Turn right and head back to the microwave on your right.
Put the apple in the microwave on the right of the other apple.
Move straight to stand in front of the counter just right of the coffee maker.
Pick up the butter knife from the counter.
Turn around and head towards the trash bin in the corner, but head left just before it and continue to the stove.
Open the microwave above the stove and slice the apple with the knife.
Turn around and carry the knife to the fridge on your right.
Open the fridge and place the knife on the top shelf.
Turn back around and move to the microwave above the stove again. 
Open the microwave and remove a slice of apple.
Carry the slice of apple to the fridge.
Place the apple slice in the fridge on the shelf with the knife, close the door, and then remove the apple slice after a couple seconds. 
Turn around and carry the apple slice back to the microwave above the stove.
Place the apple slice in the microwave.
Go to the right of the coffeemaker
pick up the knife
Go to the microwave
Cut the pepper in the microwave
Go to the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Go to the microwave
Take a slice of pepper out of the microwave
Go to the fridge
Chill the pepper slice
Go to the microwave
Put the slice of pepper back in the microwave
Take the path across the room in a straight walk to the white door. Turn left to the  counter.
Take the spoon only in hand.
Take an right and an right again with the spoon. Place at the bowl behind in the stove plate.
Pick the two up together in hand.
Turn all the way around.
Turn left and turn to the right across the room for the white table.
Drop the bowl and spoon down on the table.
Move forward towards the door and turn left.
Grab the spoon off the counter that is next to the knife.
Turn left and move forward. Turn right and move towards counter. Turn right and face the stove top.
Place spoon inside pan
Pick up pan with spoon sticking out
Turn right and move forward. Stop and turn right walk across the room to the white table.
Place pan down with spoon still inside between the egg and loaf of bread.
Walk forward then turn left and face the counter.
Pick up the spoon from the counter.
Turn left then right and face the stove top.
Place the spoon in the pan on the back left burner.
Pick up the pan that has the spoon in it.
Turn around and walk to the table on the other side of the room.
Place the pan on the table.
Turn left and go to the middle of the counter to the right of the fridge, then face the octagonal brown plate that is on the counter.
Pick of the center of the three heads of lettuce.
Carry the head of lettuce to the fridge on your left.
Put the head of lettuce on the bottom shelf of the fridge.
Go back to the octagonal plate on the counter.
Pick up the head of lettuce to the left of the plate.
Return to the fridge, carrying the head of lettuce.
Put this head of lettuce on the right side of the bottom shelf in the fridge.
Walk to the counter of the island then turn left and walk to the fridge then take two or three steps right until you face the head of lettuce in the middle of two others.
Pickup the middle head of lettuce.
Turn left and walk to the fridge then turn right to face it and take a step back.
Put the lettuce in the fridge.
Walk back to where you got the first head of lettuce
Pick up the head of lettuce that was to the left of the first one.
Walk back to the fridge.
Put the head of lettuce next to the first one in the fridge and close the door.
move to the counter to the right of the fridge
pick up lettuce from the counter
move to the fridge to the left of you
put the lettuce in the fridge
move to the counter to the right of the fridge
pick up lettuce from the counter
move to the fridge to the left of you
put the lettuce in the fridge
Go around the table and face the green island on your right.
Pick up the knife from the counter in front of you.
Turn left then right and head towards the stove.
Slice the tomato on the counter on your left.
Turn around and face the table on your left.
Place the knife on the table in front of you.
Turn left and head towards the counter by the stove.
Pick up a tomato slice from the counter in front of you.
Turn right then face the microwave above the stove on your left.
Heat up the tomato slice in the microwave, take out the tomato slice and close the microwave.
Turn around and face the table on your left.
Place the tomato slice on the table in front of you.
Move to the island, near the left most chair.
Pick up the knife that is on the plate.
Turn left, move to the counter left of the stove.
Slice the tomato on the left, far from the edge.
Turn right, move to the island opposite the chairs.
Place the knife onto the island, left of the pan.
Turn left, move to the counter left of the stove.
Pick up a slice of tomato.
Turn right, move to in front of the stove.
Place the tomato slice in to the microwave, cook it, pick it back up.
Turn right, move to the island opposite the chairs.
Place the tomato slice on to the island.
Move to the right and walk around to the end of the green counter top.
Pick the yellow knife up from off of the green counter top.
Turn to the left then to the right and walk straight towards the stove.
Slice the tomato to the right of the stove.
Turn around and move to the left to face the center of the green counter top.
Place the knife on top of the counter top.
Turn around and move to the right to face the stove top.
Pick up a slice of the tomato.
Move to the right and look up to face the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the tomato slice in the microwave, close the microwave, wait a second, open the microwave, pick up the tomato slice and close the microwave.
Turn around and move to the left to face the center of the green counter top.
Place the tomato slice on the center of the green counter top.
move right towards the table 
pick up the knife
head for the sink
slice the tomato by the sink
turn right and head for the table
drop the knife on the table
turn left and head for the sink
pick up the tomato slice
head left to the oven
place the tomato to cook in the oven
turn around and head towards the table
place the cooked slice on the table
turn left, go to end of green counter
pick up yellow handled knife from counter
go to counter to the left of stove
slice tomato in the back
turn right, go to green counter to the right
place knife on pencil on the counter next to square pan
turn left, go to counter to the left of stove
pick up tomato slice from counter behind whole tomato
go to microwave above stove to the right
place tomato slice in microwave, turn on microwave, open microwave door, pick up tomato slice from microwave
turn around, go to green counter
place tomato slice on green counter in between spatula and yellow handled knife
Turn around completely and face the sink.
Pick up the egg from sink.
Turn to the right and walk forward. Turn right again and walk to the fridge. 
Open the fridge and place the egg inside. Close the fridge and chill the egg. Open the fridge and take the egg out. 
Turn to the right and walk forward. Turn right at the oven and walk to the sink. 
Place the egg back into the sink. 
Turn around to face the sink.
Pick up the egg sitting next to the spoon.
Turn right and walk to the fridge to the right.
Place the egg inside the fridge, cool it then remove it.
With the egg, turn right and walk to the sink to your right.
Place the egg inside the sink.
turn around to face the sink
pick up the brown egg from the sink sideboard
turn around to face the fridge
put the egg in the fridge for a few seconds, take the egg out of fridge
turn around to face the sink
put the egg into the sink basin
Turn around and head towards the sink to your left.
Pick up the cup from the sink.
Turn around, walk straight to the counter, and then turn right towards the microwave above the stove.
Heat up the cup and take it back out of the microwave.
Turn around, walk towards the counter, and turn left towards the coffee maker.
Place the cup on the coffee maker.
Turn around and head to the sink on your left
Pick up the coffee mug that is sitting in the sink
Turn around and cross the room to the counter then turn right and head to the stove
Open the microwave and place the mug inside, to the left of the other mug, and then close the microwave and turn it on. Then open the microwave and pick up the mug and close the door
Turn around and head forward then head left to the coffee maker
Place the mug into the coffee maker
turn around and move forward a bit, then turn left and face the sink
pick up the cup from the sink
turn left and move forward to the refrigerator, the turn left and head to the counter, then turn right and move forward to the stove, then look up the red microwave that sits on the shelf above the stove
open the microwave, put the cup inside, then close the microwave, turn on the microwave for a short time, then open the microwave and take out the cup, then close the microwave
turn around and head towards the counter, then turn left and move forward to the counter with the black and blue coffee maker on top
put the cup into the coffee maker
Walk over to the counter.
Grab the tomato.
Head over to the fridge.
Chill the tomato in the fridge.
Grab the tomato back and head over to the trash bin.
Place the tomato in the trash bin.
walk to face two tiered counter
pick up tomato from counter
walk to face fridge
chill and remove tomato from fridge
walk to face blue trash bin
put tomato in trash bin
turn around and walk straight then turn right towards the counter
pick up the tomato off of the counter
turn right and walk straight towards the fridge then turn right then left towards the fridge 
open the fridge and put the tomato inside then close the door then open the door and remove the tomato and close the door
turn left and walk straight then turn right towards the garbage can
put the tomato down inside the garbage can on the floor
Turn around and go to the counter to the left of the oven
Grab the large knife off of the counter
Look up at the counter
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices
Look down at the counter
Put the knife down on the counter
Look up at the counter
Grab a slice of the tomato
Turn left and stop at the fridge
Cool the tomato in the fridge and then take it out
Turn around and go to the microwave
Put the tomato in the microwave
Turn around and walk forward to face the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Look up to face the tomato on the right side of the counter.
Cut the tomato on the counter into slices.
Look down to face the edge of the counter.
Place the knife on the counter.
Look up to face the tomato on the counter.
Pick up the slice of tomato on the counter.
Take a step to the left to face the fridge.
Cool the tomato in the fridge and then remove it.
Turn around and walk across the room to face the microwave.
Place the tomato slice in the microwave.
Turn around and face the counter by the stove in front of you.
Take the knife off of the counter in front of you.
Face the tomato on the counter in front of you.
Slice the tomato on the counter in front of you.
Look down at the counter in front of you.
Place the knife on the counter in front of you.
Look at the tomato on the counter in front of you.
Take a tomato slice from the counter in front of you.
Turn left and face the fridge on your right.
Place the tomato slice in the fridge, take the tomato out and close the fridge.
Turn around and face the microwave on top of the sink in front of you.
Place the tomato slice in the microwave in front of you and close it.
Walk straight ahead to the toaster.
Pick up the spoon on the counter.
Walk right to the fridge.
Place the spoon in the cup in the fridge.
Pick up the cup with the spoon in it.
Turn around and forward to the table against the wall.
Put the cup on the table in front of the bread and to the left of the leftmost wine bottle.
Turn to the right and move to the counter with the toaster by the fridge.
Pick up the spoon in front of the toaster. 
Move to the right to the fridge. Open the door. 
Put the spoon in the wine glass. 
Pick up the wine glass from the shelf. Close the door, 
Turn around. Move to the white table across the room.
Place the glass with the spoon inside on the table. 
Turn and go to the counter that is to the left of the fridge.
Pick up the spoon that is on the counter in front of the toaster. 
Take the spoon to the fridge.
Open the fridge.  Put the spoon in the bowl that is on the left side on the second shelf. 
Pick the bowl up with the spoon in it. Shut the fridge
Take the bowl with the spoon in it to the table.
Put the bowl with the spoon in it on the table in front of the lettuce but to the right of it.
Turn right and walk to the fridge.
Take a tomato from the fridge.
Turn around and walk to the stool then turn right and walk to the sink.
Wash the tomato off in the sink on the left then pick it up.
Turn right to face the microwave.
Put the tomato on the counter to the left of the sponge.
Turn to the right and face the fridge.
Pick the tomato up from the shelf in the fridge.
Turn around and cross the room to stand in front of the sink.
Put the tomato in the sink and turn the water on and then off and then pick the tomato up again.
Move to the right and face the counter.
Put the tomato on the counter to left of the microwave.
Turn right, move to the fridge.
Pick up the tomato in the fridge. 
Bring the tomato to the sink on the left.
Wash the tomato in the left sink. 
Bring the washed tomato to the microwave on the left.
Put the washed tomato down on the counter, next to the microwave.
Turn right and walk to the microwave.
Take the mug out of the microwave.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Wash the mug in the right basin of the sink.
Turn right and walk to the counter, then turn left and face the coffee maker.
Place the mug in the coffee maker.
Turn around and walk to the microwave on the left.
Grab the dirty mug from the microwave.
Turn around and walk forward then walk right to face the sink.
Rinse off the mug in the sink.
Move right and face the coffee maker on the right.
Place the mug in the coffee maker.
Turn around, move to the microwave on your left.
Take the mug out of the microwave. 
Turn around, bring the mug to the sink on your right.
Wash the mug in the right sink with water. 
Bring the cleaned mug to the coffee machine on the right of the sink. 
Put the mug on the coffee machine.
Turn around and walk over to the side of the kitchen island that is across from the dishwasher. 
Pick up the plate from the kitchen island. 
Turn to your right and walk over to the stove area. 
Place the plate inside the microwave that is above the stove and heat it up before pulling it back out. 
Turn around and walk over to the fridge. 
Place the plate inside the fridge and close the door.
Turn around, head towards the sink, and then turn right towards the middle of the kitchen island on your left.
Pick up the plate from the island.
Turn right towards the microwave above the stove.
Warm up the plate and take the plate out of the microwave.
Turn around and head towards the fridge on your left.
Place the plate to the left of the tomato inside the fridge.
Turn around and then move to your right twice so that you are facing the kitchen counter
Pick up a plate off of the counter
Move to your right, left and then turn right to face the microwave
Plate the plate in the microwave, heat it for a few seconds and then take it out
Turn right twice and then turn to your left to face the fridge
Put the plate in the fridge and then close the fridge door
Turn right and head towards the table on your right.
Pick up the lettuce on the right edge of the table.
Take a step to the left.
Place the lettuce back to the original spot.
Pick up the yellow knife in between the salt shaker and fork.
Slice the right lettuce in several piece.
Place the knife back on the table.
Pick up a slice of lettuce from the table.
Turn around and walk towards the fridge.
Open the fridge, place the lettuce next to the top tomato, close the fridge to let it cool, and take it back out.
Turn left and walk towards the toaster on the left counter.
Place the slice lettuce in front of the toaster.
Walk left and towards the table
Grab a lettuce from the table
Walk away from the table with the lettuce
Set the lettuce on the table again
Grab a knife from the table
Slice the lettuce on the table
Grab a slice from the lettuce
Walk towards the fridge
Put the slice of lettuce inside the fridge
Close the fridge door in open it the fridge again
Take the slice of lettuce  walk towards the counter 
Put the slice of lettuce on the counter next to the bread
Turn right, go straight, turn right to face the white table.
Take the lettuce next to the spoon from the table.
Move left a step but still face towards the table.
Put the lettuce back in the same place.
Take the knife in between the salt, pepper, and fork from the table.
Cut the lettuce to the right of the fork on the table into slices.
Put the knife in front of the pepper.
Take a slice of lettuce from the table.
Turn around, go to the fridge.
Open the fridge, put the lettuce on the middle rack to the right of the tomato. Close then open the fridge. Take the lettuce.
Turn left, go straight, then turn left and go to the counter to the left of the oven.
Put the lettuce in front of the toaster.
Turn right and walk around to face the opposite side of the counter.
Pick up the lettuce on the counter.
Step left to face the end of the counter.
Place the lettuce on the end of the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Cut the lettuce on the counter into slices.
Place the knife on the counter.
Pick up a slice of lettuce on the counter.
Turn around to face the fridge.
Cool the lettuce slice in the fridge and remove it.
Take a step to the left to face the counter.
Place the lettuce slice on the counter.
Turn around, go forward, turn left, go forward past the counter, turn left, go forward, turn left and face the counter with the lettuce.
Take the lettuce from the counter.
Move a step to the right, face the counter.
Put the lettuce on the counter to the left of the fork.
Take the small knife to the left of the big spoon from the counter.
Cut the lettuce on the counter into slices.
Put the knife on the counter.
Take a slice of lettuce from the counter.
Turn left, go forward, turn left to the fridge, go to the fridge.
Chill the lettuce on the top bin on the left side of the fridge. Take the lettuce from the fridge.
Go in front of the coffee maker to the left of the fridge.
Put the lettuce on the counter in front of the coffee maker.
Turn around and go around the counter on the left to the other side. 
Pick up the lettuce on the counter. 
Move over to the right side of the counter. 
Place the lettuce back on the counter on the left of the fork and spatula. 
Pick up the gray knife from the counter. 
Cut the lettuce on the counter. 
Throw the knife back on the counter on top of the golden ladle. 
Pick up one slice of the lettuce from the counter. . 
Turn around and go to the front of the refrigerator.
Remove the lettuce after freezing it in the freezer. 
Turn left to go to the front of the counter with the coffee machine. 
Place the slice of the lettuce on the counter in front of the coffee machine.
Go to the left and the take a right and turn left to face the stove.
Pick the pan up from the back of the stove behind the larger pan.
Turn around and go left to face the sink.
Put the pot in the sink and turn the water on and then off and pick the pot back up again.
Go left and stand to face the stove.
Put the pot back on the back, right corner of the stove.
Turn left and walk straight then turn right at the kitchen island and walk straight to the stove and turn left to face it
Pick up the small round pan from the back right stove top
Turn around and walk straight then turn left to face the kitchen sink
Place the pan in the sink and rinse with water then remove the pan
Turn around and walk forward slightly, then turn right and walk up to the stove
Place the pan on the back right stove top
Go to the stove.
Pick up a pan on the stove.
 Turn and go to the sink.
Wash the pan in the sink. 
Turn and go to the stove.
Put the pan on the stove.
Turn to your right so that you can face the sink.
Pick up the knife from the sink.
Use the knife to cut the apple that's in the sink.
Look down to find a spot for the knife.
Put the knife in the sink.
Look back up to focus on the apple.
Grab a slice of the apple from in the sink.
With the apple in hand, turn around and move to face the stove.
Put the apple slice in the pot on the back right burner.
Pick up the pot from the burner.
Bring the pot with you back over to the sink.
Put the pot in the sink.
turn right, turn left to the sink
pick up knife from the sink
cut apple with the knife
look down at the sink
place the knife in the sink
look up at apple in the sink
pick up the apple from the sink
turn around , walk straight, turn right to the stove
place the apple into the pot on the stove
pick up the pot from the stove
turn around, turn left to the sink
place the pot in to the sink
Turn right and face the sink.
Grab the knife from the sink.
Slice the apple in the sink.
Face the cabinets below the sink.
Place the knife in the sink.
Look up from the cabinets.
Grab an apple slice from the sink.
Turn around and walk then walk right to the stove.
Place the apple in the pot.
Grab the pot from the stove.
Turn right and walk back to the sink.
Place the pot in the sink.
Move to stand in front of the fridge. 
Open the door and remove a potato from the fridge. 
Carry the potato to the microwave at the other end of the counter. 
Place the potato in the microwave to heat and then remove it once done. 
Carry the potato to the fridge.
Open the fridge and place the potato on the shelf to the right of the tomato.
Turn left and walk to the fridge. 
Open the fridge door, pick up the potato to the right of the tomato, close the door. 
Turn right and walk to the microwave on left. 
Put the potato in the microwave, heat up the potato, take the potato out of the microwave. 
Turn left and walk to the fridge. 
Put the potato in the fridge next to the tomato and close the door. 
Turn left and walk around the room the face the fridge.
Take the potato out of the fridge.
Turn right and walk around the room then turn left to face the microwave.
Heat the potato in the microwave, then remove it.
Turn left and walk around the room the face the fridge.
Place the potato in the fridge on the bottom shelf.
turn left, turn right to the counter
pick up knife from counter
turn around, walk to the table
slice into tomato on table
place knife down on table 
pick up tomato slice from table 
turn around and walk to the microwave
open microwave, put slice into microwave, cook, open door and remove tomato 
turn around and walk to the fridge 
open fridge door and put tomato slice into fridge 
Turn left, hang a right at the fridge and walk to the counter.
Pick up the knife behind the roll of paper towels on the counter.
Turn around, take a right towards the fridge, turn left and walk to the black round table on the left.
Slice the tomato on the left side of the table.
Put the knife on the table to the left of the loaf of bread on the right side of the table.
Pick up a slice of tomato from the table.
Turn around, take a right at the fridge, turn right and walk to the microwave on the counter to the left.
Put the tomato slice in the microwave, heat it, remove it and close the door.
Turn around and take a right to the fridge.
Put the heated slice of tomato on the top shelf to the right inside the fridge and close the door.
Go forward to the counter on the right of the microwave across the kitchen.
Pick up the knife behind the paper towel from the counter. 
Turn around and go to the right side of the black round table across the kitchen. 
Slice the tomato behind the white plate on the table.
Place the knife on the table on the right of the gray plate. 
Pick up one slice of tomato from the table. 
Turn left and go back to the counter with a microwave on top. 
Remove the tomato after heating in the microwave. 
Turn around and go to the front of the refrigerator.
Place the slice of tomato in the refrigerator. 
Turn left and go to the table
Pick up a plate and knife from the table
Turn around and go to the fridge
Put the plate and knife in the freezer drawer at the bottom of the fridge to chill then take the plate and knife out of the freezer drawer
Turn right and make your way back to the table
Put the plate and knife on the table
Walk over to the table.
Grab the plate.
Walk over to the fridge
Chill the plate in the fridge
Grab the plate out of the fridge and walk back to the table
Place the plate on the table
walk to face green table
pick up sharp knife and plate from table
walk to face fridge
chill and remove knife and plate from fridge
walk to face green table
put plate and knife on table
Torn around towards the island.
Pick up the knife next to the right of large scoop on the island.
Move to your right around the island to the left side of the stool.
Slice the head of lettuce on the island .
Move around the stool to your right.
Place the knife on the island beside the lettuce.
Move back around the stool to your left.
Pick up a slice of lettuce on the counter.
Turn to your right and go to the refrigerator.
Put the slice of lettuce on the second shelf below the tomatoes, let chill, remove, and close refrigerator.
Turn around and go to the green container to the left of the stove.
Place the lettuce into the container.
Turn right towards the island.
Pick up the yellow knife on the counter. 
Turn left and go to the other side of the island to the side with a lettuce on the top. 
Cut the lettuce into halves on the counter. 
Turn right and move around the chair back to the front of the island.
Cut the lettuce into smaller pieces and put the knife on the lettuce. 
Turn left to go back to the left side of the island.
Pick up one piece of the lettuce from the counter.
Turn right and go to the front of the refrigerator. 
Chill the lettuce in the refrigerator and remove it. 
Turn around and got to the green trash can on the floor on the left of the stove. 
Place the lettuce in the trash can.
Turn left and walk around to face the opposite side of the center table.
Pick up the knife on the center table.
Look down to face the lettuce on the center table.
Cut the lettuce on the center table into slices.
Take a step to the right to face the center table.
Place the knife on the center table.
Take a step to the left to face the lettuce on the center table.
Pick up a slice of lettuce on the center table.
Turn right and walk to the fridge and turn right to face it.
Cool the lettuce slice in the fridge and remove it.
Turn around and cross the room to face the trash can.
Place the lettuce slice in the trash can.
Turn around, hang a left at the counter and walk to the stove on the right.
Open the microwave above the stove, pick up the potato inside and close the door.
Hang a right at the sink and walk to the fridge on the left.
Put the potato inside the fridge on the top shelf, chill it, remove it and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the black bin on the floor to the left.
Put the chilled potato inside the black bin on the floor.
Turn around, go across the room to the stove and look up at the microwave.
Pick up the potato in the microwave.
Turn around and go back across the room to the fridge.
Chill the potato in the fridge and pick it back up.
Turn right and go to the trash can in the corner.
Put the potato in the trash can to the left of the tomatoes.
turn right and move forwards to the counter and then face the stove and look up
take the potato out of the microwave and close the door
make 2 left turns  and head forward towards the fridge and face it
put the potato inside the fridge and cool it and then take it out and shot the door
turn right and move towards the trash can
throw the potato in the trash
Turn right and walk two steps then turn left to face then counter with the lettuce on it.
Pick up the lettuce that's in front of you.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Wash the lettuce in the sink and then pick it back up and shut off the water.
Turn left and walk to the counter then turn left and walk past the stove and turn right to face the garbage.
Put the lettuce in the garbage.
Turn right and then left, facing the short side of the table.
Pick up the head of lettuce on the table.
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Rinse the lettuce in the sink.
Turn left and walk around the counter, to the end where the trash bin is.
Place the lettuce in the trash bin.
Turn right and head towards the silver table.
Pick up the lettuce at the edge of the table .
Turn around and place the lettuce inside the sink.
Turn on the water in the sink to wash the lettuce.
Turn off the faucet and pick up the lettuce in the sink.
Turn around and walk to the bin, place the lettuce inside the green bin
turn around towards the sink
pick up the egg
turn to the sink at  the left
wash the egg in the sink
turn around and head to the fridge
place the egg in the fridge
Turn around and walk to the sink.
Pick up the egg that's to your right by the knife.
Position yourself so you can use the left sink that's in front of you.
Wash the egg in the left sink and then pick it back up .
Turn around and walk to the fridge that's on your left so you can use it.
Put the egg on the middle shelf of the fridge before closing the door.
turn around, walk to the sink
grab the egg on the counter
walk to the left a little
put the egg in the left sink, wash it with water, take the egg out
turn around, walk to the refrigerator on the left
open the refrigerator, put the egg in
Turn and go to the counter to the right of the fridge.
Pick up the white coffee cup that is behind the wine bottle on the counter.
Move over to the microwave with the coffee cup.
Open the microwave.  Put the coffee cup in the microwave and shut the door.  Start the microwave. When finished open the door and take the coffee cup out.  Shut the door.
Turn around and go to the coffee maker with the coffee mug.
Put the coffee mug on to the coffee maker.
Move to the microwave.
Pick up the mug from the microwave table.
Bring the mug to the microwave.
Heat the mug in the microwave.
Bring the heated mug to the coffee machine. 
Put the heated mug on the coffee machine. 
Turn right, then turn right again to go toward the microwave. 
Pick up the mug from behind the wine bottle. 
Turn right, then turn left to face the microwave.
Heat the mug in the microwave.
Turn around, then turn left, then go straight and turn left at the coffee maker.
Put the mug at the coffee maker, on the table.
Turn around towards the right, turn right before the blue trash can and then turn left toward the fridge.
Open the fridge, take the potato from the top shelf and shut the fridge.
Turn to the right, approach the counter and then turn left toward the microwave.
Open the microwave, put the potato to the left of the mug, close the microwave, cook the potato and then pick up the potato.
Turn left and then right to the fridge.
Open the fridge and put the potato in the fridge in front of the white egg.
Walk to the fridge on your right.
Grab a potato from the fridge.
Walk to the microwave next to the fridge.
Place a potato inside the microwave and remove it.
Go back to the fridge on the left.
Place the potato in the fridge.
Turn around, hang a right at the blue container on the floor and walk to the black fridge on the left.
Open the fridge, pick up the potato on the top shelf in front of the lettuce, and close the door.
Turn right and walk to the microwave on the counter to the left.
Open the microwave, put the potato inside to the left of the mug, heat it for a few seconds, remove the potato and close the door.
Turn left and walk to the fridge on the right side.
Place the hot potato inside the fridge on the bottom shelf in front of the white egg on the left side and close the door.
Turn around and move to the counter on the left of the stove.
Pick up the green sponge to the left of the stove.
Move slightly to the stove on the right.
Set the green sponge on end in the right back corner of the pan on the left front burner.
Pick up the pan with the sponge.
Turn around and move across the room to the green island on the left.
Put the pan on top of the island directly above the coffee cups.
Move to the counter top the left of the stove
Pick up sponge from the counter
Move to the stove to the right of current position
Place sponge inside pot on the stove
Pick up pot with the sponge inside of it
Move to the island counter across from the sink.
Place pan on top of island counter
turn right and walk towards the kitchen sink, then turn right and walk to the stove at the end of the room
grab the sponge off of the counter to the left of the stove
move to the right a bit to face the center of the stove
place the sponge inside of the pan on the front left burner
pick up the pan with the sponge in it
turn around and walk to the end of the counter on the right, then turn left and approach the center of the kitchen island
place the pan down on the right side of the kitchen island
Turn around and head to the stove
Pick up the skillet that is on the back left burner
Turn around and head to the fridge across the room to your left
Open the fridge and place the skillet on the top shelf then close the fridge. Open the fridge and pick up the skillet then close the fridge
Turn around and head to the stove on your right.  
Place the skillet on the stove.
turn right and walk to the end of the room
grab the sauce pan off of the back left burner
turn around and walk to the end of the room, then turn left and walk to the fridge at the end of the room
place the sauce pan inside of the fridge to let it cool, then take it back out again
turn around and walk until the stove is on your right across the room, then turn right and walk over to that stove at the end of the room
place the sauce pan back down on the top left burner of the stove
Go to the stove in front of you.
Pick up the frying pan.
Turn around and go to the fridge.
Put the pan in the fridge, leave it for a few moments, then take it out again.
Go back to the stove.
Put the pan on the back left burner of the stove.
Take a few steps and turn right to face the counter.
Pick up the spatula on the counter.
Turn right and walk to the stove on the left.
Put the spatula in the pot on the left.
Pick up the pot with the spatula.
Turn left and walk toward the door then turn right to face the table.
Place the pot and spatula on the table.
Take a step forward, then turn right and walk up to the toaster on the counter.
Pick up the metal spatula off of the counter.
Turn right and walk up to the oven.
Put the spatula in the large metal pot that is on the back left burner of the stove.
Pick up the large metal pot with the spatula in it.
Turn left and begin walking across the room, then turn right to face the white table.
Place the large metal pot with the spatula in it onto the right side of the white table.
Turn to your right and face the counter top on the left side of the stove
Pick the turner on the edge of the counter top
Turn to your right then face the stove
Put the turner in the bowl on the stove
Pick up the bowl with turner on the stove
Turn to your left and head to the table beside the door
Put the bowl with turner on the right side of the table
Move to the left side of the kitchen island
Pick up the sponge from the kitchen island
Turn around and move to the stove
Put the sponge in the fry pan at the at the back
Pick up the fry pan from the stove
Turn around and go to the far side of the kitchen island
Put the fry pan on the kitchen island behind the apple
Turn to the left and then right to face the island on the right side.
Pick up the sponge from the front of the counter.
Carry the sponge and turn to the stove on the right side.
Place the sponge in the pan  on the back right burner.
Pick up the pan from the back right burner.
Carry the pan and turn around. Then turn right and right again to face the long side of the island.
Place the pan on the counter, towards the middle.
turn left and walk to the kitchen island. 
Pick up the sponge to the left of the loaf of bread. 
Turn right and walk to the stove. 
Put the sponge down on the pan on the back right burner of the stove. 
Pick up the pan with the sponge in it. 
Walk back over to the kitchen island. 
Put the pan down on the kitchen island behind the apple. 
face the counter top, then move around the middle table and face the sink
pick up the knife in the sink
turn left and go around the middle table until you are facing the grey plate and the apple
slice the apple on the table to the left of the grey plate
turn around and face the green waste bin
throw the knife in the green waste bin
turn around and face the center table again
pick up a slice of apple on the center table
turn left, then right along the counter top until you face the microwave on your left
place the apple in the microwave for several seconds, then remove it
go right, then move straight past the refrigerator and face the center table on your right
place the apple in front of the whole apple on the center table
Turn right, turn left, walk straight, turn left to the sink.
Pick up the knife in the sink.
Walk straight, turn left, walk straight, turn left to the counter.
Slice the apple on the counter.
Turn left. Walk straight, turn left to the green bin.
Put the knife in the bin.
Turn left, walk straight, turn left to the counter.
Pick up a slice of the apple.
Turn left, walk straight, turn right to the microwave.
Open the microwave, put the apple inside, close the microwave. Turn on the microwave. Open the microwave.
Turn right, turn left, turn right, walk straight, turn left, turn right, walk straight, turn right to the counter.
Put the slice on the counter.
turn and walk to the sink
pick up the knife that is in the sink
   turn  and walk to the  Apple that is on the counter
slice the Apple that is on the counter
 turn and walk to the trash can
 throw the knife into the trash can
  turn and walk  to the counter 
 pick up a piece of sliced Apple
 turn and walk to the microwave
   put a slice of apple into the microwave  turn on the microwave  wait take the Apple out of the microwave
 turn and walk to the counter 
  put the apple slice on the counter in front of the apple on the counter
Walk to the edge of the kitchen counter on your left.
Grab a green cup from the counter.
Walk to the microwave on your right.
Put the cup in the microwave, then take it out.
Walk to the kitchen counter on your left.
Place the cup on the counter.
Turn around and move to the end of the counter with the grey bowl and tomato.
Pick up the green cup to the right of the bread on the counter.
Turn right and move to the microwave on the counter.
Microwave the cup for a moment, then take it back out of the microwave.
Turn left and go to the counter near the knife.
Place the green cup on the counter to the left of the knife.
Turn around, walk to table
Pick up green cup from table
Turn around, walk to microwave
Cook cup in the microwave
Turn left, walk to counter
Put cup on counter in front of bread
Turn around and walk across the room then turn left and walk to the table, then turn left to face it. 
Pick up the black coffee cup on the table. 
Turn left and walk to the fridge across the room.
Open the fridge and put the coffee cup in the center next to the plate, close the fridge for a three seconds, then open the fridge and pick up the coffee cup.
Turn right and walk across the room, then turn left to face the counter. 
Place the coffee mug underneath the coffee machine on the counter. 
turn around, go to end of green counter facing spatula 
pick up black coffee mug on green counter to the right of potato
turn left, go to black refrigerator
open refrigerator, place black mug on space in between top shelves, close refrigerator, open refrigerator, pick up black mug from top shelf, close refrigerator
turn right, go to counter with toaster and coffee maker on the left
place mug on heater plate on coffee maker
Turn around, walk straight, turn left near the fridge, face the table. 
Pick up the black cup near the edge of the table and the chairs. 
Turn to the left to go to the fridge. 
Open the fridge, put the cup between the orange and the potato in the fridge, close the fridge, let it sit for a few seconds, pick the cup again and close the fridge. 
Walk to the right, walk straight towards the stove, turn left to face the coffee maker on the counter top. 
Put the cup on the coffee maker. 
Turn left to face the counter.
Pick up the knife on the counter.
Turn around and walk forward and turn left to face the fridge.
Cut the lettuce in the fridge into slices.
Look up to face the fridge.
Place the knife in the fridge.
Look up to face the fridge.
Pick up the slice of lettuce in the fridge.
Turn left and walk forward to face the sink.
Wash the lettuce slice in the sink and remove it.
Turn around and walk to face the fridge.
Place the slice of lettuce in the fridge.
Turn left and face the counter in front of you.
Take the knife off of the counter in front of you.
Turn around and face the fridge to your left.
Slice the lettuce in the fridge in front of you.
Close the fridge in front of you.
Open the fridge in front of you, place the knife inside and close it.
Face the fridge in front of you.
Take a lettuce slice out of the fridge in front of you.
Turn left and face the sink in front of you.
Wash the lettuce in the sink in front of you and take it out.
Turn around and face the fridge to your left.
Place the lettuce slice in the fridge and close it.
Turn left, go to the counter
Pick up the knife on the counter
Turn around, go to the fridge
Slice the lettuce in the fridge
Turn down to the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Turn up to the fridge
Pick up a slice of lettuce from the fridge
Turn around, go forward, turn right, go to the sink
Put the lettuce slice in the sink, wash the lettuce slice with water, pick up the lettuce slice from the sink
Turn around go forward turn left to the fridge
Put the lettuce slice in the fridge
walk across the kitchen and turn to the coffee maker on the right.
pick up the coffee cup sitting on the coffee maker.
Walk to the sink to the left of the coffee maker.
Put the coffee cup in the sink, and then fill the sink with water, then pick the cup back up.
Walk back to the coffee maker on the right side of the sink.
put the coffee cup back into the coffee maker.
Turn around in the kitchen and find the coffee maker on the right.
Pick up the mug from the coffee maker.
Take the mug right next to you and face the sink.
Place the mug in the sink, turn the water on and off. Pick up the mug from the sink.
Take the mug to the right and find the coffee machine.
Place the mug under the coffee machine.
Turn around to the left and walk to the coffee maker. 
Grab the mug from the coffeemaker.
Turn to the left and walk to the sink.
Place the mug into the sink and rinse it with water. Remove the mug from the sink. 
Turn to the right and walk back to the coffeemaker. 
Place the mug on the coffeemaker. 
Turn around and go to the sink to your right. 
Pick up the knife, behind the cup, from the sink. 
Turn around and walk to the end of the kitchen, then turn to the table on your right. 
Cut the apple to the right of the bread, on the table, into slices. 
Turn to your right and go to the cabinets underneath the sink across from you. 
Place the knife in the front of the left cabinet, underneath the sink. 
Turn around and walk across the kitchen to get back to the table on your right where the apple is. 
Pick up one of the apple slices on the table, to the right of the loaf of bread. 
Turn to your right and go to the sink. 
Place the apple slice in the back, left corner of the sink, turn the water on, rinse off the apple slice, turn the water off, and remove the apple slice from the refrigerator. 
Turn to your right and go across the room to the garbage bin on the floor, to the left of the refrigerator. 
Place the apple in the garbage bin on the floor. 
Go to the sink.
Pick up the butter knife in the sink on the right side.
Go to the wooden table.
Slice the apple near the front edge of the table.
Go to the cabinet under the sink.
Put the butter knife in the cabinet under the sink.
Go to the wooden table.
Pick up an apple slice on the table.
Tale the apple slice to the sink.
Rinse off the apple slice in the sink.
Go to the trash can next to the refrigerator.
Throw the clean apple slice in the trash.
Turn around, go forward, turn right at the sink
Pick up the knife from the sink
Turn around, go forward, turn right at the table 
Cut the apple on the table 
Turn around, go forward a bit, turn left and go to the cupboard under the sink
Put the knife in the cupboard
Turn around, go forward, turn right at the table 
Pick up an apple piece from the table 
Turn right, go to the sink
Put the apple piece in the sink, wash the apple piece with water, pick up the apple piece from the sink
Turn right, go forward, turn right
Put the apple piece into the bin
walk to face trash bin next to stove
pick up tomato from bin
walk to face fridge
chill tomato in fridge, remove tomato from fridge
walk to face trash bin next to stove
put tomato inside trash bin
Turn right, hang a right at the fridge, take a left at the stove and walk to the gray bin on the floor to the left.
Pick up the tomato from inside the gray bin on the floor.
Turn right, take a right at the stove and walk to the black fridge ahead.
Put the tomato on the middle shelf to the right of the egg, chill it, remove it and close the door.
Turn around, hang a left at the stove and walk to the gray bin on the floor to the right.
Put the chilled tomato inside the gray bin on the floor.
Turn around and walk to the stove then turn left and walk to the end of the counter then turn right to face the grey trash can.
Take the tomato from the trash can.
Turn right and walk to the dishwasher then turn right and walk to the fridge.
Cool the tomato in the fridge then take it out.
Turn around and walk to the stove then turn right and walk to the grey trash can.
Put the tomato in the trash can.
Go to the counter to the right and above the dishwasher.
Pick up the butter knife on the counter.
Go to the microwave.
Slice the apple in the microwave.
Turn and go to the stove.
Put the butter knife in the pan on the front right burner of the stove.
Go back to the microwave.
Pick up a slice of apple in the microwave.
Take the apple slice to the stove.
Put the apple slice in the pan on the stove with the butter knife.
Pick up the pan with the apple slice and butter knife inside.
Go to the counter above and to the right of the dishwasher.
Set the pan with the items down on the counter.
walk forward towards the sink and turn left
pick up the knife from the counter
turn left and walk forward then turn right towards the microwave
open the microwave door
slice the apple that is in the microwave, then turn around and walk forward towards the wall then turn left
place knife on the stove
turn around and walk forward then turn right and walk towards the microwave
open the microwave and pull apple slices out of it
turn around and walk forward turn left and walk towards stove
place apple in the pan 
pick up the pan from the stove
turn left with the pan and walk towards the counter
place the pan on the counter
Walk straight, make a left when your reach the sink, then walk straight to the counter.
Pick up the knife of the counter.
Take the knife, turn left then walk to the microwave to your right.
With the knife, slice the apple inside the microwave.
Take the knife, turn right and walk to the stove to your right.
Place the knife on in the pan on the stove.
Turn around and walk to the microwave to your right.
Grab a piece of apple from the microwave.
Turn right and walk to the stove to your right.
Place the piece of apple next to the knife in the pan on the stove.
Take the pan that has the knife and piece of apple in it.
Turn left and walk straight to the counter.
Place the pan with the knife and piece of apple in it on the counter.
Turn left and go to the counter left of the refrigerator
Pick up the egg
Turn around and go to the refrigerator
Open the refrigerator, put the egg on the top shelf and close the door. Open the refrigerator doors and take the egg out
Turn around and go towards the sink
Place the egg on the counter to the left of the sink
Turn around and walk to the counter then turn right and walk to the counter.
Pick up the egg that's in front of you to the right of the cup.
Turn right and take a step to your right then take a step forward then turn left to face the fridge.
Chill the egg in the fridge then get it back out and close the door.
Turn left and walk to the counter then turn left and walk to the counter then turn right .
Put the egg on the counter to the left of the sink. 
Turn around and move to the counter. Turn right to the other side of the counter.
Pick up the egg from the right side of the counter.
Carry the egg and turn around. Face the fridge on the left side.
Open the fridge and place the egg inside. Shut the door and then open it again. Take out the egg and shut the door.
Carry the egg and turn to the left and then left again. Turn around so the sink is on the left.
Place the egg on the counter, to the left of the sink.
Step left and around the table to look at it from that angle.
Pick up the knife.
Look down and to the left.
Slice the bread on the counter with the knife.
Put the knife back roughly where it was before.
Pick up a slice of bread.
Walk ahead and right to the microwave.
Heat the bread in the microwave.
Turn around and go back to the table where the bread was.
Put the bread on the table on top of the knife.
Turn around and walk to the left side of the table.
Pick up the knife.
Step back a bit.
Cut the bread into slices.
Set the knife back down on the table.
Pick up a slice of bread.
Step back and turn to the right and head towards the microwave.
Open the microwave, place the bread in it, close the door, cook it, and take it back out.
Turn around and head back over to the left side of the table.
Set the bread back down on the table.
Head to the left side of the white table
Grab the knife off of the table
Look down at the table
Cut the apple on the table into slices
Put the knife on the table
Grab one of the apple slices off the table
Turn right and head to the microwave
Heat the apple in the microwave and then take it out
Turn around and head back to the white table
Place the apple on the table
Turn left and walk around the table to face the knife on the table.
Pick up the knife on the table
Look down to face the potato on the table.
Cut the potato on the left side of the table.
Place the knife on the right side of the table.
Pick up a slice of the potato.
Turn right and walk halfway across the room, then turn left and walk forward to face the microwave above the stove.
Warm the potato slice in the microwave and remove it.
Turn around, walk across the room, turn right and walk across the room then turn left to face the table.
Put the slice of potato on the table.
walk to the counter between the refrigerator and the stove
grab the golden cup in the back on the counter
turn around, walk to the sink
put the golden cup in the sink
Move forward to the toaster on the counter.
Pick up the orange cup on the counter. 
Turn around and bring the cup to the sink on the right. 
Put the cup in the sink.
Turn to the right, then walk toward the counter on your left. 
Pick up the golden cup from behind the spatula.

Turn around then walk to the sink on your right.
Place the golden cup in the sink.
walk forwards towards the stove, stop to face the counter to the right of the stove
pick up the wine glass that is on the counter
turn around, walk forward, turn to face the sink on the right
put the wine glass in the sink
Turn around and go just past the table on the right then turn left and go to the table across the room
Pick up the apple that is on the front right corner of the table
Turn left and go to the wall then turn left and go to the fridge
Put the apple in the fridge and let it chill then take it back out of the fridge
Turn left and go to the table on the right then turn right to face it
Put the apple on the table just to the right of the container
Turn around and walk to the table to your left.
Grab the apple in front of the salt shaker on the counter.
Turn left and walk to the fridge to the end on the left.
Place the apple into the fridge, cool it and remove it.
Turn left and walk to the table to your right.
Place the cool apple next to the bowl on the table.
Turn right and walk to the right side of the table.
Pick up the red apple on the table.
Turn left and veer left to the fridge.
Place the apple in the fridge to the right side of the top shelf. Close the door, wait a moment, and take it out again.
Turn left and walk to the table on the right.
Place the apple on the table to the right and in front of the gray bowl.
Turn around, go forward, turn right at the counter to the left of the sink, go to the counter.
Take the knife from the counter.
Turn right, go forward, turn left at the fridge.
Cut the apple in the fridge into pieces.
Turn left, go forward, turn left, go forward to the wall, turn right, go forward to the oven.
Put the knife in the pot on the stove top on the left.
Turn around, go forward, turn left to the fridge, go forward to the fridge.
Take a piece of apple from the fridge.
Turn left, go forward, turn left, go forward to the wall, turn right, go forward to the oven.
Put the apple in the pot on the stove top on the left.
Take the pot from the stove top.
Turn around, go forward, turn left to the fridge, go forward to the fridge.
Put the pot on the top shelf of the bottom compartment of the fridge.
Turn around and head to the counter by the sink to your right.
Pick up the knife from the counter in front of you.
Turn right then face the fridge on your left.
Open the fridge, slice the apple inside then close the fridge.
Turn around then face the stove to your right.
Place the knife in the right pot on the stove.
Turn around then face the fridge on your left.
Open the fridge and take out an apple slice inside then close the fridge.
Turn around then face the stove on your right.
Place the apple slice inside the pot with the knife on the stove.
Pick up the pot with the apple slice from the stove in front of you.
Turn around then face the fridge on your left.
Place the pot with the apple inside of the fridge then close it.
Turn around to your left, walk straight then face to your right on the sink counter


Pick up the knife on the edge of the sink counter

 Turn around to your left then walk towards the fridge on your left.
Open the fridge slice the apple in the fridge then close the fridge
Turn to your left and head to the stove on your right

Put the knife in the pot on the stove
Turn to your right , walk straight then right the left towards the fridge
Open the fridge and pick up the slice apple inside then close the fridge
Turn to your left then head to the stove and face the pot on the stove
Put the slice apple in the pot
Pick up the pot on the stove
Turn to your right and walk few steps turn to your left, walk towards the fridge
Open the fridge and put in the pot then close the fridge
Turn around and walk to the counter tot he left of the sink and face it.
Take the butter knife off of the edge of the counter.
Turn right and walk over to the fridge then turn left to face it.
Cut the apple in the freezer into three chunks.
Turn left and walk to the sink and then turn left and walk to the wall then turn right and walk to the stove.
Put the knife in the pan on the back left burner.
Go back to the fridge.
Get a chunk of apple out of the freezer.
Walk back over to the stove.
Put the apple chunk in the pan on the back left burner.
Pick up the pan with the chunk of apple and knife in it.
Pick up the pan on the back left burner.
Walk back to the fridge and put the pan in it and close the door.
go to counter to left of sink near tomato
pick up the knife from the counter
take the knife to the fridge
put the knife in the fridge and take it back out
take the knife to the stove
put the knife in the bowl on the back left burner
walk back over to the fridge
take the apple out of the fridge
take the apple to the stove
put the apple in the bowl with the knife on the stove
pick up the bowl with the apple and knife
take the bowl the fridge
put the bowl with the apple and the knife in fridge
turn around and walk to the end of the room on your right, then walk to the right side of the fridge at the end of the room on your left
grab the vase out of the left side of the inside of the sink
literally turn right just to face that direction
place the vase down on the kitchen counter to your left, which is to the right of the sink
Turn around and walk to the table, then turn right and walk to the stove, then turn left and walk a few steps before turning right to walk to the sink.
Pick up the glass bottle on the left side of the sink.
Turn to the right. 
Place the glass bottle on the counter to the left, next to the coffee maker. 
Turn left and walk over to the kitchen sink
Pick up the left most vase from the sink
Turn right and look up slightly
Put the vase down on the counter just right of the sink
Turn around a find the small black table in the corner.
Pick up the cup from the back right of the table.
Take the cup and turn around and go left to locate the stove.
Put the cup in the microwave and turn it on. When finished, take it back out.
Take the cup and turn around and go back to the small table on the right.
Place the cup on the table, behind the knife.
Turn to your right then walk forward turn right and face the shelf
Pick up the container on the shelf
Turn to your right head across the room going to the microwave
Open the microwave put in and out the container then close the microwave
Turn around to your left then cross the room face the shelf on your right
Put the container on the shelf beside the knife
Turn around and find the small black table.
Pick up the cup from the back right corner of the table.
Carry the cup and turn to the right and find the stove.
Open the microwave and place the cup inside. Shut the door and turn it on, then open the door again. Take out the cup and shut the door.
Carry the cup and turn around, then to the right to go back to the black table.
Place the cup on the right side of the table.
move to the kitchen sink at the end of the room
grab a butter knife on the counter in front of the sink
turn around and head over to the kitchen stove
place the butter knife inside the pan on the back right burner
grab the pan with the knife in it off of the stove
turn around and walk over to the coffee maker
place the pan in front of the coffee maker
Turn right and walk over to the sink.
Pick up the knife from the counter.
Turn right and walk to the trash can, then turn right and walk to the stove and face it.
Put the knife in the pot that is sitting on the stove.
Pick up the pot from the stove.
Turn around and walk towards the fridge, then turn left and face the coffee maker.
Set the pot down on the table in front of the coffee maker.
Turn right, walk to the sink
Grab the knife by the sink
Turn right, turn right,walk to the stove
Put the knife in the silver pan
Grab the silver pan on the stove
Turn around, walk to the coffee machine
Put the silver pan down on the table in front of the coffee machine
Go forward and then left to stand to the right of the sink.
Pick the tea kettle up from the counter.
Move to the left and face the sink.
Put the tea kettle in the sink, turn the water on and then off and pick the tea kettle up out of the sink.
Cross the room and turn to face the brown shelves.
Put the tea kettle on the shelf.
Go forward and then left to locate the sink.
Pick up the tea pot from the counter.
Take the tea pot and move a few steps left to the sink.
Place the tea pot in the sink and turn on the water. Turn off the water and pick up the tea pot.
Carry the tea pot and turn around. Turn right to find the brown shelf.
Place the tea pot on the next to bottom shelf.
Go straight, then turn left and go to the counter above the dishwasher.
Pick up the kettle on the counter, to the left of the coffee maker.
Turn left, go forward, then turn right to face the sink.
Clean the kettle in the sink.
Turn around, go forward, then turn right to go to the shelves.
Put the kettle on the second shelf and to the right of the bread.
Walk over to the wall, then turn right and walk over to the end of the kitchen island.
Pick up the head of lettuce off of the island.
Turn left and walk over to the fridge.
Open the fridge door and put the head of lettuce inside then close the door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and take out the now chilled head of lettuce, then close the fridge.
Turn right and walk forward, then turn left to face the sink.
Put the chilled head of lettuce on top of the fork in the sink basin.
Turn right then walk straight face the end of the table
Pick up the cabbage on the table
Turn left then head to the fridge
Open the fridge and put in the cabbage wait for few second then get it back 
Turn right then head to the sink on your left
Put the cabbage in the sink
Turn to your right and walk towards the refrigerator, turning to your right at the island. 
Pick up the head of lettuce on the front, right corner of the island. 
Turn to your left and go to the refrigerator across from you. 
Place the head of lettuce on the center of the first shelf of the refrigerator, wait a moment for it to chill, then remove the head of lettuce from the refrigerator. 
Turn to your right and go past the refrigerator, to the sink on your left. 
Place the head of lettuce in the sink. 
Walk around the table in front of you to reach the opposite end.
Pick up the bowl with the knife in it from the table.
Walk to the left of the table and stop when you get to the sink.
Fill the bowl with water, then pick it up again.
Turn around to face the table again. 
Place the bowl on the front left side of the table, next to the other knife.
Take a step forward, then turn left and walk over to the wall, hang a right and walk over to the wall, then turn right and walk up to the kitchen island, turn right to face the island.
Pick up the dirty bowl with the knife in it off of the kitchen island.
Turn left and begin walking to the fridge, then hang a right and walk up to the kitchen sink.
Put the dirty bowl with the knife in it into the sink basin and turn on the water, after a couple seconds turn the water off and remove the bowl.
Turn around and take a step forward up to the kitchen island.
Place the clean bowl full of water with the knife in it on the counter to the left of the orange pen.
Walk around the table  and stand in front of the bowl and the plate. 
Pick up the bowl with the knife in it that's to the right of the plate. 
Turn left and walk to the kitchen sink that's to the right of the fridge. 
Put the bowl and knife in the sink, fill with water, and pick up the bowl from the sink. 
Turn around and face the table. 
Put the bowl down on the left side of the table to the right of the knife. 
move around the counter and move forward and turn to the right at the sink stopping in front of the mat to the left of the sink
pick up the knife that is behind the spatula on the mat
move slightly to the right in front of the potato on the mat
slice the potato that is on the mat
put the knife in the sink
pick up a slice of the potato
move to the left to face the microwave that is above the stove
open the microwave door, put the potato slice in to the microwave, close the door, turn the microwave on for three seconds, open the door and remove the potato slice
turn right and move towards the counter, turn right at the counter, at the end of the counter turn left, move forward and turn right at the window moving towards the round table
put the slice of potato on to the round table to the right of the tea kettle 
Go around the counter to go to the front of the Sink. 
Pick up the gray knife on the counter.
Move over to the right.
Slice the potato on the counter.
Place the knife in the sink.
Pick up one slice of potato. 
Turn left and go to the microwave above the stove.
Microwave the slice of potato, and take it out.
Turn around and go to the table on the opposite side.
Place the potato slice on the table on the right of the tea kettle. 
Turn to your left, then turn right then head to the sink on your right
Pick up the knife on the left side of the sink
Move slightly on your right then face the potato
Slice the potato on the sink
Put the knife in the sink 
Pick up a slice of potato on the sink
Turn to your left, turn to the microwave on your right
Open the microwave put in and out the slice potato then close the microwave
Turn to your right then move forward then turn right head straight turn right face the table on your right
Put the slice potato on the table beside the kettle
Turn around and go around the kitchen island to approach the stove.
Take the spoon from the counter, behind the bowl.
Put the spoon in the bowl on the counter.
Pick up the bowl with the spoon in it.
Turn around, then turn left around the kitchen island, then right to face the sink.
Put the bowl in the sink.
Turn around, go right around the island, to the stove on the left. 
Pick up the spoon left of the stove. 
Put the spoon in the bowl on the counter. 
Pick up the bowl with spoon on the counter. 
Turn around and head to the sink. 
Put the bowl with spoon in the sink.
Move across the kitchen facing the stove top
Pick up the large spoon on the counter to the right of the stove
Place the large spoon in the bowl to the right of the stove sitting on the counter
Pick up the bowl on top of the counter with the spoon in it 
Carry the bowl and the spoon to the kitchen sink
Place the bowl and spoon in the left side of the sink basin
Turn around, then turn to your right until you face the stove
Pick up a spoon from the kitchen counter
Place the spoon into the bowl
Pick up the bowl with the spoon in it
Turn around and move until you are facing the sink
Put the bowl with the spoon in it in the sink
Turn around, hang a right at the white door and cross the room towards the stove.
Pick up the spoon to the right of the stove on the counter top.
Put the spoon inside the clear container on the counter.
Pick up the container with the spoon from the counter.
Turn around and cross the room to reach the counter to the right of the sink.
Place the container with the spoon inside the sink.
Turn around and go to the counter top to the right of the sink. 
Pick up the butter knife from the counter top. 
Turn to your left and go to the counter top just past the sink, on your right. 
Cut the potato, in front of the bread, on the counter top into slices. 
Turn around and walk across the kitchen, to the counter top, then turn left and go to the refrigerator in front of you. 
Place the knife on the right of the top shelf, in front of the egg, in the refrigerator. 
Turn to your left and go back to the counter top, then turn right and go back to the counter where the potato is. 
Pick up one of the potato slices. 
Turn around and go back to the counter, make a left and g back to the refrigerator. 
Place the potato slice on the top shelf, to the left of the knife, in the refrigerator, wait a moment for it to chill, then remove the potato slice from the refrigerator. 
Go to the garbage can on the floor of the right side of the refrigerator. 
Place the potato slice in the garbage bin. 
Turn left, go forward, turn left go to the counter
Pick up the knife on the counter
Turn left, go forward, turn right at the counter
Slice the potato on the counter
Turn around, go forward, turn left and go to the fridge
Put the knife in the fridge
Turn around, go forward, turn right and go to the counter
Pick up a potato slice from the counter
Turn around, go forward, turn left and go to the fridge
Put the potato slice in the fridge, wait, pick up the potato slice from the fridge
Move a bit to the right
Put the potato slice in the basket
Turn left and walk forward to the counter.
Turn left again and walk forward to the other counter.
Pick up the butter knife from the counter top.
Turn left, move forward, and then turn right and move to the dishwasher.
Slice the small potato above the dishwasher with the butter knife.
Turn around, move forward, and then turn and move towards the refrigerator on the left.
Open the refrigerator, put the knife on the top shelf inside the refrigerator, and close the refrigerator.
Turn around, move forward, then turn right and move to the dishwasher.
Pick up one slice of potato from the counter top above the dishwasher, turn around, move forward, and then turn and move towards the refrigerator on the left.
Place the potato slice in the refrigerator next to the butter knife on the top shelf, close the door, wait until it is chilled, then take the potato slice out of the refrigerator and close the refrigerator.
Move to the garbage can on the right side of the refrigerator.
Put the slice of potato into the garbage can.
Walk to the wall then turn left.
Open the fridge and get the head of lettuce then close the fridge.
Walk over until you are about two feet away from the sink.
Put the lettuce to the right of the sink to the right of the ice cream scoop.
Go left to the fridge.
Take out the cabbage from the second shelf of the fridge.
Turn left and go to the sink.
Place the cabbage on the counter near the sink, to the right of the knife. 
Turn left to face refrigerator.
Take lettuce from the top shelf of the refrigerator.
Turn left, walk to the sink.
Place lettuce on counter to the right of the sink, to the right of the knife.
Turn to the left to face the fridge
Open the fridge and remove the head if lettuce on the top shelf, shut the fridge
Head toward the sink
Place the lettuce behind the dinner knife to the right of the sink
Turn right move forward then turn right head to the counter beside the left side of the microwave
Pick up the tomato on the counter
Turn left make a step turn right, face the cabinet above
Put the tomato on the plate at the cabinet
Pick up the plate with tomato
Head down the counter then turn left
Put the plate with tomato on the counter in front of the two containers
turn right, go forward a bit and then turn right again, head to the counter.
pick up the tomato off of the counter. 
look up and open the cupboard to your left.
 put the tomato on a plate in cupboard.
take the plate with tomato out of cupboard.
turn to your left to face the counter with the coffee maker.
put the plate and tomato on the counter top. 
Turn around and walk across the room to the counter with the microwave.
Pick up the tomato from the counter.
Move over a few inches towards the corner of the counter.
Put the tomato on the plate in the upper cabinet on the left.
Take the plate with tomato out of the cabinet.
Turn left toward the coffee pot.
Set the plate to the left of the coffee maker.
Turn around and move to the right of the stove.
Pick up the butter knife off of the counter.
Turn around and move to the wooden table on the opposite corner of the room.
Place the knife into the glass cup.
Pick up the glass cup with the knife inside.
Turn to the right and move to the sink.
Place the glass cup with the knife inside into the sink.
Head left towards the fridge, turn left towards the stove and walk to the counter to the right of the stove.
Pick up the knife to the left of the cutting boards.
Turn left, hang a left at the stove and walk to the large wooden table on the right.
Put the knife inside the clear glass to the left of the head of lettuce on the table.
Pick up the glass with the knife from the table.
Head right towards the sink, turn left and face the dishwasher to the right.
Put the glass with the knife inside on the left side of the sink.
Turn around and walk and stand in front of the stove to your right.
Pick up the butter knife that's to the right of the stove.
Turn left and take three steps then take two steps to your left and walk to the table that's in front of you with the mug on it. .
Put the knife in the clear cup that's above the mug.
Pick up the glass with the knife in it.
Turn right and walk to the sink then take a small step to the left.
Put the cup in the sink.
Turn around and take a step then turn right and walk to the microwave.
Open the microwave and pick up the egg that's in the microwave to the left of another egg then close the door.
Turn right and walk to the stove then turn right and walk to the fridge.
Chill the egg in the fridge then get it back out and close the door.
Turn left and walk to the counter then turn left and walk to the counter then turn around.
Put the  egg on the counter to your left near the edge.
Turn around and walk towards the wall, then turn right and walk up to the microwave.
Open the microwave and take the leftmost egg out of the microwave, then close the microwave.
Turn right and walk over to the fridge.
Put the egg in the fridge then close the door, after a couple seconds open the fridge back up and take out the now chilled egg.
Turn left and walk towards the counter, then hang a left and walk over to the counter to the left of the sink and turn to face the sink.
Put the chilled egg on the front edge of the counter to the left of the sink.
Turn to the left and face the counter.
Open the microwave and take out the egg. Close the microwave. 
Turn to the right and walk forward to the oven. Make a right at the oven and head to the fridge. 
Open the fridge and place the egg inside. Close the fridge and chill the egg. Open the fridge and take out the egg. 
Turn and walk to the right with the egg. Turn around and walk forward to the other side of the kitchen.
Place the egg on the counter that is to your right. 
